AN INQUIRY INTO THE NATURE AND CAUSES OF THE WEALTH OF NATIONS
by Adam Smith
1776


                          BOOK FIVE

       OF THE REVENUE OF THE SOVEREIGN OR COMMONWEALTH

                          CHAPTER I
       Of the Expenses of the Sovereign or Commonwealth

                           PART 1
                 Of the Expense of Defence

    THE first duty of the sovereign, that of protecting the
society from the violence and invasion of other independent
societies, can be performed only by means of a military force.
But the expense both of preparing this military force in time of
peace, and of employing it in time of war, is very different in
the different states of society, in the different periods of
improvement.
     Among nations of hunters, the lowest and rudest state of
society, such as we find it among the native tribes of North
America, every man is a warrior as well as a hunter. When he goes
to war, either to defend his society or to revenge the injuries
which have been done to it by other societies, he maintains
himself by his own labour in the same manner as when he lives at
home. His society, for in this state of things there is properly
neither sovereign nor commonwealth, is at no sort of expense,
either to prepare him for the field, or to maintain him while he
is in it.
     Among nations of shepherds, a more advanced state of
society, such as we find it among the Tartars and Arabs, every
man is, in the same manner, a warrior. Such nations have commonly
no fixed habitation, but live either in tents or in a sort of
covered waggons which are easily transported from place to place.
The whole tribe or nation changes its situation according to the
different seasons of the year, as well as according to other
accidents. When its herds and flocks have consumed the forage of
one part of the country, it removes to another, and from that to
a third. In the dry season it comes down to the banks of the
rivers; in the wet season it retires to the upper country. When
such a nation goes to war, the warriors will not trust their
herds and flocks to the feeble defence of their old men, their
women and children; and their old men, their women and children,
will not be left behind without defence and without subsistence.
The whole nation, besides, being accustomed to a wandering life,
even in time of peace, easily takes the field in time of war.
Whether it marches as an army, or moves about as a company of
herdsmen, the way of life is nearly the same, though the object
proposed by it be very different. They all go to war together,
therefore, and every one does as well as he can. Among the
Tartars, even the women have been frequently known to engage in
battle. If they conquer, whatever belongs to the hostile tribe is
the recompense of the victory. But if they are vanquished, all is
lost, and not only their herds and flocks, but their women and
children, become the booty of the conqueror. Even the greater
part of those who survive the action are obliged to submit to him
for the sake of immediate subsistence. The rest are commonly
dissipated and dispersed in the desert.
     The ordinary life, the ordinary exercises of a Tartar or
Arab, prepare him sufficiently for war. Running, wrestling,
cudgel-playing, throwing the javelin, drawing the bow, etc., are
the common pastimes of those who live in the open air, and are
all of them the images of war. When a Tartar or Arab actually
goes to war, he is maintained by his own herds and flocks which
he carries with him in the same manner as in peace. His chief or
sovereign, for those nations have all chiefs or sovereigns, is at
no sort of expense in preparing him for the field; and when he is
in it the chance of plunder is the only pay which he either
expects or requires.
     An army of hunters can seldom exceed two or three hundred
men. The precarious subsistence which the chase affords could
seldom allow a greater number to keep together for any
considerable time. An army of shepherds, on the contrary, may
sometimes amount to two or three hundred thousand. As long as
nothing stops their progress, as long as they can go on from one
district, of which they have consumed the forage, to another
which is yet entire, there seems to be scarce any limit to the
number who can march on together. A nation of hunters can never
be formidable to the civilised nations in their neighbourhood. A
nation of shepherds may. Nothing can be more contemptible than an
Indian war in North America. Nothing, on the contrary, can be
more dreadful than Tartar invasion has frequently been in Asia.
The judgment of Thucydides, that both Europe and Asia could not
resist the Scythians united, has been verified by the experience
of all ages. The inhabitants of the extensive but defenceless
plains of Scythia or Tartary have been frequently united under
the dominion of the chief of some conquering horde or clan, and
the havoc and devastation of Asia have always signalized their
union. The inhabitants of the inhospitable deserts of Arabia, the
other great nation of shepherds, have never been united but once;
under Mahomet and his immediate successors. Their union, which
was more the effect of religious enthusiasm than of conquest, was
signalized in the same manner. If the hunting nations of America
should ever become shepherds, their neighbourhood would be much
more dangerous to the European colonies than it is at present.
     In a yet more advanced state of society, among those nations
of husbandmen who have little foreign commerce, and no other
manufactures but those coarse and household ones which almost
every private family prepares for its own use, every man, in the
same manner, either is a warrior or easily becomes such. They who
live by agriculture generally pass the whole day in the open air,
exposed to all the inclemencies of the seasons. The hardiness of
their ordinary life prepares them for the fatigues of war, to
some of which their necessary occupations bear a great analogy.
The necessary occupation of a ditcher prepares him to work in the
trenches, and to fortify a camp as well as to enclose a field.
The ordinary pastimes of such husbandmen are the same as those of
shepherds, and are in the same manner the images of war. But as
husbandmen have less leisure than shepherds, they are not so
frequently employed in those pastimes. They are soldiers, but
soldiers not quite so much masters of their exercise. Such as
they are, however, it seldom costs the sovereign or commonwealth
any expense to prepare them for the field.
     Agriculture, even in its rudest and lowest state, supposes a
settlement: some sort of fixed habitation which cannot be
abandoned without great loss. When a nation of mere husbandmen,
therefore, goes to war, the whole people cannot take the field
together. The old men, the women and children, at least, must
remain at home to take care of the habitation. All the men of the
military age, however, may take the field, and, in small nations
of this kind, have frequently done so. In every nation the men of
the military age are supposed to amount to about a fourth or a
fifth part of the whole body of the people. If the campaign,
should begin after seed-time, and end before harvest, both the
husbandman and his principal labourers can be spared from the
farm without much loss. He trusts that the work which must be
done in the meantime can be well enough executed by the old men,
the women, and the children. He is not unwilling, therefore, to
serve without pay during a short campaign, and it frequently
costs the sovereign or commonwealth as little to maintain him in
the field as to prepare him for it. The citizens of all the
different states of ancient Greece seem to have served in this
manner till after the second Persian war; and the people of
Peloponnesus till after the Peloponnesian war. The
Peloponnesians, Thucydides observes, generally left the field in
the summer, and returned home to reap the harvest. The Roman
people under their kings, and during the first ages of the
republic, served in the same manner. It was not till the siege of
Veii that they who stayed at home began to contribute something
towards maintaining those who went to war. In the European
monarchies, which were founded upon the ruins of the Roman
empire, both before and for some time after the establishment of
what is properly called the feudal law, the great lords, with all
their immediate dependents, used to serve the crown at their own
expense. In the field, in the same manner as at home, they
maintained themselves by their own revenue, and not by any
stipend or pay which they received from the king upon that
particular occasion.
     In a more advanced state of society, two different causes
contribute to render it altogether impossible that they who take
the field should maintain themselves at their own expense. Those
two causes are, the progress of manufactures, and the improvement
in the art of war.
     Though a husbandman should be employed in an expedition,
provided it begins after seed-time and ends before harvest, the
interruption of his business will not always occasion any
considerable diminution of his revenue. Without the intervention
of his labour, nature does herself the greater part of the work
which remains to be done. But the moment that an artificer, a
smith, a carpenter, or a weaver, for example, quits his
workhouse, the sole source of his revenue is completely dried up.
Nature does nothing for him, he does all for himself. When he
takes the field, therefore, in defence of the public, as he has
no revenue to maintain himself, he must necessarily be maintained
by the public. But in a country of which a great part of the
inhabitants are artificers and manufacturers, a great part of the
people who go to war must be drawn from those classes, and must
therefore be maintained by the public as long as they are
employed in its service.
     When the art of war, too, has gradually grown up to be a
very intricate and complicated science, when the event of war
ceases to be determined, as in the first ages of society, by a
single irregular skirmish or battle, but when the contest is
generally spun out through several different campaigns, each of
which lasts during the greater part of the year, it becomes
universally necessary that the public should maintain those who
serve the public in war, at least while they are employed in that
service. Whatever in time of peace might be the ordinary
occupation of those who go to war, so very tedious and expensive
a service would otherwise be far too heavy a burden upon them.
After the second Persian war, accordingly, the armies of Athens
seem to have been generally composed of mercenary troops,
consisting, indeed, partly of citizens, but partly too of
foreigners, and all of them equally hired and paid at the expense
of the state. From the time of the siege of Veii, the armies of
Rome received pay for their service during the time which they
remained in the field. Under the feudal governments the military
service both of the great lords and of their immediate dependants
was, after a certain period, universally exchanged for a payment
in money, which was employed to maintain those who served in
their stead.
     The number of those who can go to war, in proportion to the
whole number of the people, is necessarily much smaller in a
civilised than in a rude state of society. In a civilised
society, as the soldiers are maintained altogether by the labour
of those who are not soldiers, the number of the former can never
exceed what the latter can maintain, over and above maintaining,
in a manner suitable to their respective stations, both
themselves and the other officers of government and law whom they
are obliged to maintain. In the little agrarian states of ancient
Greece, a fourth or a fifth part of the whole body of the people
considered themselves as soldiers, and would sometimes, it is
said, take a field. Among the civilised nations of modern Europe,
it is commonly computed that not more than one-hundredth part of
the inhabitants in any country can be employed as soldiers
without ruin to the country which pays the expenses of their
service.
     The expense of preparing the army for the field seems not to
have become considerable in any nation till long after that of
maintaining it in the field had devolved entirely upon the
sovereign or commonwealth. In all the different republics of
ancient Greece, to learn his military exercises was a necessary
part of education imposed by the state upon every free citizen.
In every city there seems to have been a public field, in which,
under the protection of the public magistrate, the young people
were taught their different exercises by different masters. In
this very simple institution consisted the whole expense which
any Grecian state seems ever to have been at in preparing its
citizens for war. In ancient Rome the exercises of the Campus
Martius answered the same purpose with those of the Gymnasium in
ancient Greece. Under the feudal governments, the many public
ordinances that the citizens of every district should practise
archery as well as several other military exercises were intended
for promoting the same purpose, but do not seem to have promoted
it so well. Either from want of interest in the officers
entrusted with the execution of those ordinances, or from some
other cause, they appear to have been universally neglected; and
in the progress of all those governments, military exercises seem
to have gone gradually into disuse among the great body of the
people.
     In the republics of ancient Greece and Rome, during the
whole period of their existence, and under the feudal governments
for a considerable time after their first establishment, the
trade of a soldier was not a separate, distinct trade, which
constituted the sole or principal occupation of a particular
class of citizens. Every subject of the state, whatever might be
the ordinary trade or occupation by which he gained his
livelihood, considered himself, upon all ordinary occasions, as
fit likewise to exercise the trade of a soldier, and upon many
extraordinary occasions as bound to exercise it.
     The art of war, however, as it is certainly the noblest of
all arts, so in the progress of improvement it necessarily
becomes one of the most complicated among them. The state of the
mechanical, as well as of some other arts, with which it is
necessarily connected, determines the degree of perfection to
which it is capable of being carried at any particular time. But
in order to carry it to this degree of perfection, it is
necessary that it should become the sole or principal occupation
of a particular class of citizens, and the division of labour is
as necessary for the improvement of this, as of every other art.
Into other arts the division of labour is naturally introduced by
the prudence of individuals, who find that they promote their
private interest better by confining themselves to a particular
trade than by exercising a great number. But it is the wisdom of
the state only which can render the trade of a soldier a
particular trade separate and distinct from all others. A private
citizen who, in time of profound peace, and without any
particular encouragement from the public, should spend the
greater part of his time in military exercises, might, no doubt,
both improve himself very much in them, and amuse himself very
well; but he certainly would not promote his own interest. It is
the wisdom of the state only which can render it for his interest
to give up the greater part of his time to this peculiar
occupation: and states have not always had this wisdom, even when
their circumstances had become such that the preservation of
their existence required that they should have it.
     A shepherd has a great deal of leisure; a husbandman, in the
rude state of husbandry, has some; an artificer or manufacturer
has none at all. The first may, without any loss, employ a great
deal of his time in martial exercises; the second may employ some
part of it; but the last cannot employ a single hour in them
without some loss, and his attention to his own interest
naturally leads him to neglect them altogether. These
improvements in husbandry too, which the progress of arts and
manufactures necessarily introduces, leave the husbandman as
little leisure as the artificer. Military exercises come to be as
much neglected by the inhabitants of the country as by those of
the town, and the great body of the people becomes altogether
unwarlike. That wealth, at the same time, which always follows
the improvements of agriculture and manufactures, and which in
reality is no more than the accumulated produce of those
improvements, provokes the invasion of all their neighbours. An
industrious, and upon that account a wealthy nation, is of all
nations the most likely to be attacked; and unless the state
takes some new measures for the public defence, the natural
habits of the people render them altogether incapable of
defending themselves.
     In these circumstances there seem to be but two methods by
which the state can make any tolerable provision for the public
defence.
     It may either, first, by means of a very rigorous police,
and in spite of the whole bent of the interest, genius, and
inclinations of the people, enforce the practice of military
exercises, and oblige either all the citizens of the military
age, or a certain number of them, to join in some measure the
trade of a soldier to whatever other trade or profession they may
happen to carry on.
     Or, secondly, by maintaining and employing a certain number
of citizens in the constant practice of military exercises, it
may render the trade of a soldier a particular trade, separate
and distinct from all others.
     If the state has recourse to the first of those two
expedients, its military force is said to consist in a militia;
if to the second, it is said to consist in a standing army. The
practice of military exercises is the sole or principal
occupation of the soldiers of a standing army, and the
maintenance or pay which the state affords them is the principal
and ordinary fund of their subsistence. The practice of military
exercises is only the occasional occupation of the soldiers of a
militia, and they derive the principal and ordinary fund of their
subsistence from some other occupation. In a militia, the
character of the labourer, artificer, or tradesman, predominates
over that of the soldier; in a standing army, that of the soldier
predominates over every other character: and in this distinction
seems to consist the essential difference between those two
different species of military force.
     Militias have been of several different kinds. In some
countries the citizens destined for defending the states seem to
have been exercised only, without being, if I may say so,
regimented; that is, without being divided into separate and
distinct bodies of troops, each of which performed its exercises
under its own proper and permanent officers. In the republics of
ancient Greece and Rome, each citizen, as long as he remained at
home, seems to have practised his exercises either separately and
independently, or with such of his equals as he liked best, and
not to have been attached to any particular body of troops till
he was actually called upon to take the field. In other
countries, the militia has not only been exercised, but
regimented. In England, in Switzerland, and, I believe, in every
other country of modern Europe where any imperfect military force
of this kind has been established, every militiaman is, even in
time of peace, attached to a particular body of troops, which
performs its exercises under its own proper and permanent
officers.
     Before the invention of firearms, that army was superior in
which the soldiers had, each individually, the greatest skill and
dexterity in the use of their arms. Strength and agility of body
were of the highest consequence, and commonly determined the
state of battles. But this skill and dexterity in the use of
their arms could be acquired only, in the same manner as fencing
is at present, by practising, not in great bodies, but each man
separately, in a particular school, under a particular master, or
with his own particular equals and companions. Since the
invention of firearms, strength and agility of body, or even
extraordinary dexterity and skill in the use of arms, though they
are far from being of no consequence, are, however, of less
consequence. The nature of the weapon, though it by no means puts
the awkward upon a level with the skilful, puts him more nearly
so than he ever was before. All the dexterity and skill, it is
supposed, which are necessary for using it, can be well enough
acquired by practising in great bodies.
     Regularity, order, and prompt obedience to command are
qualities which, in modern armies, are of more importance towards
determining the fate of battles than the dexterity and skill of
the soldiers in the use of their arms. But the noise of firearms,
the smoke, and the invisible death to which every man feels
himself every moment exposed as soon as he comes within
cannon-shot, and frequently a long time before the battle can be
well said to be engaged, must render it very difficult to
maintain any considerable degree of this regularity, order, and
prompt obedience, even in the beginning of a modern battle. In an
ancient battle there was no noise but what arose from the human
voice; there was no smoke, there was no invisible cause of wounds
or death. Every man, till some mortal weapon actually did
approach him, saw clearly that no such weapon was near him. In
these circumstances, and among troops who had some confidence in
their own skill and dexterity in the use of their arms, it must
have been a good deal less difficult to preserve some degree
regularity and order, not only in the beginning, but through the
whole progress of an ancient battle, and till one of the two
armies was fairly defeated. But the habits of regularity, order,
and prompt obedience to command can be acquired only by troops
which are exercised in great bodies.
     A militia, however, in whatever manner it may be either
disciplined or exercised, must always be much inferior to a
well-disciplined and well-exercised standing army.
     The soldiers who are exercised only once a week, or once a
month, can never be so expert in the use of their arms as those
who are exercised every day, or every other day; and though this
circumstance may not be of so much consequence in modern as it
was in ancient times, yet the acknowledged superiority of the
Prussian troops, owing, it is said, very much to their superior
expertness in their exercise, may satisfy us that it is, even at
this day, of very considerable consequence.
     The soldiers who are bound to obey their officer only once a
week or once a month, and who are at all other times at liberty
to manage their own affairs their own way, without being in any
respect accountable to him, can never be under the same awe in
his presence, can never have the same disposition to ready
obedience, with those whose whole life and conduct are every day
directed by him, and who every day even rise and go to bed, or at
least retire to their quarters, according to his orders. In what
is called discipline, or in the habit of ready obedience, a
militia must always be still more inferior to a standing army
than it may sometimes be in what is called the manual exercise,
or in the management and use of its arms. But in modern war the
habit of ready and instant obedience is of much greater
consequence than a considerable superiority in the management of
arms.
     Those militias which, like the Tartar or Arab militia, go to
war under the same chieftains whom they are accustomed to obey in
peace are by far the best. In respect for their officers, in the
habit of ready obedience, they approach nearest to standing
armies. The highland militia, when it served under its own
chieftains, had some advantage of the same kind. As the
highlanders, however, were not wandering, but stationary
shepherds, as they had all a fixed habitation, and were not, in
peaceable times, accustomed to follow their chieftain from place
to place, so in time of war they were less willing to follow him
to any considerable distance, or to continue for any long time in
the field. When they had acquired any booty they were eager to
return home, and his authority was seldom sufficient to detain
them. In point of obedience they were always much inferior to
what is reported of the Tartars and Arabs. As the highlanders
too, from their stationary life, spend less of their time in the
open air, they were always less accustomed to military exercises,
and were less expert in the use of their arms than the Tartars
and Arabs are said to be.
     A militia of any kind, it must be observed, however, which
has served for several successive campaigns in the field, becomes
in every respect a standing army. The soldiers are every day
exercised in the use of their arms, and, being constantly under
the command of their officers, are habituated to the same prompt
obedience which takes place in standing armies. What they were
before they took the field is of little importance. They
necessarily become in every respect a standing army after they
have passed a few campaigns in it. Should the war in America drag
out through another campaign, the American militia may become in
every respect a match for that standing army of which the valour
appeared, in the last war, at least not inferior to that of the
hardiest veterans of France and Spain.
     This distinction being well understood, the history of all
ages, it will be found, bears testimony to the irresistible
superiority which a well-regulated standing army has over a
militia.
     One of the first standing armies of which we have any
distinct account, in any well authenticated history, is that of
Philip of Macedon. His frequent wars with the Thracians,
Illyrians, Thessalians, and some of the Greek cities in the
neighbourhood of Macedon, gradually formed his troops, which in
the beginning were probably militia, to the exact discipline of a
standing army. When he was at peace, which he was very seldom,
and never for any long time together, he was careful not to
disband that army. It vanquished and subdued, after a long and
violent struggle, indeed, the gallant and well exercised militias
of the principal republics of ancient Greece, and afterwards,
with very little struggle, the effeminate and ill-exercised
militia of the great Persian empire. The fall of the Greek
republics and of the Persian empire was the effect of the
irresistible superiority which a standing army has over every
sort of militia. It is the first great revolution in the affairs
of mankind of which history has preserved any distinct or
circumstantial account.
     The fall of Carthage, and the consequent elevation of Rome,
is the second. All the varieties in the fortune of those two
famous republics may very well be accounted for from the same
cause.
     From the end of the first to the beginning of the second
Carthaginian war the armies of Carthage were continually in the
field, and employed under three great generals, who succeeded one
another in the command: Hamilcar, his son-in-law Hasdrubal, and
his son Hannibal; first in chastising their own rebellious
slaves, afterwards in subduing the revolted nations of Africa,
and, lastly, in conquering the great kingdom of Spain. The army
which Hannibal led from Spain into Italy must necessarily, in
those different wars, have been gradually formed to the exact
discipline of a standing army. The Romans, in the meantime,
though they had not been altogether at peace, yet they had not,
during this period, been engaged in any war of very great
consequence, and their military discipline, it is generally said,
was a good deal relaxed. The Roman armies which Hannibal
encountered at Trebia, Thrasymenus, and Cannae were militia
opposed to a standing army. This circumstance, it is probable,
contributed more than any other to determine the fate of those
battles.
     The standing army which Hannibal left behind him in Spain
had the like superiority over the militia which the Romans sent
to oppose it, and in a few years, under the command of his
brother, the younger Hasdrubal, expelled them almost entirely
from that country.
     Hannibal was ill supplied from home. The Roman militia,
being continually in the field, became in the progress of the war
a well disciplined and well-exercised standing army, and the
superiority of Hannibal grew every day less and less. Hasdrubal
judged it necessary to lead the whole, or almost the whole of the
standing army which he commanded in Spain, to the assistance of
his brother in Italy. In this march he is said to have been
misled by his guides, and in a country which he did not know, was
surprised and attacked by another standing army, in every respect
equal or superior to his own, and was entirely defeated.
     When Hasdrubal had left Spain, the great Scipio found
nothing to oppose him but a militia inferior to his own. He
conquered and subdued that militia, and, in the course of the
war, his own militia necessarily became a well-disciplined and
well-exercised standing army. That standing army was afterwards
carried to Africa, where it found nothing but a militia to oppose
it. In order to defend Carthage it became necessary to recall the
standing army of Hannibal. The disheartened and frequently
defeated African militia joined it, and, at the battle of Zama,
composed the greater part of the troops of Hannibal. The event of
that day determined the fate of the two rival republics.
     From the end of the second Carthaginian war till the fall of
the Roman republic, the armies of Rome were in every respect
standing armies. The standing army of Macedon made some
resistance to their arms. In the height of their grandeur it cost
them two great wars, and three great battles, to subdue that
little kingdom, of which the conquest would probably have been
still more difficult had it not been for the cowardice of its
last king. The militias of all the civilised nations of the
ancient world, of Greece, of Syria, and of Egypt, made but a
feeble resistance to the standing armies of Rome. The militias of
some barbarous nations defended themselves much better. The
Scythian or Tartar militia, which Mithridates drew from the
countries north of the Euxine and Caspian seas, were the most
formidable enemies whom the Romans had to encounter after the
second Carthaginian war. The Parthian and German militias, too,
were always respectable, and upon several occasions gained very
considerable advantages over the Roman armies. In general,
however, and when the Roman armies were well commanded, they
appear to have been very much superior; and if the Romans did not
pursue the final conquest either of Parthia or Germany, it was
probably because they judged that it was not worth while to add
those two barbarous countries to an empire which was already too
large. The ancient Parthians appear to have been a nation of
Scythian or Tartar extraction, and to have always retained a good
deal of the manners of their ancestors. The ancient Germans were,
like the Scythians or Tartars, a nation of wandering shepherds,
who went to war under the same chiefs whom they were accustomed
to follow in peace. Their militia was exactly of the same kind
with that of the Scythians or Tartars, from whom, too, they were
probably descended.
     Many different causes contributed to relax the discipline of
the Roman armies. Its extreme severity was, perhaps, one of those
causes. In the days of their grandeur, when no enemy appeared
capable of opposing them, their heavy armour was laid aside as
unnecessarily burdensome, their labourious exercises were
neglected as unnecessarily toilsome. Under the Roman emperors,
besides, the standing armies of Rome, those particularly which
guarded the German and Pannonian frontiers, became dangerous to
their masters, against whom they used frequently to set up their
own generals. In order to render them less formidable, according
to some authors, Dioclesian, according to others, Constantine,
first withdrew them from the frontier, where they had always
before been encamped in great bodies, generally of two or three
legions each, and dispersed them in small bodies through the
different provincial towns, from whence they were scarce ever
removed but when it became necessary to repel an invasion. Small
bodies of soldiers quartered, in trading and manufacturing towns,
and seldom removed from those quarters, became themselves
tradesmen, artificers, and manufacturers. The civil came to
predominate over the military character, and the standing armies
of Rome gradually degenerated into a corrupt, neglected, and
undisciplined militia, incapable of resisting the attack of the
German and Scythian militias, which soon afterwards invaded the
western empire. It was only by hiring the militia of some of
those nations to oppose to that of others that the emperors were
for some time able to defend themselves. The fall of the western
empire is the third great revolution in the affairs of mankind of
which ancient history has preserved any distinct or
circumstantial account. It was brought about by the irresistible
superiority which the militia of a barbarous has over that of a
civilised nation; which the militia of a nation of shepherds has
over that of a nation of husbandmen, artificers, and
manufacturers. The victories which have been gained by militias
have generally been, not over standing armies, but over other
militias in exercise and discipline inferior to themselves. Such
were the victories which the Greek militia gained over that of
the Persian empire; and such too were those which in later times
the Swiss militia gained over that of the Austrians and
Burgundians.
     The military force of the German and Scythian nations who
established themselves upon the ruins of the western empire
continued for some time to be of the same kind in their new
settlements as it had been in their original country. It was a
militia of shepherds and husbandmen, which, in time of war, took
the field under the command of the same chieftains whom it was
accustomed to obey in peace. It was, therefore, tolerably well
exercised, and tolerably well disciplined. As arts and industry
advanced, however, the authority of the chieftains gradually
decayed, and the great body of the people had less time to spare
for military exercises. Both the discipline and the exercise of
the feudal militia, therefore, went gradually to ruin, and
standing armies were gradually introduced to supply the place of
it. When the expedient of a standing army, besides, had once been
adopted by one civilised nation, it became necessary that all its
neighbours should follow their example. They soon found that
their safety depended upon their doing so, and that their own
militia was altogether incapable of resisting the attack of such
an army.
     The soldiers of a standing army, though they may never have
seen an enemy, yet have frequently appeared to possess all the
courage of veteran troops and the very moment that they took the
field to have been fit to face the hardiest and most experienced
veterans. In 1756, when the Russian army marched into Poland, the
valour of the Russian soldiers did not appear inferior to that of
the Prussians, at that time supposed to be the hardiest and most
experienced veterans in Europe. The Russian empire, however, had
enjoyed a profound peace for near twenty years before, and could
at that time have very few soldiers who had ever seen an enemy.
When the Spanish war broke out in 1739, England had enjoyed a
profound peace for about eight-and-twenty years. The valour of
her soldiers, however, far from being corrupted by that long
peace, was never more distinguished than in the attempt upon
Carthagena, the first unfortunate exploit of that unfortunate
war. In a long peace the generals, perhaps, may sometimes forget
their skill; but, where a well-regulated standing army has been
kept up, the soldiers seem never to forget their valour.
     When a civilised nation depends for its defence upon a
militia, it is at all times exposed to be conquered by any
barbarous nation which happens to be in its neighbourhood. The
frequent conquests of all the civilised countries in Asia by the
Tartars sufficiently demonstrates the natural superiority which
the militia of a barbarous has over that of a civilised nation. A
well-regulated standing army is superior to every militia. Such
an army, as it can best be maintained by an opulent and civilised
nation, so it can alone defend such a nation against the invasion
of a poor and barbarous neighbour. It is only by means of a
standing army, therefore, that the civilization of any country
can be perpetuated, or even preserved for any considerable time.
     As it is only by means of a well-regulated standing army
that a civilised country can be defended, so it is only by means
of it that a barbarous country can be suddenly and tolerably
civilised. A standing army establishes, with an irresistible
force, the law of the sovereign through the remotest provinces of
the empire, and maintains some degree of regular government in
countries which could not otherwise admit of any. Whoever
examines, with attention, the improvements which Peter the Great
introduced into the Russian empire, will find that they almost
all resolve themselves into the establishment of a well regulated
standing army. It is the instrument which executes and maintains
all his other regulations. That degree of order and internal
peace which that empire has ever since enjoyed is altogether
owing to the influence of that army.
     Men of republican principles have been jealous of a standing
army as dangerous to liberty. It certainly is so wherever the
interest of the general and that of the principal officers are
not necessarily connected with the support of the constitution of
the state. The standing army of Caesar destroyed the Roman
republic. The standing army of Cromwell turned the Long
Parliament out of doors. But where the sovereign is himself the
general, and the principal nobility and gentry of the country the
chief officers of the army, where the military force is placed
under the command of those who have the greatest interest in the
support of the civil authority, because they have themselves the
greatest share of that authority, a standing army can never be
dangerous to liberty. On the contrary, it may in some cases be
favourable to liberty. The security which it gives to the
sovereign renders unnecessary that troublesome jealousy, which,
in some modern republics, seems to watch over the minutest
actions, and to be at all times ready to disturb the peace of
every citizen. Where the security of the magistrate, though
supported by the principal people of the country, is endangered
by every popular discontent; where a small tumult is capable of
bringing about in a few hours a great revolution, the whole
authority of government must be employed to suppress and punish
every murmur and complaint against it. To a sovereign, on the
contrary, who feels himself supported, not only by the natural
aristocracy of the country, but by a well-regulated standing
army, the rudest, the most groundless, and the most licentious
remonstrances can give little disturbance. He can safely pardon
or neglect them, and his consciousness of his own superiority
naturally disposes him to do so. That degree of liberty which
approaches to licentiousness can be tolerated only in countries
where the sovereign is secured by a well-regulated standing army.
It is in such countries only that the public safety does not
require that the sovereign should be trusted with any
discretionary power for suppressing even the impertinent
wantonness of this licentious liberty.
     The first duty of the sovereign, therefore, that of
defending the society from the violence and injustice of other
independent societies, grows gradually more and more expensive as
the society advances in civilization. The military force of the
society, which originally cost the sovereign no expense either in
time of peace or in time of war, must, in the progress of
improvement, first be maintained by him in time of war, and
afterwards even in time of peace.
     The great change introduced into the art of war by the
invention of firearms has enhanced still further both the expense
of exercising and disciplining any particular number of soldiers
in time of peace, and that of employing them in time of war. Both
their arms and their ammunition are become more expensive. A
musket is a more expensive machine than a javelin or a bow and
arrows; a cannon or a mortar than a balista or a catapulta. The
powder which is spent in a modern review is lost irrecoverably,
and occasions a very considerable expense. The javeline and
arrows which were thrown or shot in an ancient one could easily
be picked up again, and were besides of very little value. The
cannon and the mortar are not only much dearer, but much heavier
machines than the balista or catapulta, and require a greater
expense, not only to prepare them for the field, but to carry
them to it. As the superiority of the modern artillery too over
that of the ancients is very great, it has become much more
difficult, and consequently much more expensive, to fortify a
town so as to resist even for a few weeks the attack of that
superior artillery. In modern times many different causes
contribute to render the defence of the society more expensive.
The unavoidable effects of the natural progress of improvement
have, in this respect, been a good deal enhanced by a great
revolution in the art of war, to which a mere accident, the
invention of gunpowder, seems to have given occasion.
     In modern war the great expense of firearms gives an evident
advantage to the nation which can best afford that expense, and
consequently to an opulent and civilised over a poor and
barbarous nation. In ancient times the opulent and civilised
found it difficult to defend themselves against the poor and
barbarous nations. In modern times the poor and barbarous find it
difficult to defend themselves against the opulent and civilised.
The invention of firearms, an invention which at first sight
appears to be so pernicious, is certainly favourable both to the
permanency and to the extension of civilization.
                             PART 2
                  Of the Expense of Justice 
     THE second duty of the sovereign, that of protecting, as far
as possible, every member of the society from the injustice or
oppression of every other member of it, or the duty of
establishing an exact administration of justice, requires, too,
very different degrees of expense in the different periods of
society.
     Among nations of hunters, as there is scarce any property,
or at least none that exceeds the value of two or three days'
labour, so there is seldom any established magistrate or any
regular administration of justice. Men who have no property can
injure one another only in their persons or reputations. But when
one man kills, wounds, beats, or defames another, though he to
whom the injury is done suffers, he who does it receives no
benefit. It is otherwise with the injuries to property. The
benefit of the person who does the injury is often equal to the
loss of him who suffers it. Envy, malice, or resentment are the
only passions which can prompt one man to injure another in his
person or reputation. But the greater part of men are not very
frequently under the influence of those passions, and the very
worst of men are so only occasionally. As their gratification
too, how agreeable soever it may be to certain characters, is not
attended with any real or permanent advantage, it is in the
greater part of men commonly restrained by prudential
considerations. Men may live together in society with some
tolerable degree of security, though there is no civil magistrate
to protect them from the injustice of those passions. But avarice
and ambition in the rich, in the poor the hatred of labour and
the love of present ease and enjoyment, are the passions which
prompt to invade property, passions much more steady in their
operation, and much more universal in their influence. Wherever
there is great property there is great inequality. For one very
rich man there must be at least five hundred poor, and the
affluence of the few supposes the indigence of the many. The
affluence of the rich excites the indignation of the poor, who
are often both driven by want, and prompted by envy, to invade
his possessions. It is only under the shelter of the civil
magistrate that the owner of that valuable property, which is
acquired by the labour of many years, or perhaps of many
successive generations, can sleep a single night in security. He
is at all times surrounded by unknown enemies, whom, though he
never provoked, he can never appease, and from whose injustice he
can be protected only by the powerful arm of the civil magistrate
continually held up to chastise it. The acquisition of valuable
and extensive property, therefore, necessarily requires the
establishment of civil government. Where there is no property, or
at least none that exceeds the value of two or three days'
labour, civil government is not so necessary.
     Civil government supposes a certain subordination. But as
the necessity of civil government gradually grows up with the
acquisition of valuable property, so the principal causes which
naturally introduce subordination gradually grow up with the
growth of that valuable property.
     The causes or circumstances which naturally introduce
subordination, or which naturally, and antecedent to any civil
institution, give some men some superiority over the greater part
of their brethren, seem to be four in number.
     The first of those causes or circumstances is the
superiority of personal qualifications, of strength, beauty, and
agility of body; of wisdom and virtue, of prudence, justice,
fortitude, and moderation of mind. The qualifications of the
body, unless supported by those of the mind, can give little
authority in any period of society. He is a very strong man, who,
by mere strength of body, can force two weak ones to obey him.
The qualifications of the mind can alone give a very great
authority. They are, however, invisible qualities; always
disputable, and generally disputed. No society, whether barbarous
or civilised, has ever found it convenient to settle the rules of
precedency of rank and subordination according to those invisible
qualities; but according to something that is more plain and
palpable.
     The second of those causes or circumstances is the
superiority of age. An old man, provided his age is not so far
advanced as to give suspicion of dotage, is everywhere more
respected than a young man of equal rank, fortune, and abilities.
Among nations of hunters, such as the native tribes of North
America, age is the sole foundation of rank and precedency. Among
them, father is the appellation of a superior; brother, of an
equal; and son, of an inferior. In the most opulent and civilised
nations, age regulates rank among those who are in every other
respect equal, and among whom, therefore, there is nothing else
to regulate it. Among brothers and among sisters, the eldest
always takes place; and in the succession of the paternal estate
everything which cannot be divided, but must go entire to one
person, such as a title of honour, is in most cases given to the
eldest. Age is a plain and palpable quality which admits of no
dispute.
     The third of those causes or circumstances is the
superiority of fortune. The authority of riches, however, though
great in every age of society, is perhaps greatest in the rudest
age of society which admits of any considerable inequality of
fortune. A Tartar chief, the increase of whose herds and stocks
is sufficient to maintain a thousand men, cannot well employ that
increase in any other way than in maintaining a thousand men. The
rude state of his society does not afford him any manufactured
produce, any trinkets or baubles of any kind, for which he can
exchange that part of his rude produce which is over and above
his own consumption. The thousand men whom he thus maintains,
depending entirely upon him for their subsistence, must both obey
his orders in war, and submit to his jurisdiction in peace. He is
necessarily both their general and their judge, and his
chieftainship is the necessary effect of the superiority of his
fortune. In an opulent and civilised society, a man may possess a
much greater fortune and yet not be able to command a dozen
people. Though the produce of his estate may be sufficient to
maintain, and may perhaps actually maintain, more than a thousand
people, yet as those people pay for everything which they get
from him, as he gives scarce anything to anybody but in exchange
for an equivalent, there is scarce anybody who considers himself
as entirely dependent upon him, and his authority extends only
over a few menial servants. The authority of fortune, however, is
very great even in an opulent and civilised society. That it is
much greater than that either of age or of personal qualities has
been the constant complaint of every period of society which
admitted of any considerable inequality of fortune. The first
period of society, that of hunters, admits of no such inequality.
Universal poverty establishes their universal equality, and the
superiority either of age or of personal qualities are the feeble
but the sole foundations of authority and subordination. There is
therefore little or no authority or subordination in this period
of society. The second period of society, that of shepherds,
admits of very great inequalities of fortune, and there is no
period in which the superiority of fortune gives so great
authority to those who possess it. There is no period accordingly
in which authority and subordination are more perfectly
established. The authority of an Arabian sherif is very great;
that of a Tartar khan altogether despotical.
     The fourth of those causes or circumstances is the
superiority of birth. Superiority of birth supposes an ancient
superiority of fortune in the family of the person who claims it.
All families are equally ancient; and the ancestors of the
prince, though they may be better known, cannot well be more
numerous than those of the beggar. Antiquity of family means
everywhere the antiquity either of wealth, or of that greatness
which is commonly either founded upon wealth, or accompanied with
it. Upstart greatness is everywhere less respected than ancient
greatness. The hatred of usurpers, the love of the family of an
ancient monarch, are, in a great measure, founded upon the
contempt which men naturally have for the former, and upon their
veneration for the latter. As a military officer submits without
reluctance to the authority of a superior by whom he has always
been commanded, but cannot bear that his inferior should be set
over his head, so men easily submit to a family to whom they and
their ancestors have always submitted; but are fired with
indignation when another family, in whom they had never
acknowledged any such superiority, assumes a dominion over them.
     The distinction of birth, being subsequent to the inequality
of fortune, can have no place in nations of hunters, among whom
all men, being equal in fortune, must likewise be very nearly
equal in birth. The son of a wise and brave man may, indeed, even
among them, be somewhat more respected than a man of equal merit
who has the misfortune to be the son of a fool or a coward. The
difference, however, will not be very great; and there never was,
I believe, a great family in the world whose illustration was
entirely derived from the inheritance of wisdom and virtue.
     The distinction of birth not only may, but always does take
place among nations of shepherds. Such nations are always
strangers to every sort of luxury, and great wealth can scarce
ever be dissipated among them by improvident profusion. There are
no nations accordingly who abound more in families revered and
honoured on account of their descent from a long race of great
and illustrious ancestors, because there are no nations among
whom wealth is likely to continue longer in the same families.
     Birth and fortune are evidently the two circumstances which
principally set one man above another. They are the two great
sources of personal distinction, and are therefore the principal
causes which naturally establish authority and subordination
among men. Among nations of shepherds both those causes operate
with their full force. The great shepherd or herdsman, respected
on account of his great wealth, and of the great number of those
who depend upon him for subsistence, and revered on account of
the nobleness of his birth, and of the immemorial antiquity of
his illustrious family, has a natural authority over all the
inferior shepherds or herdsmen of his horde or clan. He can
command the united force of a greater number of people than any
of them. His military power is greater than that of any of them.
In time of war they are all of them naturally disposed to muster
themselves under his banner, rather than under that of any other
person, and his birth and fortune thus naturally procure to him
some sort of executive power. By commanding, too, the united
force of a greater number of people than any of them, he is best
able to compel any one of them who may have injured another to
compensate the wrong. He is the person, therefore, to whom all
those who are too weak to defend themselves naturally look up for
protection. It is to him that they naturally complain of the
injuries which they imagine have been done to them, and his
interposition in such cases is more easily submitted to, even by
the person complained of, than that of any other person would be.
His birth and fortune thus naturally procure him some sort of
judicial authority.
     It is in the age of shepherds, in the second period of
society, that the inequality of fortune first begins to take
place, and introduces among men a degree of authority and
subordination which could not possibly exist before. It thereby
introduces some degree of that civil government which is
indispensably necessary for its own preservation: and it seems to
do this naturally, and even independent of the consideration of
that necessity. The consideration of that necessity comes no
doubt afterwards to contribute very much to maintain and secure
that authority and subordination. The rich, in particular, are
necessarily interested to support that order of things which can
alone secure them in the possession of their own advantages. Men
of inferior wealth combine to defend those of superior wealth in
the possession of their property, in order that men of superior
wealth may combine to defend them in the possession of theirs.
All the inferior shepherds and herdsmen feel that the security of
their own herds and flocks depends upon the security of those of
the great shepherd or herdsman; that the maintenance of their
lesser authority depends upon that of his greater authority, and
that upon their subordination to him depends his power of keeping
their inferiors in subordination to them. They constitute a sort
of little nobility, who feel themselves interested to defend the
property and to support the authority of their own little
sovereign in order that he may be able to defend their property
and to support their authority. Civil government, so far as it is
instituted for the security of property, is in reality instituted
for the defence of the rich against the poor, or of those who
have some property against those who have none at all.
     The judicial authority of such a sovereign, however, far
from being a cause of expense, was for a long time a source of
revenue to him. The persons who applied to him for justice were
always willing to pay for it, and a present never failed to
accompany a petition. After the authority of the sovereign, too,
was thoroughly established, the person found guilty, over and
above the satisfaction which he was obliged to make to the party,
was likewise forced to pay an amercement to the sovereign. He had
given trouble, he had disturbed, he had broke the peace of his
lord the king, and for those offences an amercement was thought
due. In the Tartar governments of Asia, in the governments of
Europe which were founded by the German and Scythian nations who
overturned the Roman empire, the administration of justice was a
considerable source of revenue, both to the sovereign and to all
the lesser chiefs or lords who exercised under him any particular
jurisdiction, either over some particular tribe or clan, or over
some particular territory or district. Originally both the
sovereign and the inferior chiefs used to exercise this
jurisdiction in their own persons. Afterwards they universally
found it convenient to delegate it to some substitute, bailiff,
or judge. This substitute, however, was still obliged to account
to his principal or constituent for the profits of the
jurisdiction. Whoever reads the instructions which were given to
the judges of the circuit in the time of Henry II will see
clearly that those judges were a sort of itinerant factors, sent
round the country for the purpose of levying certain branches of
the king's revenue. In those days the administration of justice
not only afforded a certain revenue to the sovereign, but to
procure this revenue seems to have been one of the principal
advantages which he proposed to obtain by the administration of
justice.
     This scheme of making the administration of justice
subservient to the purposes of revenue could scarce fail to be
productive of several very gross abuses. The person who applied
for justice with a large present in his hand was likely to get
something more than justice; while he who applied for it with a
small one was likely to get something less. Justice, too, might
frequently be delayed in order that this present might be
repeated. The amercement, besides, of the person complained of,
might frequently suggest a very strong reason for finding him in
the wrong, even when he had not really been so. That such abuses
were far from being uncommon the ancient history of every country
in Europe bears witness.
     When the sovereign or chief exercised his judicial authority
in his own person, how much soever he might abuse it, it must
have been scarce possible to get any redress, because there could
seldom be anybody powerful enough to call him to account. When he
exercised it by a bailiff, indeed, redress might sometimes be
had. If it was for his own benefit only that the bailiff had been
guilty of any act of injustice, the sovereign himself might not
always be unwilling to punish him, or to oblige him to repair the
wrong. But if it was for the benefit of his sovereign, if it was
in order to make court to the person who appointed him and who
might prefer him, that he had committed any act of oppression,
redress would upon most occasions be as impossible as if the
sovereign had committed it himself. In all barbarous governments,
accordingly, in all those ancient governments of Europe in
particular which were founded upon the ruins of the Roman empire,
the administration of justice appears for a long time to have
been extremely corrupt, far from being quite equal and impartial
even under the best monarchs, and altogether profligate under the
worst.
     Among nations of shepherds, where the sovereign or chief is
only the greatest shepherd or herdsman of the horde or clan, he
is maintained in the same manner as any of his vassals or
subjects, by the increase of his own herds or flocks. Among those
nations of husbandmen who are but just come out of the shepherd
state, and who are not much advanced beyond that state, such as
the Greek tribes appear to have been about the time of the Trojan
war, and our German and Scythian ancestors when they first
settled upon the ruins of the western empire, the sovereign or
chief is, in the same manner, only the greatest landlord of the
country, and is maintained, in the same manner as any other
landlord, by a revenue derived from his own private estate, or
from what, in modern Europe, was called the demesne of the crown.
His subjects, upon ordinary occasions, contributed nothing to his
support, except when, in order to protect them from the
oppression of some of their fellow-subjects, they stand in need
of his authority. The presents which they make him upon such
occasions constitute the whole ordinary revenue, the whole of the
emoluments which, except perhaps upon some very extraordinary
emergencies, he derives from his dominion over them. When
Agamemnon, in Homer, offers to Achilles for his friendship the
sovereignty of seven Greek cities, the sole advantage which he
mentions as likely to be derived from it was that the people
would honour him with presents. As long as such presents, as long
as the emoluments of justice, or what may be called the fees of
court, constituted in this manner the whole ordinary revenue
which the sovereign derived from his sovereignty, it could not
well be expected, it could not even decently be proposed, that he
should give them up altogether. It might, and it frequently was
proposed, that he should regulate and ascertain them. But after
they had been so regulated and ascertained, how to hinder a
person who was all-powerful from extending them beyond those
regulations was still very difficult, not to say impossible.
During the continuance of this state of things, therefore, the
corruption of justice, naturally resulting from the arbitrary and
uncertain nature of those presents, scarce admitted of any
effectual remedy.
     But when from different causes, chiefly from the continually
increasing expenses of defending the nation against the invasion
of other nations, the private estate of the sovereign had become
altogether insufficient for defraying the expense of the
sovereignty, and when it had become necessary that the people
should, for their own security, contribute towards this expense
by taxes of different kinds, it seems to have been very commonly
stipulated that no present for the administration of justice
should, under any pretence, be accepted either by the sovereign,
or by his bailiffs and substitutes, the judges. Those presents,
it seems to have been supposed, could more easily be abolished
altogether than effectually regulated and ascertained. Fixed
salaries were appointed to the judges, which were supposed to
compensate to them the loss of whatever might have been their
share of the ancient emoluments of justice, as the taxes more
than compensated to the sovereign the loss of his. Justice was
then said to be administered gratis.
     Justice, however, never was in reality administered gratis
in any country. Lawyers and attorneys, at least, must always be
paid by the parties; and, if they were not, they would perform
their duty still worse than they actually perform it. The fees
annually paid to lawyers and attorneys amount, in every court, to
a much greater sum than the salaries of the judges. The
circumstance of those salaries being paid by the crown can
nowhere much diminish the necessary expense of a law-suit. But it
was not so much to diminish the expense, as to prevent the
corruption of justice, that the judges were prohibited from
receiving any present or fee from the parties.
     The office of judge is in itself so very honourable that men
are willing to accept of it, though accompanied with very small
emoluments. The inferior office of justice of peace, though
attended with a good deal of trouble, and in most cases with no
emoluments at all, is an object of ambition to the greater part
of our country gentlemen. The salaries of all the different
judges, high and low, together with the whole expense of the
administration and execution of justice, even where it is not
managed with very good economy, makes, in any civilised country,
but a very inconsiderable part of the whole expense of
government.
     The whole expense of justice, too, might easily be defrayed
by the fees of court; and, without exposing the administration of
justice to any real hazard of corruption, the public revenue
might thus be discharged from a certain, though, perhaps, but a
small incumbrance. It is difficult to regulate the fees of court
effectually where a person so powerful as the sovereign is to
share in them, and to derive any considerable part of his revenue
from them. It is very easy where the judge is the principal
person who can reap any benefit from them. The law can very
easily oblige the judge to respect the regulation, though it
might not always be able to make the sovereign respect it. Where
the fees of court are precisely regulated and ascertained, where
they are paid all at once, at a certain period of every process,
into the hands of a cashier or receiver, to be by him distributed
in certain known proportions among the different judges after the
process is decided, and not till it is decided, there seems to be
no more danger of corruption than where such fees are prohibited
altogether. Those fees, without occasioning any considerable
increase in the expense of a lawsuit, might be rendered fully
sufficient for defraying the whole expense of justice. By not
being paid to the judges till the process was determined, they
might be some incitement to the diligence of the court in
examining and deciding it. In courts which consisted of a
considerable number of judges, by proportioning the share of each
judge to the number of hours and days which he had employed in
examining the process, either in the court or in a committee by
order of the court, those fees might give some encouragement to
the diligence of each particular judge. Public services are never
better performed than when their reward comes only in consequence
of their being performed, and is proportioned to the diligence
employed in performing them. In the different parliaments of
France, the fees of court (called epices and vacations)
constitute the far greater part of the emoluments of the judges.
After all deductions are made, the net salary paid by the crown
to a counsellor or judge in the Parliament of Toulouse, in rank
and dignity the second parliament of the kingdom, amounts only to
a hundred and fifty livres, about six pounds eleven shillings
sterling a year. About seven years ago that sum was in the same
place the ordinary yearly wages of a common footman. The
distribution of those epices, too, is according to the diligence
of the judges. A diligent judge gains a comfortable, though
moderate, revenue by his office: an idle one gets little more
than his salary. Those Parliaments are perhaps, in many respects,
not very convenient courts of justice; but they have never been
accused, they seem never even to have been suspected, of
corruption.
     The fees of court seem originally to have been the principal
support of the different courts of justice in England. Each court
endeavoured to draw to itself as much business as it could, and
was, upon that account, willing to take cognisance of many suits
which were not originally intended to fall under its
jurisdiction. The Court of King's Bench, instituted for the trial
of criminal causes only, took cognisance of civil suits; the
plaintiff pretending that the defendant, in not doing him
justice, had been guilty of some trespass or misdemeanour. The
Court of Exchequer, instituted for the levying of the king's
revenue, and for enforcing the payment of such debts only as were
due to the king, took cognisance of all other contract debts; the
plaintiff alleging that he could not pay the king because the
defendant would not pay him. In consequence of such fictions it
came, in many cases, to depend altogether upon the parties before
what court they would choose to have their cause tried; and each
court endeavoured, by superior dispatch and impartiality, to draw
to itself as many causes as it could. The present admirable
constitution of the courts of justice in England was, perhaps,
originally in a great measure formed by this emulation which
anciently took place between their respective judges; each judge
endeavouring to give, in his own court, the speediest and most
effectual remedy which the law would admit for every sort of
injustice. Originally the courts of law gave damages only for
breach of contract. The Court of Chancery, as a court of
conscience, first took upon it to enforce the specific
performance of agreements. When the breach of contract consisted
in the non-payment of money, the damage sustained could be
compensated in no other way than by ordering payment, which was
equivalent to a specific performance of the agreement. In such
cases, therefore, the remedy of the courts of law was sufficient.
It was not so in others. When the tenant sued his lord for having
unjustly outed him of his lease, the damages which he recovered
were by no means equivalent to the possession of the land. Such
causes, therefore, for some time, went all to the Court of
Chancery, to the no small loss of the courts of law. It was to
draw back such causes to themselves that the courts of law are
said to have invented the artificial and fictitious Writ of
Ejectment, the most effectual remedy for an unjust outer or
dispossession of land.
     A stamp-duty upon the law proceedings of each particular
court, to be levied by that court, and applied towards the
maintenance of the judges and other officers belonging to it,
might, in the same manner, afford revenue sufficient for
defraying the expense of the administration of justice, without
bringing any burden upon the general revenue of the society. The
judges indeed might, in this case, be under the temptation of
multiplying unnecessarily the proceedings upon every cause, in
order to increase, as much as possible, the produce of such a
stamp-duty. It has been the custom in modern Europe to regulate,
upon most occasions, the payment of the attorneys and clerks of
court according to the number of pages which they had occasion to
write; the court, however, requiring that each page should
contain so many lines, and each line so many words. In order to
increase their payment, the attorneys and clerks have contrived
to multiply words beyond all necessity, to the corruption of the
law language of, I believe, every court of justice in Europe. A
like temptation might perhaps occasion a like corruption in the
form of law proceedings.
     But whether the administration of justice be so contrived as
to defray its own expense, or whether the judges be maintained by
fixed salaries paid to them from some other fund, it does not
seem necessary that the person or persons entrusted with the
executive power should be charged with the management of that
fund, or with the payment of those salaries. That fund might
arise from the rent of landed estates, the management of each
estate being entrusted to the particular court which was to be
maintained by it. That fund might arise even from the interest of
a sum of money, the lending out of which might, in the same
manner, be entrusted to the court which was to be maintained by
it. A part, though indeed but a small part, of the salary of the
judges of the Court of Session in Scotland arises from the
interest of a sum of money. The necessary instability of such a
fund seems, however, to render it an improper one for the
maintenance of an institution which ought to last for ever.
     The separation of the judicial from the executive power
seems originally to have arisen from the increasing business of
the society, in consequence of its increasing improvement. The
administration of justice became so laborious and so complicated
a duty as to require the undivided attention of the persons to
whom it was entrusted. The person entrusted with the executive
power not having leisure to attend to the decision of private
causes himself, a deputy was appointed to decide them in his
stead. In the progress of the Roman greatness, the consul was too
much occupied with the political affairs of the state to attend
to the administration of justice. A praetor, therefore, was
appointed to administer it in his stead. In the progress of the
European monarchies which were founded upon the ruins of the
Roman empire, the sovereigns and the great lords came universally
to consider the administration of justice as an office both too
laborious and too ignoble for them to execute in their own
persons. They universally, therefore, discharged themselves of it
by appointing a deputy, bailiff, or judge.
     When the judicial is united to the executive power, it is
scarce possible that justice should not frequently be sacrificed
to what is vulgarly called polities. The persons entrusted with
the great interests of the state may, even without any corrupt
views, sometimes imagine it necessary to sacrifice to those
interests the rights of a private man. But upon the impartial
administration of justice depends the liberty of every
individual, the sense which he has of his own security. In order
to make every individual feel himself perfectly secure in the
possession of every right which belongs to him, it is not only
necessary that the judicial should be separated from the
executive power, but that it should be rendered as much as
possible independent of that power. The judge should not be
liable to be removed from his office according to the caprice of
that power. The regular the good-will or even upon the good
economy payment of his salary should not depend upon of that
power.
                             PART 3
       Of the Expense of Public Works and Public Institutions 
     THE third and last duty of the sovereign or commonwealth is
that of erecting and maintaining those public institutions and
those public works, which, though they may be in the highest
degree advantageous to a great society, are, however, of such a
nature that the profit could never repay the expense to any
individual or small number of individuals, and which it therefore
cannot be expected that any individual or small number of
individuals should erect or maintain. The performance of this
duty requires, too, very different degrees of expense in the
different periods of society.
     After the public institutions and public works necessary for
the defence of the society, and for the administration of
justice, both of which have already been mentioned, the other
works and institutions of this kind are chiefly those for
facilitating the commerce of the society, and those for promoting
the instruction of the people. The institutions for instruction
are of two kinds: those for the education of youth, and those for
the instruction of people of all ages. The consideration of the
manner in which the expense of those different sorts of public,
works and institutions may be most properly defrayed will divide
this third part of the present chapter into three different
articles.  
                            ARTICLE 1
      Of the Public Works and Institutions for facilitating the
                     Commerce of the Society
      And, first, of those which are necessary for facilitating
                       Commerce in general. 
     That the erection and maintenance of the public works which
facilitate the commerce of any country, such as good roads,
bridges, navigable canals, harbours, etc., must require very
different degrees of expense in the different periods of society
is evident without any proof. The expense of making and
maintaining the public roads of any country must evidently
increase with the annual produce of the land and labour of that
country, or with the quantity and weight of the goods which it
becomes necessary to fetch and carry upon those roads. The
strength of a bridge must be suited to the number and weight of
the carriages which are likely to pass over it. The depth and the
supply of water for a navigable canal must be proportioned to the
number and tonnage of the lighters which are likely to carry
goods upon it; the extent of a harbour to the number of the
shipping which are likely to take shelter in it.
     It does not seem necessary that the expense of those public
works should be defrayed from that public revenue, as it is
commonly called, of which the collection and application is in
most countries assigned to the executive power. The greater part
of such public works may easily be so managed as to afford a
particular revenue sufficient for defraying their own expense,
without bringing any burden upon the general revenue of the
society.
     A highway, a bridge, a navigable canal, for example, may in
most cases be both made and maintained by a small toll upon the
carriages which make use of them: a harbour, by a moderate
port-duty upon the tonnage of the shipping which load or unload
in it. The coinage, another institution for facilitating
commerce, in many countries, not only defrays its own expense,
but affords a small revenue or seignorage to the sovereign. The
post-office, another institution for the same purpose, over and
above defraying its own expense, affords in almost all countries
a very considerable revenue to the sovereign.
     When the carriages which pass over a highway or a bridge,
and the lighters which sail upon a navigable canal, pay toll in
proportion to their weight or their tonnage, they pay for the
maintenance of those public works exactly in proportion to the
wear and tear which they occasion of them. It seems scarce
possible to invent a more equitable way of maintaining such
works. This tax or toll too, though it is advanced by the
carrier, is finally paid by the consumer, to whom it must always
be charged in the price of the goods. As the expense of carriage,
however, is very much reduced by means of such public works, the
goods, notwithstanding the toll come cheaper to the consumer than
the; could otherwise have done; their price not being so much
raised by the toll as it is lowered by the cheapness of the
carriage. The person who finally pays this tax, therefore, gains
by the application more than he loses by the payment of it. His
payment is exactly in proportion to his gain. It is in reality no
more than a part of that gain which he is obliged to give up in
order to get the rest. It seems impossible to imagine a more
equitable method of raising a tax.
     When the toll upon carriages of luxury upon coaches,
post-chaises, etc., is made somewhat higher in proportion to
their weight than upon carriages of necessary use, such as carts,
waggons, etc., the indolence and vanity of the rich is made to
contribute in a very easy manner to the relief of the poor, by
rendering cheaper the transportation of heavy goods to all the
different parts of the country.
     When high roads, bridges, canals, etc., are in this manner
made and supported by the commerce which is carried on by means
of them, they can be made only where that commerce requires them,
and consequently where it is proper to make them. Their expenses
too, their grandeur and magnificence, must be suited to what that
commerce can afford to pay. They must be made consequently as it
is proper to make them. A magnificent high road cannot be made
through a desert country where there is little or no commerce, or
merely because it happens to lead to the country villa of the
intendant of the province, or to that of some great lord to whom
the intendant finds it convenient to make his court. A great
bridge cannot be thrown over a river at a place where nobody
passes, or merely to embellish the view from the windows of a
neighbouring palace: things which sometimes happen in countries
where works of this kind are carried on by any other revenue than
that which they themselves are capable of affording.
     In several different parts of Europe the ton or lock-duty
upon a canal is the property of private persons, whose private
interest obliges them to keep up the canal. If it is not kept in
tolerable order, the navigation necessarily ceases altogether,
and along with it the whole profit which they can make by the
tolls. If those tolls were put under the management of
commissioners, who had themselves no interest in them, they might
be less attentive to the maintenance of the works which produced
them. The canal of Languedoc cost the King of France and the
province upwards of thirteen millions of livres, which (at
twenty-eight livres the mark of silver, the value of French money
in the end of the last century) amounted to upwards of nine
hundred thousand pounds sterling. When that great work was
finished, the most likely method, it was found, of keeping it in
constant repair was to make a present of the tolls to Riquet the
engineer, who planned and conducted the work. Those tolls
constitute at present a very large estate to the different
branches of the family of that gentleman, who have, therefore, a
great interest to keep the work in constant repair. But had those
tolls been put under the management of commissioners, who had no
such interest, they might perhaps have been dissipated in
ornamental and unnecessary expenses, while the most essential
parts of the work were allowed to go to ruin.
     The tolls for the maintenance of a high road cannot with any
safety be made the property of private persons. A high road,
though entirely neglected, does not become altogether impassable,
though a canal does. The proprietors of the tolls upon a high
road, therefore, might neglect altogether the repair of the road,
and yet continue to levy very nearly the same tolls. It is
proper, therefore, that the tolls for the maintenance of such a
work should be put under the management of commissioners or
trustees.
     In Great Britain, the abuses which the trustees have
committed in the management of those tolls have in many cases
been very justly complained of. At many turnpikes, it has been
said, the money levied is more than double of what is necessary
for executing, in the completest manner, the work which is often
executed in very slovenly manner, and sometimes not executed at
all. The system of repairing the high roads by tolls of this
kind, it must be observed, is not of very long standing. We
should not wonder, therefore, if it has not yet been brought to
that degree of perfection of which it seems capable. If mean and
improper persons are frequently appointed trustees, and if proper
courts of inspection and account have not yet been established
for controlling their conduct, and for reducing the tolls to what
is barely sufficient for executing the work to be done by them,
the recency of the institution both accounts and apologizes for
those defects, of which, by the wisdom of Parliament, the greater
part may in due time be gradually remedied.
     The money levied at the different turnpikes in Great Britain
is supposed to exceed so much what is necessary for repairing the
roads, that the savings, which, with proper economy, might be
made from it, have been considered, even by some ministers, as a
very great resource which might at some time or another be
applied to the exigencies of the state. Government, it has been
said, by taking the management of the turnpikes into its own
hands, and by employing the soldiers, who would work for a very
small addition to their pay, could keep the roads in good order
at a much less expense than it can be done by trustees, who have
no other workmen to employ but such as derive their whole
subsistence from their wages. A great revenue, half a million
perhaps,* it has been pretended, might in this manner be gained
without laying any new burden upon the people; and the turnpike
roads might be made to contribute to the general expense of the
state, in the same manner as the post office does at present.   
* Since publishing the two first editions of this book, I have
got good reasons to believe that all the turnpike tolls levied in
Great Britain do not produce a net revenue that amounts to half a
million; a sum which, under the management of Government, would
not be sufficient to keep in repair five of the principal roads
in the kingdom. 
     That a considerable revenue might be gained in this manner I
have no doubt, though probably not near so much as the projectors
of this plan have supposed. The plan itself, however, seems
liable to several very important objections.
     First, if the tolls which are levied at the turnpikes should
ever be considered as one of the resources for supplying the
exigencies of the state, they would certainly be augmented as
those exigencies were supposed to require. According to the
policy of Great Britain, therefore, they would probably be
augmented very fast. The facility with which a great revenue
could be drawn from them would probably encourage administration
to recur very frequently to this resource. Though it may,
perhaps, be more than doubtful whether half a million could by
any economy be saved out of the present tolls, it can scarce be
doubted but that a million might be saved out of them if they
were doubled: and perhaps two millions if they were tripled.*
This great revenue, too, might be levied without the appointment
of a single new officer to collect and receive it. But the
turnpike tolls being continually augmented in this manner,
instead of facilitating the inland commerce of the country as at
present, would soon become a very great incumbrance upon it. The
expense of transporting all heavy goods from one part of the
country to another would soon be so much increased, the market
for all such goods, consequently, would soon be so much narrowed,
that their production would be in a great measure discouraged,
and the most important branches of the domestic industry of the
country annihilated altogether.    * I have now good reasons to
believe that all these conjectural sums are by much too large. 
     Secondly, a tax upon carriages in proportion to their
weight, though a very equal tax when applied to the sole purpose
of repairing the roads, is a very unequal one when applied to any
other purpose, or to supply the common exigencies of the state.
When it is applied to the sole purpose above mentioned, each
carriage is supposed to pay exactly for the wear and tear which
that carriage occasions of the roads. But when it is applied to
any other purpose, each carriage is supposed to pay for more than
that wear and tear, and contributes to the supply of some other
exigency of the state. But as the turnpike toll raises the price
of goods in proportion to their weight, and not to their value,
it is chiefly paid by the consumers of coarse and bulky, not by
those of precious and light, commodities. Whatever exigency of
the state therefore this tax might be intended to supply, that
exigency would be chiefly supplied at the expense of the poor,
not the rich; at the expense of those who are least able to
supply it, not of those who are most able.
     Thirdly, if government should at any time neglect the
reparation of the high roads, it would be still more difficult
than it is at present to compel the proper application of any
part of the turnpike tolls. A large revenue might thus be levied
upon the people without any part of it being applied to the only
purpose to which a revenue levied in this manner ought ever to be
applied. If the meanness and poverty of the trustees of turnpike
roads render it sometimes difficult at present to oblige them to
repair their wrong, their wealth and greatness would render it
ten times more so in the case which is here supposed.
     In France, the funds destined for the reparation of high
roads are under the immediate direction of the executive power.
Those funds consist partly in a certain number of days' labour
which the country people are in most parts of Europe obliged to
give to the reparation of the highways, and partly in such a
portion of the general revenue of the state as the king chooses
to spare from his other expenses.
     By the ancient law of France, as well as by that of most
other parts of Europe, the labour of the country people was under
the direction of a local or provincial magistracy, which had no
immediate dependency upon the king's council. But by the present
practice both the labour of the people, and whatever other fund
the king may choose to assign for the reparation of the high
roads in any particular province or generality, are entirely
under the management of the intendant; an officer who is
appointed and removed by the king's council, and who receives his
orders from it, and is in constant correspondence with it. In the
progress of despotism the authority of the executive power
gradually absorbs that of every other power in the state, and
assumes to itself the management of every branch of revenue which
is destined for any public purpose. In France, however, the great
post-roads, the roads which make the communication between the
principal towns of the kingdom, are in general kept in good
order, and in some provinces are even a good deal superior to the
greater part of the turnpike roads of England. But what we call
the cross-roads, that is, the far greater part of the roads in
the country, are entirely neglected, and are in many places
absolutely impassable for any heavy carriage. In some places it
is even dangerous to travel on horseback, and mules are the only
conveyances which can safely be trusted. The proud minister of an
ostentatious court may frequently take pleasure in executing a
work of splendour and magnificence, such as a great highway,
which is frequently seen by the principal nobility, whose
applauses not only flatter his vanity, but even contribute to
support his interest at court. But to execute a great number of
little works, in which nothing that can be done can make any
great appearance, or excite the smallest degree of admiration in
any traveller, and which, in short, have nothing to recommend
them but their extreme utility, is a business which appears in
every respect too mean and paltry to merit the attention of so
great a magistrate. Under such an administration, therefore, such
works are almost always entirely neglected.
     In China, and in several other governments of Asia, the
executive power charges itself both with the reparation of the
high roads and with the maintenance of the navigable canals. In
the instructions which are given to the governor of each
province, those objects, it is said, are constantly recommended
to him, and the judgment which the court forms of his conduct is
very much regulated by the attention which he appears to have
paid to this part of his instructions. This branch of public
police accordingly is said to be very much attended to in all
those countries, but particularly in China, where the high roads,
and still more the navigable canals, it is pretended, exceed very
much everything of the same kind which is known in Europe. The
accounts of those works, however, which have been transmitted to
Europe, have generally been drawn up by weak and wondering
travellers; frequently by stupid and lying missionaries. If they
had been examined by more intelligent eyes, and if the accounts
of them had been reported by more faithful witnesses, they would
not, perhaps, appear to be so wonderful. The account which
Bernier gives of some works of this kind in Indostan falls very
much short of what had been reported of them by other travellers,
more disposed to the marvellous than he was. It may too, perhaps,
be in those countries, as in France, where the great roads, the
great communications which are likely to be the subjects of
conversation at the court and in the capital, are attended to,
and all the rest neglected. In China, besides, in Indostan, and
in several other governments of Asia, the revenue of the
sovereign arises almost altogether from a land tax or land rent,
which rises or falls with the rise and fall of the annual produce
of the land. The great interest of the sovereign, therefore, his
revenue, is in such countries necessarily and immediately
connected with the cultivation of the land, with the greatness of
its produce, and with the value of its produce. But in order to
render that produce both as great and as valuable as possible, it
is necessary to procure to it as extensive a market as possible,
and consequently to establish the freest, the easiest, and the
least expensive communication between all the different parts of
the country; which can be done only by means of the best roads
and the best navigable canals. But the revenue of the sovereign
does not, in any part of Europe, arise chiefly from a land tax or
land rent. In all the great kingdoms of Europe, perhaps, the
greater part of it may ultimately depend upon the produce of the
land: but that dependency is neither so immediate, nor so
evident. In Europe, therefore, the sovereign does not feel
himself so directly called upon to promote the increase, both in
quantity and value, of the produce of the land, or, by
maintaining good roads and canals, to provide the most extensive
market for that produce. Though it should be true, therefore,
what I apprehend is not a little doubtful, that in some parts of
Asia this department of the public police is very properly
managed by the executive power, there is not the least
probability that, during the present state of things, it could be
tolerably managed by that power in any part of Europe.
     Even those public works which are of such a nature that they
cannot afford any revenue for maintaining themselves, but of
which the conveniency is nearly confined to some particular place
or district, are always better maintained by a local or
provincial revenue, under the management of a local or provincial
administration, than by the general revenue of the state, of
which the executive power must always have the management. Were
the streets of London to be lighted and paved at the expense of
the treasury, is there any probability that they would be so well
lighted and paved as they are at present, or even at so small an
expense? The expense, besides, instead of being raised by a local
tax upon the inhabitants of each particular street, parish, or
district in London, would, in this case, be defrayed out of the
general revenue of the state, and would consequently be raised by
a tax upon all the inhabitants of the kingdom, of whom the
greater part derive no sort of benefit from the lighting and
paving of the streets of London.
     The abuses which sometimes creep into the local and
provincial administration of a local and provincial revenue, how
enormous soever they may appear, are in reality, however, almost
always very trifling in comparison of those which commonly take
place in the administration and expenditure of the revenue of a
great empire. They are, besides, much more easily corrected.
Under the local or provincial administration of the justices of
the peace in Great Britain, the six days' labour which the
country people are obliged to give to the reparation of the
highways is not always perhaps very judiciously applied, but it
is scarce ever exacted with any circumstances of cruelty or
oppression. In France, under the administration of the
intendants, the application is not always more judicious, and the
exaction is frequently the most cruel and oppressive. Such
Corvees, as they are called, make one of the principal
instruments of tyranny by which those officers chastise any
parish or communaute which has had the misfortune to fall under
their displeasure. 
     Of the Public Works and Institutions which are necessary for
            facilitating particular Branches of Commerce. 
     The object of the public works and institutions above
mentioned is to facilitate commerce in general. But in order to
facilitate some particular branches of it, particular
institutions are necessary, which again require a particular and
extraordinary expense.
     Some particular branches of commerce, which are carried on
with barbarous and uncivilised nations, require extraordinary
protection. An ordinary store or counting-house could give little
security to the goods of the merchants who trade to the western
coast of Africa. To defend them from the barbarous natives, it is
necessary that the place where they are deposited should be, in
some measure, fortified. The disorders in the government of
Indostan have been supposed to render a like precaution necessary
even among that mild and gentle people; and it was under pretence
of securing their persons and property from violence that both
the English and French East India Companies were allowed to erect
the first forts which they possessed in that country. Among other
nations, whose vigorous government will suffer no strangers to
possess any fortified place within their territory, it may be
necessary to maintain some ambassador, minister, or counsel, who
may both decide, according to their own customs, the differences
arising among his own countrymen, and, in their disputes with the
natives, may, by means of his public character, interfere with
more authority, and afford them a more powerful protection, than
they could expect from any private man. The interests of commerce
have frequently made it necessary to maintain ministers in
foreign countries where the purposes, either of war or alliance,
would not have required any. The commerce of the Turkey Company
first occasioned the establishment of an ordinary ambassador at
Constantinople. The first English embassies to Russia arose
altogether from commercial interests. The constant interference
which those interests necessarily occasioned between the subjects
of the different states of Europe, has probably introduced the
custom of keeping, in all neighbouring countries, ambassadors or
ministers constantly resident even in the time of peace. This
custom, unknown to ancient times, seems not to be older than the
end of the fifteenth or beginning of the sixteenth century; that
is, than the time when commerce first began to extend itself to
the greater part of the nations of Europe, and when they first
began to attend to its interests.
     It seems not unreasonable that the extraordinary expense
which the protection of any particular branch of commerce may
occasion should be defrayed by a moderate tax upon that
particular branch; by a moderate fine, for example, to be paid by
the traders when they first enter into it, or, what is more
equal, by a particular duty of so much per cent upon the goods
which they either import into, or export out of, the particular
countries with which it is carried on. The protection of trade in
general, from pirates and freebooters, is said to have given
occasion to the first institution of the duties of customs. But,
if it was thought reasonable to lay a general tax upon trade, in
order to defray the expense of protecting trade in general, it
should seem equally reasonable to lay a particular tax upon a
particular branch of trade, in order to defray the extraordinary
expense of protecting that branch.
     The protection of trade in general has always been
considered as essential to the defence of the commonwealth, and,
upon that account, a necessary part of the duty of the executive
power. The collection and application of the general duties of
customs, therefore, have always been left to that power. But the
protection of any particular branch of trade is a part of the
general protection of trade; a part, therefore, of the duty of
that power; and if nations always acted consistently, the
particular duties levied for the purposes of such particular
protection should always have been left equally to its disposal.
But in this respect, as well as in many others, nations have not
always acted consistently; and in the greater part of the
commercial states of Europe, particular companies of merchants
have had the address to persuade the legislature to entrust to
them the performance of this part of the duty of the sovereign,
together with all the powers which are necessarily connected with
it.
     These companies, though they may, perhaps, have been useful
for the first introduction of some branches of commerce, by
making, at their own expense, an experiment which the state might
not think it prudent to make, have in the long run proved,
universally, either burdensome or useless, and have either
mismanaged or confined the trade.
     When those companies do not trade upon a joint stock, but
are obliged to admit any person, properly qualified, upon paying
a certain fine, and agreeing to submit to the regulations of the
company, each member trading upon his own stock, and at his own
risk, they are called regulated companies. When they trade upon a
joint stock, each member sharing in the common profit or loss in
proportion to his share in this stock, they are called joint
stock companies. Such companies, whether regulated or joint
stock, sometimes have, and sometimes have not, exclusive
privileges.
     Regulated companies resemble, in every respect, the
corporations of trades so common in the cities and towns of all
the different countries of Europe, and are a sort of enlarged
monopolies of the same kind. As no inhabitant of a town can
exercise an incorporated trade without first obtaining his
freedom in the corporation, so in most cases no subject of the
state can lawfully carry on any branch of foreign trade, for
which a regulated company is established, without first becoming
a member of that company. The monopoly is more or less strict
according as the terms of admission are more or less difficult;
and according as the directors of the company have more or less
authority, or have it more or less in their power to manage in
such a manner as to confine the greater part of the trade to
themselves and their particular friends. In the most ancient
regulated companies the privileges of apprenticeship were the
same as in other corporations, and entitled the person who had
served his time to a member of the company to become himself a
member, either without paying any fine, or upon paying a much
smaller one than what was exacted of other people. The usual
corporation spirit, wherever the law does not restrain it,
prevails in all regulated companies. When they have been allowed
to act according to their natural genius, they have always, in
order to confine the competition to as small a number of persons
as possible, endeavoured to subject the trade to many burden some
regulations. When the law has restrained them from doing this,
they have become altogether useless and insignificant.
     The regulated companies for foreign commerce which at
present subsist in Great Britain are the ancient merchant
adventurers' company, now commonly called the Hamburg Company,
the Russia Company, the Eastland Company, the Turkey Company, and
the African Company.
     The terms of admission into the Hamburg Company are now said
to be quite easy, and the directors either have it not their
power to subject the trade to any burdensome restraint or
regulations, or, at least, have not of late exercised that power.
It has not always been so. About the middle of the last century,
the fine for admission was fifty, and at one time one hundred
pounds, and the conduct of the company was said to be extremely
oppressive. In 1643, in 1645, and in 1661, the clothiers and free
traders of the West of England complained of them to Parliament
as of monopolists who confined the trade and oppressed the
manufactures of the country. Though those complaints produced an
Act of Parliament, they had probably intimidated the company so
far as to oblige them to reform their conduct. Since that time,
at least, there has been no complaints against them. By the 10th
and 11th of William III, c. 6, the fine for admission into the
Russia Company was reduced to five pounds; and by the 25th of
Charles II, c. 7, that for admission into the Eastland Company to
forty shillings, while, at the same time, Sweden, Denmark, and
Norway, all the countries on the north side of the Baltic, were
exempted from their exclusive charter. The conduct of those
companies had probably given occasion to those two Acts of
Parliament. Before that time, Sir Josiah Child had represented
both these and the Hamburg Company as extremely oppressive, and
imputed to their bad management the low state of the trade which
we at that time carried on to the countries comprehended within
their respective charters. But though such companies may not, in
the present times, be very oppressive, they are certainly
altogether useless. To be merely useless, indeed, is perhaps the
highest eulogy which can ever justly be bestowed upon a regulated
company; and all the three companies above mentioned seem, in
their present state, to deserve this eulogy.
     The fine for admission into the Turkey Company was formerly
twenty-five pounds for all persons under twenty-six years of age,
and fifty pounds for all persons above that age. Nobody but mere
merchants could be admitted; a restriction which excluded all
shopkeepers and retailers. By a bye-law, no British manufactures
could be exported to Turkey but in the general ships of the
company; and as those ships sailed always from the port of
London, this restriction confined the trade to that expensive
port, and the traders to those who lived in London and in its
neighbourhood. By another bye-law, no person living within twenty
miles of London, and not free of the city, could be admitted a
member; another restriction which, joined to the foregoing,
necessarily excluded all but the freemen of London. As the time
for the loading and sailing of those general ships depended
altogether upon the directors, they could easily fill them with
their own goods and those of their particular friends, to the
exclusion of others, who, they might pretend, had made their
proposals too late. In this state of things, therefore, this
company was in every respect a strict and oppressive monopoly.
Those abuses gave occasion to the act of the 26th of George II,
c. 18, reducing the fine for admission to twenty pounds for all
persons, without any distinction of ages, or any restriction,
either to mere merchants, or to the freemen of London; and
granting to all such persons the liberty of exporting, from all
the ports of Great Britain to any port in Turkey, all British
goods of which the exportation was not prohibited; and of
importing from thence all Turkish goods of which the importation
was not prohibited, upon paying both the general duties of
customs, and the particular duties assessed for defraying the
necessary expenses of the company; and submitting, at the same
time, to the lawful authority of the British ambassador and
consuls resident in Turkey, and to the bye laws of the company
duly enacted. To prevent any oppression by those bye-laws, it was
by the same act ordained, that if any seven members of the
company conceived themselves aggrieved by any bye-law which
should be enacted after the passing of this act, they might
appeal to the Board of Trade and Plantations (to the authority of
which a committee of the Privy Council has now succeeded),
provided such appeal was brought within twelve months after the
bye-law was enacted; and that if any seven members conceived
themselves aggrieved by any bye-law which had been enacted before
the passing of this act, they might bring a like appeal, provided
it was within twelve months after the day on which this act was
to take place. The experience of one year, however, may not
always be sufficient to discover to all the members of a great
company, the pernicious tendency of a particular bye-law; and if
several of them should afterwards discover it, neither the Board
of Trade, nor the committee of council, can afford them any
redress. The object, besides, of the greater part of the bye-laws
of all regulated companies, as well as of all other corporations,
is not so much to oppress those who are already members, as to
discourage others from becoming so; which may be done, not only
by a high fine, but by many other contrivances. The constant view
of such companies is always to raise the rate of their own profit
as high as they can; to keep the market, both for the goods which
they export, and for those which they import, as much
understocked as they can: which can be done only by restraining
the competition, or by discouraging new adventurers from entering
into the trade. A fine even of twenty pounds, besides, though it
may not perhaps be sufficient to discourage any man from entering
into the Turkey trade with an intention to continue in it, may be
enough to discourage a speculative merchant from hazarding a
single adventure in it. In all trades, the regular established
traders, even though not incorporated, naturally combine to raise
profits, which are noway so likely to be kept, at all times, down
to their proper level, as by the occasional competition of
speculative adventure. The Turkey trade, though in some measure
laid open by this Act of Parliament, is still considered by many
people as very far from being altogether free. The Turkey Company
contribute to maintain an ambassador and two or three consuls,
who, like other public ministers, ought to be maintained
altogether by the state, and the trade laid open to all his
Majesty's subjects. The different taxes levied by the company,
for this and other corporation purposes, might afford avenue much
more than sufficient to enable the state to maintain such
ministers.
     Regulated companies, it was observed by Sir Josiah Child,
though they had frequently supported public ministers, had never
maintained any forts or garrisons in the countries to which they
traded; whereas joint stock companies frequently had. And in
reality the former seem to be much more unfit for this sort of
service than the latter. First, the directors of a regulated
company have no particular interest in the prosperity of the
general trade of the company for the sake of which such forts and
garrisons are maintained. The decay of that general trade may
even frequently contribute to the advantage of their own private
trade; as by diminishing the number of their competitors it may
enable them both to buy cheaper, and to sell dearer. The
directors of a joint stock company, on the contrary, having only
their share in the profits which are made upon the common stock
committed to their management, have no private trade of their own
of which the interest can be separated from that of the general
trade of the company. Their private interest is connected with
the prosperity of the general trade of the company, and with the
maintenance of the forts and garrisons which are necessary for
its defence. They are more likely, therefore, to have that
continual and careful attention which that maintenance
necessarily requires. Secondly, the directors of a joint stock
company have always the management of a large capital, the joint
stock of the company, a part of which they may frequently employ,
with propriety, in building, repairing, and maintaining such
necessary forts and garrisons. But the directors of a regulated
company, having the management of no common capital, have no
other fund to employ in this way but the casual revenue arising
from the admission fines, and from the corporation duties imposed
upon the trade of the company. Though they had the same interest,
therefore, to attend to the maintenance of such forts and
garrisons, they can seldom have the same ability to render that
attention effectual. The maintenance of a public minister
requiring scarce any attention, and but a moderate and limited
expense, is a business much more suitable both to the temper and
abilities of a regulated company.
     Long after the time of Sir Josiah Child, however, in 1750, a
regulated company was established, the present company of
merchants trading to Africa, which was expressly charged at first
with the maintenance of all the British forts and garrisons that
lie between Cape Blanc and the Cape of Good Hope, and afterwards
with that of those only which lie between Cape Rouge and the Cape
of Good Hope. The act which establishes this company (the 23rd of
George II, c. 3) seems to have had two distinct objects in view;
first, to restrain effectually the oppressive and monopolizing
spirit which is natural to the directors of a regulated company;
and secondly, to force them, as much as possible, to give an
attention, which is not natural to them, towards the maintenance
of forts and garrisons.
     For the first of these purposes the fine for admission is
limited to forty shillings. The company is prohibited from
trading in their corporate capacity, or upon a joint stock; from
borrowing money upon common seal, or from laying any restraints
upon the trade which may be carried on freely from all places,
and by all persons being British subjects, and paying the fine.
The government is in a committee of nine persons who meet at
London, but who are chosen annually by the freemen of the company
at London, Bristol, and Liverpool; three from each place. No
committee-man can be continued in office for more than three
years together. Any committee-man might be removed by the Board
of Trade and Plantations, now by a committee council, after being
heard in his own defence. The committee are forbid to export
negroes from Africa, or to import any African goods into Great
Britain. But as they are charged with the maintenance of forts
and garrisons, they may, for that purpose, export from Great
Britain to Africa goods and stores of different kinds. Out of the
monies which they shall receive from the company, they are
allowed a sum not exceeding eight hundred pounds for the salaries
of their clerks and agents at London, Bristol, and Liverpool, the
house rent of their office at London, and all other expenses of
management, commission, and agency in England. What remains of
this sum, after defraying these different expenses, they may
divide among themselves, as compensation for their trouble, in
what manner they think proper. By this constitution, it might
have been expected that the spirit of monopoly would have been
effectually restrained, and the first of these purposes
sufficiently answered. It would seem, however, that it had not.
Though by the 4th of George III, c. 20, the fort of Senegal, with
all its dependencies, had been vested in the company of merchants
trading to Africa, yet in the year following (by the 5th of
George III, c. 44) not only Senegal and its dependencies, but the
whole coast from the port of Sallee, in south Barbary, to Cape
Rouge, was exempted from the jurisdiction of that company, was
vested in the crown, and the trade to it declared free to all his
Majesty's subjects. The company had been suspected of restraining
the trade, and of establishing some sort of improper monopoly. It
is not, however, very easy to conceive how, under the regulations
of the 23rd of George II, they could do so. In the printed
debates of the House of Commons, not always the most authentic
records of truth, I observe, however, that they have been accused
of this. The members of the committee of nine, being all
merchants, and the governors and factors, in their different
forts and settlements, being all dependent upon them, it is not
unlikely that the latter might have given peculiar attention to
the consignments and commissions of the former which would
establish a real monopoly.
     For the second of these, purposes, the maintenance of the
forts and garrisons, an annual sum has been allotted to them by
Parliament, generally about L13,000. For the proper application
of this sum, the committee is obliged to account annually to the
Cursitor Baron of Exchequer; which account is afterwards to be
laid before Parliament. But Parliament, which gives so little
attention to the application of millions, is not likely to give
much to that of L13,000 a year; and the Cursitor Baron of
Exchequer, from his profession and education, is not likely to be
profoundly skilled in the proper expense of forts and garrisons.
The captains of his Majesty's navy, indeed, or any other
commissioned officers appointed by the Board of Admiralty, may
inquire into the condition of the forts and garrisons, and report
their observations to that board. But that board seems to have no
direct jurisdiction over the committee, nor any authority to
correct those whose conduct it may thus inquire into; and the
captains of his Majesty's navy, besides, are not supposed to be
always deeply learned in the science of fortification. Removal
from an office which can be enjoyed only for the term of three
years, and of which the lawful emoluments, even during that term,
are so very small, seems to be the utmost punishment to which any
committee-man is liable for any fault, except direct
malversation, or embezzlement, either of the public money, or of
that of the company; and the fear of that punishment can never be
a motive of sufficient weight to force a continual and careful
attention to a business to which he has no other interest to
attend. The committee are accused of having sent out bricks and
stones from England for the reparation of Cape Coast Castle on
the coast of Guinea, a business for which Parliament had several
times granted an extraordinary sum of money. These bricks and
stones too, which had thus been sent upon so long a voyage, were
said to have been of so bad a quality that it was necessary to
rebuild from the foundation the walls which had been repaired
with them. The forts and garrisons which lie north of Cape Rouge
are not only maintained at the expense of the state, but are
under the immediate government of the executive power; and why
those which lie south of that Cape, and which are, in part at
least, maintained at the expense of the state, should be under a
different government, it seems not very easy even to imagine a
good reason. The protection of the Mediterranean trade was the
original purpose of pretence of the garrisons of Gibraltar and
Minorca, and the maintenance and government of those garrisons
has always been, very properly, committed, not to the Turkey
Company, but to the executive power. In the extent of its
dominion consists, in a great measure, the pride and dignity of
that power; and it is not very likely to fail in attention to
what is necessary for the defence of that dominion. The garrisons
at Gibraltar and Minorca, accordingly, have never been neglected;
though Minorca has been twice taken, and is now probably lost for
ever, that disaster was never even imputed to any neglect in the
executive power. I would not, however, be understood to insinuate
that either of those expensive garrisons was ever, even in the
smallest degree, necessary for the purpose for which they were
originally dismembered from the Spanish monarchy. That
dismemberment, perhaps, never served any other real purpose than
to alienate from England her natural ally the King of Spain, and
to unite the two principal branches of the house of Bourbon in a
much stricter and more permanent alliance than the ties of blood
could ever have united them.
     Joint stock companies, established by Royal Charter or by
Act of Parliament, differ in several respects, not only from
regulated companies, but from private copartneries.
     First, in a private copartnery, no partner, without the
consent of the company, can transfer his share to another person,
or introduce a new member into the company. Each member, however,
may, upon proper warning, withdraw from the copartnery, and
demand payment from them of his share of the common stock. In a
joint stock company, on the contrary, no member can demand
payment of his share from the company; but each member can,
without their consent, transfer his share to another person, and
thereby introduce a new member. The value of a share in a joint
stock is always the price which it will bring in the market; and
this may be either greater or less, in any proportion, than the
sum which its owner stands credited for in the stock of the
company.
     Secondly, in a private copartnery, each partner is bound for
the debts contracted by the company to the whole extent of his
fortune. In a joint stock company, on the contrary, each partner
is bound only to the extent of his share.
     The trade of a joint stock company is always managed by a
court of directors. This court, indeed, is frequently subject, in
many respects, to the control of a general court of proprietors.
But the greater part of those proprietors seldom pretend to
understand anything of the business of the company, and when the
spirit of faction happens not to prevail among them, give
themselves no trouble about it, but receive contentedly such
half-yearly or yearly dividend as the directors think proper to
make to them. This total exemption from trouble and from risk,
beyond a limited sum, encourages many people to become
adventurers in joint stock companies, who would, upon no account,
hazard their fortunes in any private copartnery. Such companies,
therefore, commonly draw to themselves much greater stocks than
any private copartnery can boast of. The trading stock of the
South Sea Company, at one time, amounted to upwards of
thirty-three millions eight hundred thousand pounds. The divided
capital of the Bank of England amounts, at present, to ten
millions seven hundred and eighty thousand pounds. The directors
of such companies, however, being the managers rather of other
people's money than of their own, it cannot well be expected that
they should watch over it with the same anxious vigilance with
which the partners in a private copartnery frequently watch over
their own. Like the stewards of a rich man, they are apt to
consider attention to small matters as not for their master's
honour, and very easily give themselves a dispensation from
having it. Negligence and profusion, therefore, must always
prevail, more or less, in the management of the affairs of such a
company. It is upon this account that joint stock companies for
foreign trade have seldom been able to maintain the competition
against private adventurers. They have, accordingly, very seldom
succeeded without an exclusive privilege, and frequently have not
succeeded with one. Without an exclusive privilege they have
commonly mismanaged the trade. With an exclusive privilege they
have both mismanaged and confined it.
     The Royal African Company, the predecessors of the present
African Company, had an exclusive privilege by charter, but as
that charter had not been confirmed by Act of Parliament, the
trade, in consequence of the Declaration of Rights, was, soon
after the revolution, laid open to all his Majesty's subjects.
The Hudson's Bay Company are, as to their legal rights, in the
same situation as the Royal African Company. Their exclusive
charter has not been confirmed by Act of Parliament. The South
Sea Company, as long as they continued to be a trading company,
had an exclusive privilege confirmed by Act of Parliament; as
have likewise the present United Company of Merchants trading to
the East Indies.
     The Royal African Company soon found that they could not
maintain the competition against private adventurers, whom,
notwithstanding the Declaration of Rights, they continued for
some time to call interlopers, and to persecute as such. In 1698,
however, the private adventurers were subjected to a duty of ten
per cent upon almost all the different branches of their trade,
to be employed by the company in the maintenance of their forts
and garrisons But, notwithstanding this heavy tax, the company
were still unable to maintain the competition. Their stock and
credit gradually declined. In 1712, their debts had become so
great that a particular Act of Parliament was thought necessary,
both for their security and for that of their creditors. It was
enacted that the resolution of two-thirds of these creditors in
number and value should bind the rest, both with regard to the
time which should be allowed to the company for the payment of
their debts, and with regard to any other agreement which it
might be thought proper to make with them concerning those debts.
In 1730, their affairs were in so great disorder that they were
altogether incapable of maintaining their forts and garrisons,
the sole purpose and pretext of their institution. From that
year, till their final dissolution, the Parliament judged it
necessary to allow the annual sum of ten thousand pounds for that
purpose. In 1732, after having been for many years losers by the
trade of carrying negroes to the West Indies, they at last
resolved to give it up altogether; to sell to the private traders
to America the negroes which they purchased upon the coast; and
to employ their servants in a trade to the inland parts of Africa
for gold dust, elephants' teeth, dyeing drugs, etc. But their
success in this more confined trade was not greater than in their
former extensive one. Their affairs continued to go gradually to
decline, till at last, being in every respect a bankrupt company,
they were dissolved by Act of Parliament, and their forts and
garrisons vested in the present regulated company of merchants
trading to Africa. Before the erection of the Royal African
Company, there had been three other joint stock companies
successively established, one after another, for the African
trade. They were all equally unsuccessful. They all, however, had
exclusive charters, which, though not confirmed by Act of
Parliament, were in those days supposed to convey a real
exclusive privilege.
     The Hudson's Bay Company, before their misfortunes in the
late war, had been much more fortunate than the Royal African
Company. Their necessary expense is much smaller. The whole
number of people whom they maintain in their different
settlements and habitations, which they have honoured with the
name of forts, is said not to exceed a hundred and twenty
persons. This number, however, is sufficient to prepare
beforehand the cargo of furs and other goods necessary for
loading their ships, which, on account of the ice, can seldom
remain above six or eight weeks in those seas. This advantage of
having a cargo ready prepared could not for several years be
acquired by private adventurers, and without it there seems to be
no possibility of trading to Hudson's Bay. The moderate capital
of the company, which, it is said, does not exceed one hundred
and ten thousand pounds, may besides be sufficient to enable them
to engross the whole, or almost the whole, trade and surplus
produce of the miserable, though extensive country, comprehended
within their charter. No private adventurers, accordingly, have
ever attempted to trade to that country in competition with them.
This company, therefore, have always enjoyed an exclusive trade
in fact, though they may have no right to it in law. Over and
above all this, the moderate capital of this company is said to
be divided among a very small number of proprietors. But a joint
stock company, consisting of a small number of proprietors, with
a moderate capital, approaches very nearly to the nature of a
private copartnery, and may be capable of nearly the same degree
of vigilance and attention. It is not to be wondered at,
therefore, if, in consequence of these different advantages, the
Hudson's Bay Company had, before the late war, been able to carry
on their trade with a considerable degree of success. It does not
seem probable, however, that their profits ever approached to
what the late Mr. Dobbs imagined them. A much more sober and
judicious writer, Mr. Anderson, author of The Historical and
Chronological Deduction of Commerce, very justly observes that,
upon examining the accounts of which Mr. Dobbs himself was given
for several years together of their exports and imports, and upon
making proper allowances for their extraordinary risk and
expense, it does not appear that their profits deserve to be
envied, or that they can much, if at all, exceed the ordinary
profits of trade.
     The South Sea Company never had any forts or garrisons to
maintain, and therefore were entirely exempted from one great
expense to which other joint stock companies for foreign trade
are subject. But they had an immense capital divided among an
immense number of proprietors. It was naturally to be expected,
therefore, that folly, negligence, and profusion should prevail
in the whole management of their affairs. The knavery and
extravagance of their stock-jobbing projects are sufficiently
known, and the explication of them would be foreign to the
present subject. Their mercantile projects were not much better
conducted. The first trade which they engaged in was that of
supplying the Spanish West Indies with negroes, of which (in
consequence of what was called the Assiento contract granted them
by the Treaty of Utrecht) they had the exclusive privilege. But
as it was not expected that much profit could be made by this
trade, both the Portuguese and French companies, who had enjoyed
it upon the same terms before them, having been ruined by it,
they were allowed, as compensation, to send annually a ship of a
certain burden to trade directly to the Spanish West Indies. Of
the ten voyages which this annual ship was allowed to make, they
are said to have gained considerably by one, that of the Royal
Caroline in 1731, and to have been losers, more or less, by
almost all the rest. Their ill success was imputed, by their
factors and agents, to the extortion and oppression of the
Spanish government; but was, perhaps, principally owing to the
profusion and depredations of those very factors and agents, some
of whom are said to have acquired great fortunes even in one
year. In 1734, the company petitioned the king that they might be
allowed to dispose of the trade and tonnage of their annual ship,
on account of the little profit which they made by it, and to
accept such equivalent as they could obtain from the of Spain.
     In 1724, this company had undertaken the whale-fishery. Of
this, indeed, they had no monopoly; but as long as they carried
it on, no other British subjects appear to have engaged in it. Of
the eight voyages which their ships made to Greenland, they were
gainers by one, and losers by all the rest. After their eighth
and last voyage, when they had sold their ships, stores, and
utensils, they found that their whole loss, upon this branch,
capital and interest included, amounted to upwards of two hundred
and thirty-seven thousand pounds.
     In 1722, this company petitioned the Parliament to be
allowed to divide their immense capital of more than thirty-three
millions eight hundred thousand pounds, the whole of which had
been lent to government, into two equal parts: The one half, or
upwards of sixteen millions nine hundred thousand pounds, to be
put upon the same footing with other government annuities, and
not to be subject to the debts contracted, or losses incurred, by
the directors of the company in the prosecution of their
mercantile projects; the other half to remain, as before, a
trading stock, and to be subject to those debts and losses. The
petition was too reasonable not to be granted. In 1733, they
again petitioned the Parliament that three-fourths of their
trading stock might be turned into annuity stock, and only
one-fourth remain as trading stock, or exposed to the hazards
arising from the bad management of their directors. Both their
annuity and trading stocks had, by this time, been reduced more
than two millions each by several different payments from
government; so that this fourth amounted only to L3,662,784 8s.
6d. In 1748, all the demands of the company upon the King of
Spain, in consequence of the Assiento contract, were, by the
Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle, given up for what was supposed an
equivalent. An end was put to their trade with the Spanish West
Indies, the remainder of their trading stock was turned into an
annuity stock, and the company ceased in every respect to be a
trading company.
     It ought to be observed that in the trade which the South
Sea Company carried on by means of their annual ship, the only
trade by which it ever was expected that they could make any
considerable profit, they were not without competitors, either in
the foreign or in the home market. At Carthagena, Porto Bello,
and La Vera Cruz, they had to encounter the competition of the
Spanish merchants, who brought from Cadiz, to those markets,
European goods of the same kind with the outward cargo of their
ship; and in England they had to encounter that of the English
merchants, who imported from Cadiz goods of the Spanish West
Indies of the same kind with the inward cargo. The goods both of
the Spanish and English merchants, indeed, were, perhaps, subject
to higher duties. But the loss occasioned by the negligence,
profusion, and malversation of the servants of the company had
probably been a tax much heavier than all those duties. That a
joint stock company should be able to carry on successfully any
branch of foreign trade, when private adventurers can come into
any sort of open and fair competition with them, seems contrary
to all experience.
     The old English East India Company was established in 1600
by a charter from Queen Elizabeth. In the first twelve voyages
which they fitted out for India, they appear to have traded as a
regulated company, with separate stocks, though only in the
general ships of the company. In 1612, they united into a joint
stock. Their charter was exclusive, and though not confirmed by
Act of Parliament, was in those days supposed to convey a real
exclusive privilege. For many years, therefore, they were not
much disturbed by interlopers. Their capital, which never
exceeded seven hundred and forty-four thousand pounds, and of
which fifty pounds was a share, was not so exorbitant, nor their
dealings so extensive, as to afford either a pretext for gross
negligence and profusion, or a cover to gross malversation.
Notwithstanding some extraordinary losses, occasioned partly by
the malice of the Dutch East India Company, and partly by other
accidents, they carried on for many years a successful trade. But
in process of time, when the principles of liberty were better
understood, it became every day more and more doubtful how far a
Royal Charter, not confirmed by Act of Parliament, could convey
an exclusive privilege. Upon this question the decisions of the
courts of justice were not uniform, but varied with the authority
of government and the humours of the times. Interlopers
multiplied upon them, and towards the end of the reign of Charles
II, through the whole of that of James II and during a part of
that of William III, reduced them to great distress. In 1698, a
proposal was made to Parliament of advancing two millions to
government at eight per cent, provided the subscribers were
erected into a new East India Company with exclusive privileges.
The old East India Company offered seven hundred thousand pounds,
nearly the amount of their capital, at four per cent upon the
same conditions. But such was at that time the state of public
credit, that it was more convenient for government to borrow two
millions at eight per cent than seven hundred thousand pounds at
four. The proposal of the new subscribers was accepted, and a new
East India Company established in consequence. The old East India
Company, however, had a right to continue their trade till 1701.
They had, at the same time, in the name of their treasurer,
subscribed, very artfully, three hundred and fifteen thousand
pounds into the stock of the new. By a negligence in the
expression of the Act of Parliament which vested the East India
trade in the subscribers to this loan of two millions, it did not
appear evident that they were all obliged to unite into a joint
stock. A few private traders, whose subscriptions amounted only
to seven thousand two hundred pounds, insisted upon the privilege
of trading separately upon their own stocks and at their own
risk. The old East India Company had a right to a separate trade
upon their old stock till 1701; and they had likewise, both
before and after that period, a right, like that of other private
traders, to a separate trade upon the three hundred and fifteen
thousand pounds which they had subscribed into the stock of the
new company. The competition of the two companies with the
private traders, and with one another, is said to have well-nigh
ruined both. Upon a subsequent occasion, in 1730, when a proposal
was made to Parliament for putting the trade under the management
of a regulated company, and thereby laying it in some measure
open, the East India Company, in opposition to this proposal,
represented in very strong terms what had been, at this time, the
miserable effects, as they thought them, of this competition. In
India, they said, it raised the price of goods so high that they
were not worth the buying; and in England, by overstocking the
market, it sunk their price so low that no profit could be made
by them. That by a more plentiful supply, to the great advantage
and conveniency of the public, it must have reduced, very much,
the price of Indian goods in the English market, cannot well be
doubted; but that it should have raised very much their price in
the Indian market seems not very probable, as all the
extraordinary demand which that competition could occasion must
have been but as a drop of water in the immense ocean of Indian
Commerce. The increase of demand, besides, though in the
beginning it may sometimes raise the price of goods, never fails
to lower it in the run. It encourages production, and thereby
increases the competition of the producers, who, in order to
undersell one another, have recourse to new divisions of labour
and new improvements of art which might never otherwise have been
thought of. The miserable effects of which the company complained
were the cheapness of consumption and the encouragement given to
production, precisely the two effects which it is the great
business of political economy to promote. The competition,
however, of which they gave this doleful account, had not been
allowed to be of long continuance. In 1702, the two companies
were, in some measure, united by an indenture tripartite, to
which the queen was the third party; and in 1708, they were, by
Act of Parliament, perfectly consolidated into one company by
their present name of the The United Company of Merchants trading
to the East Indies. Into this act it was thought worth while to
insert a clause allowing the separate traders to continue their
trade till Michaelmas 1711, but at the same time empowering the
directors, upon three years' notice, to redeem their little
capital of seven thousand two hundred pounds, and thereby to
convert the whole stock of the company into a joint stock. By the
same act, the capital of the company, in consequence of a new
loan to government, was augmented from two millions to three
millions two hundred thousand pounds. In 1743, the company
advanced another million to government. But this million being
raised, not by a call upon the proprietors, but by selling
annuities and contracting bond-debts, it did not augment the
stock upon which the proprietors could claim a dividend. It
augmented, however, their trading stock, it being equally liable
with the other three millions two hundred thousand pounds to the
losses sustained, and debts contracted, by the company in
prosecution of their mercantile projects. From 1708, or at least
from 1711, this company, being delivered from all competitors,
and fully established in the monopoly of the English commerce to
the East Indies, carried on a successful trade, and from their
profits made annually a moderate dividend to their proprietors.
During the French war, which began in 1741, the ambition of Mr.
Dupleix, the French governor of Pondicherry, involved them in the
wars of the Carnatic, and in the politics of the Indian princes.
After many signal successes, and equally signal losses, they at
last lost Madras, at that time their principal settlement in
India. It was restored to them by the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle;
and about this time the spirit of war and conquest seems to have
taken possession of their servants in India, and never since to
have left them. During the French war, which began in 1755, their
arms partook of the general good fortune of those of Great
Britain. They defended Madras, took Pondicherry, recovered
Calcutta, and acquired the revenues of a rich and extensive
territory, amounting, it was then said, to upwards of three
millions a year. They remained for several years in quiet
possession of this revenue: but in 1767, administration laid
claim to their territorial acquisitions, and the revenue arising
from them, as of right belonging to the crown; and the company,
in compensation for this claim, agreed to pay the government four
hundred thousand pounds a year. They had before this gradually
augmented their dividend from about six to ten per cent; that is,
upon their capital of three millions two hundred thousand pounds
they had increased it by a hundred and twenty-eight thousand
pounds, or had raised it from one hundred and ninety-two thousand
to three hundred and twenty thousand pounds a year. They were
attempting about this time to raise it still further, to twelve
and a half per cent, which would have made their annual payments
to their proprietors equal to what they had agreed to pay
annually to government, or to four hundred thousand pounds a
year.
     But during the two years in which their agreement with
government was to take place, they were restrained from any
further increase of dividend by two successive Acts of
Parliament, of which the object was to enable them to make a
speedier progress in the payment of their debts, which were at
this time estimated at upwards of six or seven millions sterling.
In 1769, they renewed their agreement with government for five
years more, and stipulated that during the course of that period
they should be allowed gradually to increase their dividend to
twelve and a half per cent; never increasing it, however, more
than one per cent in one year. This increase of dividend,
therefore, when it had risen to its utmost height, could augment
their annual payments, to their proprietors and government
together, but by six hundred and eight thousand pounds beyond
what they had been before their late territorial acquisitions.
What the gross revenue of those territorial acquisitions was
supposed to amount to has already been mentioned; and by an
account brought by the Cruttenden East Indiaman in 1768, the net
revenue, clear of all deductions and military charges, was stated
at two millions forty-eight thousand seven hundred and
forty-seven pounds. They were said at the same time to possess
another revenue, arising partly from lands, but chiefly from the
customs established at their different settlements, amounting to
four hundred and thirty-nine thousand pounds. The profits of
their trade too, according to the evidence of their chairman
before the House of Commons, amounted at this time to at least
four hundred thousand pounds a year, according to that of their
accountant, to at least five hundred thousand; according to the
lowest account, at least equal to the highest dividend that was
to be paid to their proprietors. So great a revenue might
certainly have afforded an augmentation of six hundred and eight
thousand pounds in their annual payments, and at the same time
have left a large sinking fund sufficient for the speedy
reduction of their debts. In 1773, however, their debts, instead
of being reduced, were augmented by an arrear to the treasury in
the payment of the four hundred thousand pounds, by another to
the custom-house for duties unpaid, by a large debt to the bank
for money borrowed, and by a fourth for bills drawn upon them
from India, and wantonly accepted, to the amount of upwards of
twelve hundred thousand pounds. The distress which these
accumulated claims brought upon them, obliged them not only to
reduce all at once their dividend to six per cent, but to throw
themselves upon the mercy of government, and to supplicate,
first, a release from further payment of the stipulated four
hundred thousand pounds a year; and, secondly, a loan of fourteen
hundred thousand, to save them from immediate bankruptcy. The
great increase of their fortune had, it seems, only served to
furnish their servants with a pretext for greater profusion, and
a cover for greater malversation, than in proportion even to that
increase of fortune. The conduct of their servants in India, and
the general state of their affairs both in India and in Europe,
became the subject of a Parliamentary inquiry, in consequence of
which several very important alternations were made in the
constitution of their government, both at home and abroad. In
India their principal settlements of Madras, Bombay, and
Calcutta, which had before been altogether independent of one
another, were subjected to a governor-general, assisted by a
council of four assessors, Parliament assuming to itself the
first nomination of this governor and council who were to reside
at Calcutta; that city having now become, what Madras was before,
the most important of the English settlements in India. The Court
of the Mayor of Calcutta, originally instituted for the trial of
mercantile causes which arose in city and neighbourhood, had
gradually extended its jurisdiction with the extension of the
empire. It was now reduced and confined to the original purpose
of its institution. Instead of it a new supreme court of
judicature was established, consisting of a chief justice and
three judges to be appointed by the crown. In Europe, the
qualification necessary to entitle a proprietor to vote at their
general courts was raised from five hundred pounds, the original
price of a share in the stock of the company, to a thousand
pounds. In order to vote upon this qualification too, it was
declared necessary that he should have possessed it, if acquired
by his own purchase, and not by inheritance, for at least one
year, instead of six months, the term requisite before. The court
of twenty-four directors had before been chosen annually; but it
was now enacted that each director should, for the future, be
chosen for four years; six of them, however, to go out of office
by rotation every year, and not to be capable of being re-chosen
at the election of the six new directors for the ensuing year. In
consequence of these alterations, the courts, both of the
proprietors and directors, it was expected, would be likely to
act with more dignity and steadiness than they had usually done
before. But it seems impossible, by any alterations, to render
those courts, in any respect, fit to govern, or even to share in
the government of a great empire; because the greater part of
their members must always have too little interest in the
prosperity of that empire to give any serious attention to what
may promote it. Frequently a man of great, sometimes even a man
of small fortune, is willing to purchase a thousand pounds' share
in India stock merely for the influence which he expects to
acquire by a vote in the court of proprietors. It gives him a
share, though not in the plunder, yet in the appointment of the
plunderers of India; the court of directors, though they make
that appointment, being necessarily more or less under the
influence of the proprietors, who not only elect those directors,
but sometimes overrule the appointments of their servants in
India. Provided he can enjoy this influence for a few years, and
thereby provide for a certain number of his friends, he
frequently cares little about the dividend, or even about the
value of the stock upon which his vote is founded. About the
prosperity of the great empire, in the government of which that
vote gives him a share, he seldom cares at all. No other
sovereigns ever were, or, from the nature of things, ever could
be, so perfectly indifferent about the happiness or misery of
their subjects, the improvement or waste of their dominions, the
glory or disgrace of their administration, as, from irresistible
moral causes, the greater part of the proprietors of such a
mercantile company are, and necessarily must be. This
indifference, too, was more likely to be increased than
diminished by some of the new regulations which were made in
consequence of the Parliamentary inquiry. By a resolution of the
House of Commons, for example, it was declared, that when the
fourteen hundred thousand pounds lent to the company by
government should be paid, and their bond-debts be reduced to
fifteen hundred thousand pounds, they might then, and not till
then, divide eight per cent upon their capital; and that whatever
remained of their revenues and net profits at home should be
divided into four parts; three of them to be paid into the
exchequer for the use of the public, and the fourth to be
reserved as a fund either for the further reduction of their
bond-debts, or for the discharge of other contingent exigencies
which the company might labour under. But if the company were bad
stewards, and bad sovereigns, when the whole of their net revenue
and profits belonged to themselves, and were at their own
disposal, they were surely not likely to be better when
three-fourths of them were to belong to other people, and the
other fourth, though to be laid out for the benefit of the
company, yet to be so under the inspection and with the
approbation of other people.
     It might be more agreeable to the company that their own
servants and dependants should have either the pleasure of
wasting or the profit of embezzling whatever surplus might remain
after paying the proposed dividend of eight per cent than that it
should come into the hands of a set of people with whom those
resolutions could scarce fail to set them, in some measure, at
variance. The interest of those servants and dependants might so
far predominate in the court of proprietors as sometimes to
dispose it to support the authors of depredations which had been
committed in direct violation of its own authority. With the
majority of proprietors, the support even of the authority of
their own court might sometimes be a matter of less consequence
than the support of those who had set that authority at defiance.
     The regulations of 1773, accordingly, did not put an end to
the disorders of the company's government in India.
Notwithstanding that, during a momentary fit of good conduct,
they had at one time collected into the treasury of Calcutta more
than three millions sterling; notwithstanding that they had
afterwards extended, either their dominion, or their
depredations, over a vast accession of some of the richest and
most fertile countries in India, all was wasted and destroyed.
They found themselves altogether unprepared to stop or resist the
incursion of Hyder Ali; and, in consequence of those disorders,
the company is now (1784) in greater distress than ever; and, in
order to prevent immediate bankruptcy, is once more reduced to
supplicate the assistance of government. Different plans have
been proposed by the different parties in Parliament for the
better management of its affairs. And all those plans seem to
agree insupposing, what was indeed always abundantly evident,
that it is altogether unfit to govern its territorial
possessions. Even the company itself seems to be convinced of its
own incapacity so far, and seems, upon that account, willing to
give them up to government.
     With the right of possessing forts and garrisons in distant
and barbarous countries is necessarily connected the right of
making peace and war in those countries. The joint stock
companies which have had the one right have constantly exercised
the other, and have frequently had it expressly conferred upon
them. How unjustly, how capriciously, how cruelly they have
commonly exercised it, is too well known from recent experience.
     When a company of merchants undertake, at their own risk and
expense, to establish a new trade with some remote and barbarous
nation, it may not be unreasonable to incorporate them into a
joint stock company, and to grant them, in case of their success,
a monopoly of the trade for a certain number of years. It is the
easiest and most natural way in which the state can recompense
them for hazarding a dangerous and expensive experiment, of which
the public is afterwards to reap the benefit. A temporary
monopoly of this kind may be vindicated upon the same principles
upon which a like monopoly of a new machine is granted to its
inventor, and that of a new book to its author. But upon the
expiration of the term, the monopoly ought certainly to
determine; the forts and garrisons, if it was found necessary to
establish any, to be taken into the hands of government, their
value to be paid to the company, and the trade to be laid open to
all the subjects of the state. By a perpetual monopoly, all the
other subjects of the state are taxed very absurdly in two
different ways: first, by the high price of goods, which, in the
case of a free trade, they could buy much cheaper; and, secondly,
by their total exclusion from a branch of business which it might
be both convenient and profitable for many of them to carry on.
It is for the most worthless of all purposes, too, that they are
taxed in this manner. It is merely to enable the company to
support the negligence, profusion, and malversation of their own
servants, whose disorderly conduct seldom allows the dividend of
the company to exceed the ordinary rate of profit in trades which
are altogether free, and very frequently makes it fall even a
good deal short of that rate. Without a monopoly, however, a
joint stock company, it would appear from experience, cannot long
carry on any branch of foreign trade. To buy in one market, in
order to sell, with profit, in another, when there are many
competitors in both, to watch over, not only the occasional
variations in the demand, but the much greater and more frequent
variations in the competition, or in the supply which that demand
is likely to get from other people, and to suit with dexterity
and judgment both the quantity and quality of each assortment of
goods to all these circumstances, is a species of warfare of
which the operations are continually changing, and which can
scarce ever be conducted successfully without such an unremitting
exertion of vigilance and attention as cannot long be expected
from the directors of a joint stock company. The East India
Company, upon the redemption of their funds, and the expiration
of their exclusive privilege, have right, by Act of Parliament,
to continue a corporation with a joint stock, and to trade in
their corporate capacity to the East Indies in common with the
rest of their fellow-subjects. But in this situation, the
superior vigilance and attention of private adventurers would, in
all probability, soon make them weary of the trade.
     An eminent French author, of great knowledge in matters of
political economy, the Abbe Morellet, gives a list of fifty-five
joint stock companies for foreign trade which have been
established in different parts of Europe since the year 1600, and
which, according to him, have all failed from mismanagement,
notwithstanding they had exclusive privileges. He has been
misinformed with regard to the history of two or three of them,
which were not joint stock companies and have not failed. But, in
compensation, there have been several joint stock companies which
have failed, and which he has omitted.
     The only trades which it seems possible for a joint stock
company to carry on successfully without an exclusive privilege
are those of which all the operations are capable of being
reduced to what is called a Routine, or to such a uniformity of
method as admits of little or no variation. Of this kind is,
first, the banking trade; secondly, the trade of insurance from
fire, and from sea risk and capture in time of war; thirdly, the
trade of making and maintaining a navigable cut or canal; and,
fourthly, the similar trade of bringing water for the supply of a
great city.
     Though the principles of the banking trade may appear
somewhat abstruse, the practice is capable of being reduced to
strict rules. To depart upon any occasion from those rules, in
consequence of some flattering speculation of extraordinary gain,
is almost always extremely dangerous, and frequently fatal, to
the banking company which attempts it. But the constitution of
joint stock companies renders them in general more tenacious of
established rules than any private copartnery. Such companies,
therefore, seem extremely well fitted for this trade. The
principal banking companies in Europe, accordingly, are joint
stock companies, many of which manage their trade very
successfully without any exclusive privilege. The Bank of England
has no other exclusive privilege except that no other banking
company in England shall consist of more than six persons. The
two banks of Edinburgh are joint stock companies without any
exclusive privilege.
     The value of the risk, either from fire, or from loss by
sea, or by capture, though it cannot, perhaps, be calculated very
exactly, admits, however, of such a gross estimation as renders
it, in some degree, reducible to strict rule and method. The
trade of insurance, therefore, may be carried on successfully by
a joint stock company without any exclusive privilege. Neither
the London Assurance nor the Royal Exchange Assurance companies
have any such privilege.
     When a navigable cut or canal has been once made, the
management of it becomes quite simple and easy, and it is
reducible to strict rule and method. Even the making of it is so
as it may be contracted for with undertakers at so much a mile,
and so much a lock. The same thing may be said of a canal, an
aqueduct, or a great pipe for bringing water to supply a great
city. Such undertakings, therefore, may be, and accordingly
frequently are, very successfully managed by joint stock
companies without any exclusive privilege.
     To establish a joint stock company, however, for any
undertaking, merely because such a company might be capable of
managing it successfully; or to exempt a particular set of
dealers from some of the general laws which take place with
regard to all their neighbours, merely because they might be
capable of thriving if they had such an exemption, would
certainly not be reasonable. To render such an establishment
perfectly reasonable, with the circumstance of being reducible to
strict rule and method, two other circumstances ought to concur.
First, it ought to appear with the clearest evidence that the
undertaking is of greater and more general utility than the
greater part of common trades; and secondly, that it requires a
greater capital than can easily be collected into a private
copartnery. If a moderate capital were sufficient, the great
utility of the undertaking would not be a sufficient reason for
establishing a joint stock company; because, in this case, the
demand for what it was to produce would readily and easily be
supplied by private adventures. In the four trades above
mentioned, both those circumstances concur.
     The great and general utility of the banking trade when
prudently managed has been fully explained in the second, book of
this Inquiry. But a public bank which is to support public
credit, and upon particular emergencies to advance to government
the whole produce of a tax, to the amount, perhaps, of several
millions, a year or two before it comes in, requires a greater
capital than can easily be collected into any private copartnery.
     The trade of insurance gives great security to the fortunes
of private people, and by dividing among a great many that loss
which would ruin an individual, makes it fall light and easy upon
the whole society. In order to give this security, however, it is
necessary that the insurers should have a very large capital.
Before the establishment of the two joint stock companies for
insurance in London, a list, it is said, was laid before the
attorney-general of one hundred and fifty private insurers who
had failed in the course of a few years.
     That navigable cuts and canals, and the works which are
sometimes necessary for supplying a great city with water, are of
great and general utility, while at the same time they frequently
require a greater expense than suits the fortunes of private
people, is sufficiently obvious.
     Except the four trades above mentioned, I have not been able
to recollect any other in which all the three circumstances
requisite for rendering reasonable the establishment of a joint
stock company concur. The English copper company of London, the
lead smelting company, the glass grinding company, have not even
the pretext of any great or singular utility in the object which
they pursue; nor does the pursuit of that object seem to require
any expense unsuitable to the fortunes of many private men.
Whether the trade which those companies carry on is reducible to
such strict rule and method as to render it fit for the
management of a joint stock company, or whether they have any
reason to boast of their extraordinary profits, I do not pretend
to know. The mine-adventurers' company has been long ago
bankrupt. A share in the stock of the British Linen Company of
Edinburgh sells, at present, very much below par, though less so
that it did some years ago. The joint stock companies which are
established for the public-spirited purpose of promoting some
particular manufacture, over and above managing their own affairs
ill, to the dimunition of the general stock of the society, can
in other respects scarce ever fail to do more harm than good.
Notwithstanding the most upright intentions, the unavoidable
partiality of their directors to particular branches of the
manufacture of which the undertakers mislead and impose upon them
is a real discouragement to the rest, and necessarily breaks,
more or less, that natural proportion which would otherwise
establish itself between judicious industry and profit, and
which, to the general industry of the country, is of all
encouragements the greatest and the most effectual. 
                              ARTICLE II
      Of the Expense of the Institutions for the Education of
Youth 
     The institutions for the education of the youth may, in the
same manner, furnish a revenue sufficient for defraying their own
expense. The fee or honorary which the scholar pays to the master
naturally constitutes a revenue of this kind.
     Even where the reward of the master does not arise
altogether from this natural revenue, it still is not necessary
that it should be derived from that general revenue of the
society, of which the collection and application is, in most
countries, assigned to the executive power. Through the greater
part of Europe, accordingly, the endowment of schools and
colleges makes either no charge upon that general revenue, or but
a very small one. It everywhere arises chiefly from some local or
provincial revenue, from the rent of some landed estate, or from
the interest of some sum of money allotted and put under the
management of trustees for this particular purpose, sometimes by
the sovereign himself, and sometimes by some private donor.
     Have those public endowments contributed in general to
promote the end of their institution? Have they contributed to
encourage the diligence and to improve the abilities of the
teachers? Have they directed the course of education towards
objects more useful, both to the individual and to the public,
than those to which it would naturally have gone of its own
accord? It should not seem very difficult to give at least a
probable answer to each of those questions.
     In every profession, the exertion of the greater part of
those who exercise it is always in proportion to the necessity
they are under of making that exertion. This necessity is
greatest with those to whom the emoluments of their profession
are the only source from which they expect their fortune, or even
their ordinary revenue and subsistence. In order to acquire this
fortune, or even to get this subsistence, they must, in the
course of a year, execute a certain quantity of work of a known
value; and, where the competition is free, the rivalship of
competitors, who are all endeavouring to justle one another out
of employment, obliges every man to endeavour to execute his work
with a certain degree of exactness. The greatness of the objects
which are to be acquired by success in some particular
professions may, no doubt, sometimes animate the exertion of a
few men of extraordinary spirit and ambition. Great objects,
however, are evidently not necessary in order to occasion the
greatest exertions. Rivalship and emulation render excellency,
even in mean professions, an object of ambition, and frequently
occasion the very greatest exertions. Great objects, on the
contrary, alone and unsupported by the necessity of application,
have seldom been sufficient to occasion any considerable
exertion. In England, success in the profession of the law leads
to some very great objects of ambition; and yet how few men, born
to easy fortunes, have ever in this country been eminent in that
profession!
     The endowments of schools and colleges have necessarily
diminished more or less the necessity of application in the
teachers. Their subsistence, so far as it arises from their
salaries, is evidently derived from a fund altogether independent
of their success and reputation in their particular professions.
     In some universities the salary makes but a part, and
frequently but a small part, of the emoluments of the teacher, of
which the greater part arises from the honoraries or fees of his
pupils. The necessity of application, though always more or less
diminished, is not in this case entirely taken away. Reputation
in his profession is still of some importance to him, and he
still has some dependency upon the affection, gratitude, and
favourable report of those who have attended upon his
instructions; and these favourable sentiments he is likely to
gain in no way so well as by deserving them, that is, by the
abilities and diligence with which he discharges every part of
his duty.
     In other universities the teacher is prohibited from
receiving any honorary or fee from his pupils, and his salary
constitutes the whole of the revenue which he derives from his
office. His interest is, in this case, set as directly in
opposition to his duty as it is possible to set it. It is the
interest of every man to live as much at his ease as he can; and
if his emoluments are to be precisely the same, whether he does
or does not perform some very laborious duty, it is certainly his
interest, at least as interest is vulgarly understood, either to
neglect it altogether, or, if he is subject to some authority
which will not suffer him to do this, to perform it in as
careless and slovenly a manner as that authority will permit. If
he is naturally active and a lover of labour, it is his interest
to employ that activity in any way from which he can derive some
advantage, rather than in the performance of his duty, from which
he can derive none.
     If the authority to which he is subject resides in the body
corporate, the college, or university, of which he himself is a
member, and which the greater part of the other members are, like
himself, persons who either are or ought to be teachers, they are
likely to make a common cause, to be all very indulgent to one
another, and every man to consent that his neighbour may neglect
his duty, provided he himself is allowed to neglect his own. In
the university of Oxford, the greater part of the public
professors have, for these many years, given up altogether even
the pretence of teaching.
     If the authority to which he is subject resides, not so much
in the body corporate of which he is a member, as in some other
extraneous persons- in the bishop of the diocese, for example; in
the governor of the province; or, perhaps, in some minister of
state it is not indeed in this case very likely that he will be
suffered to neglect his duty altogether. All that such superiors,
however, can force him to do, is to attend upon his pupils a
certain number of hours, that is, to give a certain number of
lectures in the week or in the year. What those lectures shall be
must still depend upon the diligence of the teacher; and that
diligence is likely to be proportioned to the motives which he
has for exerting it. An extraneous jurisdiction of this kind,
besides, is liable to be exercised both ignorantly and
capriciously. In its nature it is arbitrary and discretionary,
and the persons who exercise it, neither attending upon the
lectures of the teacher themselves, nor perhaps understanding the
sciences which it is his business to teach, are seldom capable of
exercising it with judgment. From the insolence of office, too,
they are frequently indifferent how they exercise it, and are
very apt to censure or deprive him of his office wantonly, and
without any just cause. The person subject to such jurisdiction
is necessarily degraded by it, and, instead of being one of the
most respectable, is rendered one of the meanest and most
contemptible persons in the society. It is by powerful protection
only that he can effectually guard himself against the bad usage
to which he is at all times exposed; and this protection he is
most likely to gain, not by ability or diligence in his
profession, but by obsequiousness to the will of his superiors,
and by being ready, at all times, to sacrifice to that will the
rights, the interest, and the honour of the body corporate of
which he is a member. Whoever has attended for any considerable
time to the administration of a French university must have had
occasion to remark the effects which naturally result from an
arbitrary and extraneous jurisdiction of this kind.
     Whatever forces a certain number of students to any college
or university, independent of the merit or reputation of the
teachers, tends more or less to diminish the necessity of that
merit or reputation.
     The privileges of graduates in arts, in law, physic, and
divinity, when they can be obtained only by residing a certain
number of years in certain universities, necessarily force a
certain number of students to such universities, independent of
the merit or reputation of the teachers. The privileges of
graduates are a sort of statutes of apprenticeship, which have
contributed to the improvement of education, just as the other
statutes of apprenticeship have to that of arts, and
manufactures.
     The charitable foundations of scholarships, exhibitions,
bursaries, etc., necessarily attach a certain number of students
to certain colleges, independent altogether of the merit of those
particular colleges. Were the students upon such charitable
foundations left free to choose what college they liked best,
such liberty might perhaps contribute to excite some emulation
among different colleges. A regulation, on the contrary, which
prohibited even the independent members of every particular
college from leaving it and going to any other, without leave
first asked and obtained of that which they meant to abandon,
would tend very much to extinguish that emulation.
     If in each college the tutor or teacher, who was to instruct
each student in all arts and sciences, should not be voluntarily
chosen by the student, but appointed by the head of the college;
and if, in case of neglect, inability, or bad usage, the student
should not be allowed to change him for another, without leave
first asked and obtained, such a regulation would not only tend
very much to extinguish all emulation among the different tutors
of the same college, but to diminish very much in all of them the
necessity of diligence and of attention to their respective
pupils. Such teachers, though very well paid by their students,
might be as much disposed to neglect them as those who are not
paid by them at all, or who have no other recompense but their
salary.
     If the teacher happens to be a man of sense, it must be an
unpleasant thing to him to be conscious, while he is lecturing
his students, that he is either speaking or reading nonsense, or
what is very little better than nonsense. It must, too, be
unpleasant to him to observe that the greater part of his
students desert his lectures, or perhaps attend upon them with
plain enough marks of neglect, contempt, and derision. If he is
obliged, therefore, to give a certain number of lectures, these
motives alone, without any other interest, might dispose him to
take some pains to give tolerably good ones. Several different
expedients, however, may be fallen upon which will effectually
blunt the edge of all those incitements to diligence. The
teacher, instead of explaining to his pupils himself the science
in which he proposes to instruct them, may read some book upon
it; and if this book is written in a foreign and dead language,
by interpreting it to them into their own; or, what would give
him still less trouble, by making them interpret it to him, and
by now and then making an occasional remark upon it, he may
flatter himself that he is giving a lecture. The slightest degree
of knowledge and application will enable him to do this without
exposing himself to contempt or derision, or saying anything that
is really foolish, absurd, or ridiculous. The discipline of the
college, at the same time, may enable him to force all his pupils
to the most regular attendance upon this sham lecture, and to
maintain the most decent and respectful behaviour during the
whole time of the performance.
     The discipline of colleges and universities is in general
contrived, not for the benefit of the students, but for the
interest, or more properly speaking, for the ease of the masters.
Its object is, in all cases, to maintain the authority of the
master, and whether he neglects or performs his duty, to oblige
the students in all cases to behave to him, as if he performed it
with the greatest diligence and ability. It seems to presume
perfect wisdom and virtue in the one order, and the greatest
weakness and folly in the other. Where the masters, however,
really perform their duty, there are no examples, I believe, that
the greater part of the students ever neglect theirs. No
discipline is ever requisite to force attendance upon lectures
which are really worth the attending, as is well known wherever
any such lectures are given. Force and restraint may, no doubt,
be in some degree requisite in order to oblige children, or very
young boys, to attend to those parts of education which it is
thought necessary for them to acquire during that early period of
life; but after twelve or thirteen years of age, provided the
master does his duty, force or restraint can scarce ever be
necessary to carry on any part of education. Such is the
generosity of the greater part of young men, that, so far from
being disposed to neglect or despise the instructions of their
master, provided he shows some serious intention of being of use
to them, they are generally inclined to pardon a great deal of
incorrectness in the performance of his duty, and sometimes even
to conceal from the public a good deal of gross negligence.
     Those parts of education, it is to be observed, for the
teaching of which there are no public institutions, are generally
the best taught. When a young man goes to a fencing or a dancing
school, he does not indeed always learn to fence or to dance very
well; but he seldom fails of learning to fence or to dance. The
good effects of the riding school are not commonly so evident.
The expense of a riding school is so great, that in most places
it is a public institution. The three most essential parts of
literary education, to read, write, and account, it still
continues to be more common to acquire in private than in public
schools; and it very seldom happens that anybody fails of
acquiring them to the degree in which it is necessary to acquire
them.
     In England the public schools are much less corrupted than
the universities. In the schools the youth are taught, or at
least may be taught, Greek and Latin; that is, everything which
the masters pretend to teach, or which, it is expected, they
should teach. In the universities the youth neither are taught,
nor always can find any proper means of being taught, the
sciences which it is the business of those incorporated bodies to
teach. The reward of the schoolmaster in most cases depends
principally, in some cases almost entirely, upon the fees or
honoraries of his scholars. Schools have no exclusive privileges.
In order to obtain the honours of graduation, it is not necessary
that a person should bring a certificate of his having studied a
certain number of years at a public school. If upon examination
he appears to understand what is taught there, no questions are
asked about the place where he learnt it.
     The parts of education which are commonly taught in
universities, it may, perhaps, be said are not very well taught.
But had it not been for those institutions they would not have
been commonly taught at all, and both the individual and the
public would have suffered a good deal from the want of those
important parts of education.
     The present universities of Europe were originally, the
greater part of them, ecclesiastical corporations, instituted for
the education of churchmen. They were founded by the authority of
the Pope, and were so entirely under his immediate protection,
that their members, whether masters or students, had all of them
what was then called the benefit of clergy, that is, were
exempted from the civil jurisdiction of the countries in which
their respective universities were situated, and were amenable
only to the ecclesiastical tribunals. What was taught in the
greater part of those universities was suitable to the end of
their institution, either theology, or something that was merely
preparatory to theology.
     When Christianity was first established by law, a corrupted
Latin had become the common language of all the western parts of
Europe. The service of the church accordingly, and the
translation of the Bible which was read in churches, were both in
that corrupted Latin; that is, in the common language of the
country. After the irruption of the barbarous nations who
overturned the Roman empire, Latin gradually ceased to be the
language of any part of Europe. But the reverence of the people
naturally preserves the established forms and ceremonies of
religion long after the circumstances which first introduced and
rendered them reasonable are no more. Though Latin, therefore,
was no longer understood anywhere by the great body of the
people, the whole service of the church still continued to be
performed in that language. Two different languages were thus
established in Europe, in the same manner as in ancient Egypt; a
language of the priests, and a language of the people; a sacred
and a profane; a learned and an unlearned language. But it was
necessary that the priests should understand something of that
sacred and learned language in which they were to officiate; and
the study of the Latin language therefore made, from the
beginning, an essential part of university education.
     It was not so with that either of the Greek or of the Hebrew
language. The infallible decrees of the church had pronounced the
Latin translation of the Bible, commonly called the Latin
Vulgate, to have been equally dictated by divine inspiration, and
therefore of equal authority with the Greek and Hebrew originals.
The knowledge of those two languages, therefore, not being
indispensably requisite to a churchman, the study of them did not
for a long time make a necessary part of the common course of
university education. There are some Spanish universities, I am
assured, in which the study of the Greek language has never yet
made any part of that course. The first reformers found the Greek
text of the New Testament, and even the Hebrew text of the Old,
more favorable to their opinions than the Vulgate translation,
which, as might naturally be supposed, had been gradually
accommodated to support the doctrines of the Catholic Church.
They set themselves, therefore, to expose the many errors of that
translation, which the Roman Catholic clergy were thus put under
the necessity of defending or explaining. But this could not well
be done without some knowledge of the original languages, of
which the study was therefore gradually introduced into the
greater part of universities, both of those which embraced, and
of those which rejected, the doctrines of the Reformation. The
Greek language was connected with every part of that classical
learning which, though at first principally cultivated by
Catholics and Italians, happened to come into fashion much about
the same time that the doctrines of the Reformation were set on
foot. In the greater part of universities, therefore, that
language was taught previous to the study of philosophy, and as
soon as the student had made some progress in the Latin. The
Hebrew language having no connection with classical learning,
and, except the Holy Scriptures, being the language of not a
single book in any esteem, the study of it did not commonly
commence till after that of philosophy, and when the student had
entered upon the study of theology.
     Originally the first rudiments both of the Greek and Latin
languages were taught in universities, and in some universities
they still continue to be so. In others it is expected that the
student should have previously acquired at least the rudiments of
one or both of those languages, of which the study continues to
make everywhere a very considerable part of university education.
     The ancient Greek philosophy was divided into three great
branches; physics, or natural philosophy; ethics, or moral
philosophy; and logic. This general division seems perfectly
agreeable to the nature of things.
     The great phenomena of nature- the revolutions of the
heavenly bodies, eclipses, comets; thunder, lightning, and other
extraordinary meteors; the generation, the life, growth, and
dissolution of plants and animals- are objects which, as they
necessarily excite the wonder, so they naturally call forth the
curiosity, of mankind to inquire into their causes. Superstition
first attempted to satisfy this curiosity, by referring all those
wonderful appearances to the immediate agency of the gods.
Philosophy afterwards endeavoured to account for them from more
familiar causes, or from such as mankind were better acquainted
with, than the agency of the gods. As those great phenomena are
the first objects of human curiosity, so the science which
pretends to explain them must naturally have been the first
branch of philosophy that was cultivated. The first philosophers,
accordingly, of whom history has preserved any account, appear to
have been natural philosophers.
     In every age and country of the world men must have attended
to the characters, designs, and actions of one another, and many
reputable rules and maxims for the conduct of human life must
have been laid down and approved of by common consent. As soon as
writing came into fashion, wise men, or those who fancied
themselves such, would naturally endeavour to increase the number
of those established and respected maxims, and to express their
own sense of what was either proper or improper conduct,
sometimes in the more artificial form of apologues, like what are
called the fables of Aesop; and sometimes in the more simple one
of apophthegms, or wise sayings, like the Proverbs of Solomon,
the verses of Theognis and Phocyllides, and some part of the
works of Hesiod. They might continue in this manner for a long
time merely to multiply the number of those maxims of prudence
and morality, without even attempting to arrange them in any very
distinct or methodical order, much less to connect them together
by one or more general principles from which they were all
deducible, like effects from their natural causes. The beauty of
a systematical arrangement of different observations connected by
a few common principles was first seen in the rude essays of
those ancient times towards a system of natural philosophy.
Something of the same kind was afterwards attempted in morals.
The maxims of common life were arranged in some methodical order,
and connected together by a few common principles, in the same
manner as they had attempted to arrange and connect the phenomena
of nature. The science which pretends to investigate and explain
those connecting principles is what is properly called moral
philosophy.
     Different authors gave different systems both of natural and
moral philosophy. But the arguments by which they supported those
different systems, for from being always demonstrations, were
frequently at best but very slender probabilities, and sometimes
mere sophisms, which had no other foundation but the inaccuracy
and ambiguity of common language. Speculative systems have in all
ages of the world been adopted for reasons too frivolous to have
determined the judgment of any man of common sense in a matter of
the smallest pecuniary interest. Gross sophistry has scarce ever
had any influence upon the opinions of mankind, except in matters
of philosophy and speculation; and in these it has frequently had
the greatest. The patrons of each system of natural and moral
philosophy naturally endeavoured to expose the weakness of the
arguments adduced to support the systems which were opposite to
their own. In examining those arguments, they were necessarily
led to consider the difference between a probable and a
demonstrative argument, between a fallacious and a conclusive
one: and Logic, or the science of the general principles of good
and bad reasoning, necessarily arose out of the observations
which a scrutiny of this kind gave occasion to. Though in its
origin posterior both to physics and to ethics, it was commonly
taught, not indeed in all, but in the greater part of the ancient
schools of philosophy, previously to either of those sciences.
The student, it seems to have been thought, to understand well
the difference between good and bad reasoning before he was led
to reason upon subjects of so great importance.
     This ancient division of philosophy into three parts was in
the greater part of the universities of Europe changed for
another into five.
     In the ancient philosophy, whatever was taught concerning
the nature either of the human mind or of the Deity, made a part
of the system of physics. Those beings, in whatever their essence
might be supposed to consist, were parts of the great system of
the universe, and parts, too, productive of the most important
effects. Whatever human reason could either conclude or
conjecture concerning them, made, as it were, two chapters,
though no doubt two very important ones, of the science which
pretended to give an account of the origin and revolutions of the
great system of the universe. But in the universities of Europe,
where philosophy was taught only as subservient to theology, it
was natural to dwell longer upon these two chapters than upon any
other of the science. They were gradually more and more extended,
and were divided into many inferior chapters, till at last the
doctrine of spirits, of which so little can be known, came to
take up as much room in the system of philosophy as the doctrine
of bodies, of which so much can be known. The doctrines
concerning those two subjects were considered as making two
distinct sciences. What are called Metaphysics or Pneumatics were
set in opposition to Physics, and were cultivated not only as the
more sublime, but, for the purposes of a particular profession,
as the more useful science of the two. The proper subject of
experiment and observation, a subject in which a careful
attention is capable of making so many useful discoveries, was
almost entirely neglected. The subject in which, after a few very
simple and almost obvious truths, the most careful attention can
discover nothing but obscurity and uncertainty, and can
consequently produce nothing but subtleties and sophisms, was
greatly cultivated.
     When those two sciences had thus been set in opposition to
one another, the comparison between them naturally gave birth to
a third, to what was called Ontology, or the science which
treated of the qualities and attributes which were common to both
the subjects of the other two sciences. But if subtleties and
sophisms composed the greater part of the Metaphysics or
Pneumatics of the schools, they composed the whole of this cobweb
science of Ontology, which was likewise sometimes called
Metaphysics.
     Wherein consisted the happiness and perfection of a man,
considered not only as an individual, but as the member of a
family, of a state, and of the great society of mankind, was the
object which the ancient moral philosophy proposed to
investigate. In that philosophy the duties of human life were
treated as subservient to the happiness and perfection of human
life. But when moral, as well as natural philosophy, came to be
taught only as subservient to theology, the duties of human life
were treated of as chiefly subservient to the happiness of a life
to come. In the ancient philosophy the perfection of virtue was
represented as necessarily productive, to the person who
possessed it, of the most perfect happiness in this life. In the
modern philosophy it was frequently represented as generally, or
rather as almost always, inconsistent with any degree of
happiness in this life; and heaven was to be earned only by
penance and mortification, by the austerities and abasement of a
monk; not by the liberal, generous, and spirited conduct of a
man. Casuistry and an ascetic morality made up, in most cases,
the greater part of the moral philosophy of the schools. By far
the most important of all the different branches of philosophy
became in this manner by far the most corrupted.
     Such, therefore, was the common course of philosophical
education in the greater part of the universities in Europe.
Logic was taught first: Ontology came in the second place:
Pneumatology, comprehending the doctrine concerning the nature of
the human soul and of the Deity, in the third: in the fourth
followed a debased system of moral philosophy which was
considered as immediately connected with the doctrines of
Pneumatology, with the immortality of the human soul, and with
the rewards and punishments which, from the justice of the Deity,
were to be expected in a life to come: a short and superficial
system of Physics usually concluded the course.
     The alterations which the universities of Europe thus
introduced into the ancient course of philosophy were all meant
for the education of ecclesiastics, and to render it a more
proper introduction to the study of theology. But the additional
quantity of subtlety and sophistry, the casuistry and the ascetic
morality which those alterations introduced into it, certainly
did not render it more proper for the education of gentlemen or
men of the world, or more likely either to improve the
understanding, or to mend the heart.
     This course of philosophy is what still continues to be
taught in the greater part of the universities of Europe, with
more or less diligence, according as the constitution of each
particular university happens to render diligence more or less
necessary to the teachers. In some of the richest and best
endowed universities, the tutors content themselves with teaching
a few unconnected shreds and parcels of this corrupted course;
and even these they commonly teach very negligently and
superficially.
     The improvements which, in modern times, have been made in
several different branches of philosophy have not, the greater
part of them, been made in universities, though some no doubt
have. The greater part of universities have not even been very
forward to adopt those improvements after they were made; and
several of those learned societies have chosen to remain, for a
long time, the sanctuaries in which exploded systems and obsolete
prejudices found shelter and protection after they had been
hunted out of every other corner of the world. In general, the
richest and best endowed universities have been the slowest in
adopting those improvements, and the most averse to permit any
considerable change in the established plan of education. Those
improvements were more easily introduced into some of the poorer
universities, in which the teachers, depending upon their
reputation for the greater part of their subsistence, were
obliged to pay more attention to the current opinions of the
world.
     But though the public schools and universities of Europe
were originally intended only for the education of a particular
profession, that of churchmen; and though they were not always
very diligent in instructing their pupils even in the sciences
which were supposed necessary for that profession, yet they
gradually drew to themselves the education of almost all other
people, particularly of almost all gentlemen and men of fortune.
No better method, it seems, could be fallen upon of spending,
with any advantage, the long interval between infancy and that
period of life at which men begin to apply in good earnest to the
real business of the world, the business which is to employ them
during the remainder of their days. The greater part of what is
taught in schools and universities, however, does not seem to be
the most proper preparation for that business.
     In England it becomes every day more and more the custom to
send young people to travel in foreign countries immediately upon
their leaving school, and without sending them to any university.
Our young people, it is said, generally return home much improved
by their travels. A young man who goes abroad at seventeen or
eighteen, and returns home at one and twenty, returns three or
four years older than he was when he went abroad; and at that age
it is very difficult not to improve a good deal in three or four
years. In the course of his travels he generally acquires some
knowledge of one or two foreign languages; a knowledge, however,
which is seldom sufficient to enable him either to speak or write
them with propriety. In other respects he commonly returns home
more conceited, more unprincipled, more dissipated, and more
incapable of any serious application either to study or to
business than he could well have become in so short a time had he
lived at home. By travelling so very young, by spending in the
most frivolous dissipation the most precious years of his life,
at a distance from the inspection and control of his parents and
relations, every useful habit which the earlier parts of his
education might have had some tendency to form in him, instead of
being riveted and confirmed, is almost necessarily either
weakened or effaced. Nothing but the discredit into which the
universities are allowing themselves to fall could ever have
brought into repute so very absurd a practice as that of
travelling at this early period of life. By sending his son
abroad, a father delivers himself at least for some time, from so
disagreeable an object as that of a son unemployed, neglected,
and going to ruin before his eyes.
     Such have been the effects of some of the modern
institutions for education.
     Different plans and different institutions for education
seem to have taken place in other ages and nations.
     In the republics of ancient Greece, every free citizen was
instructed, under the direction of the public magistrate, in
gymnastic exercises and in music. By gymnastic exercises it was
intended to harden his body, to sharpen his courage, and to
prepare him for the fatigues and dangers of war; and as the Greek
militia was, by all accounts, one of the best that ever was in
the world, this part of their public education must have answered
completely the purpose for which it was intended. By the other
part, music, it was proposed, at least by the philosophers and
historians who have given us an account of those institutions, to
humanize the mind, to soften the temper, and to dispose it for
performing all the social and moral duties both of public and
private life.
     In ancient Rome the exercises of the Campus Martius answered
the purpose as those of the Gymnasium in ancient Greece, and they
seem to have answered it equally well. But among the Romans there
was nothing which corresponded to the musical education of the
Greeks. The morals of the Romans, however, both in private and
public life, seem to have been not only equal, but, upon the
whole, a good deal superior to those of the Greeks. That they
were superior in private life, we have the express testimony of
Polybius and of Dionysius of Halicarnassus, two authors well
acquainted with both nations; and the whole tenor if the Greek
and Roman history bears witness to the superiority of the public
morals of the Romans. The good temper and moderation of
contending factions seems to be the most essential circumstances
in the public morals of a free people. But the factions of the
Greeks were almost always violent and sanguinary; whereas, till
the time of the Gracchi, no blood had ever been shed in any Roman
faction; and from the time of the Gracchi the Roman republic may
be considered as in reality dissolved. Notwithstanding,
therefore, the very respectable authority of Plato, Aristotle,
and Polybius, and notwithstanding the very ingenious reasons by
which Mr. Montesquieu endeavours to support that authority, it
seems probable that the musical education of the Greeks had no
great effect in mending their morals, since, without any such
education, those of the Romans were upon the whole superior. The
respect of those ancient sages for the institutions of their
ancestors had probably disposed them to find much political
wisdom in what was, perhaps, merely an ancient custom, continued
without interruption from the earliest period of those societies
to the times in which they had arrived at a considerable degree
of refinement. Music and dancing are the great amusements of
almost all barbarous nations, and the great accomplishments which
are supposed to fit any man for entertaining his society. It is
so at this day among the negroes on the coast of Africa. It was
so among the ancient Celts, among the ancient Scandinavians, and,
as we may learn from Homer, among the ancient Greeks in the times
preceding the Trojan war. When the Greek tribes had formed
themselves into little republics, it was natural that the study
of those accomplishments should, for a long time, make a part of
the public and common education of the people.
     The masters who instructed the young people, either in music
or in military exercises, do not seem to have been paid, or even
appointed by the state, either in Rome or even in Athens, the
Greek republic of whose laws and customs we are the best
informed. The state required that every free citizen should fit
himself for defending it in war, and should, upon that account,
learn his military exercises. But it left him to learn them of
such masters as he could find, and it seems to have advanced
nothing for this purpose but a public field or place of exercise
in which he should practise and perform them.
     In the early ages both of the Greek and Roman republics, the
other parts of education seem to have consisted in learning to
read, write, and account according to the arithmetic of the
times. These accomplishments the richer citizens seem frequently
to have acquired at home by the assistance of some domestic
pedagogue, who was generally either a slave or a freed-man; and
the poorer citizens, in the schools of such masters as made a
trade of teaching for hire. Such parts of education, however,
were abandoned altogether to the care of the parents or guardians
of each individual. It does not appear that the state ever
assumed any inspection or direction of them. By a law of Solon,
indeed, the children were acquitted from maintaining those
parents in their old age who had neglected to instruct them in
some profitable trade or business.
     In the progress of refinement, when philosophy and rhetoric
came into fashion, the better sort of people used to send their
children to the schools of philosophers and rhetoricians, in
order to be instructed in these fashionable sciences. But those
schools were not supported by the public. They were for a long
time barely tolerated by it. The demand for philosophy and
rhetoric was for a long time so small that the first professed
teachers of either could not find constant employment in any one
city, but were obliged to travel about from place to place. In
this manner lived Zeno of Elea, Protagoras, Gorgias, Hippias, and
many others. As the demand increased, the schools both of
philosophy and rhetoric became stationary; first in Athens, and
afterwards in several other cities. The state, however, seems
never to have encouraged them further than by assigning some of
them a particular place to teach in, which was sometimes done,
too, by private donors. The state seems to have assigned the
Academy to Plato, the Lyceum to Aristotle, and the Portico to
Zeno of Citta, the founder of the Stoics. But Epicurus bequeathed
his gardens to his own school. Till about the time of Marcus
Antonius, however, no teacher appears to have had any salary from
the public, or to have had any other emoluments but what arose
from the honoraries or fees of his scholars. The bounty which
that philosophical emperor, as we learn from Lucian, bestowed
upon one of the teachers of philosophy, probably lasted no longer
than his own life. There was nothing equivalent to the privileges
of graduation, and to have attended any of those schools was not
necessary, in order to be permitted to practise any particular
trade or profession. If the opinion of their own utility could
not draw scholars to them, the law neither forced anybody to go
to them nor rewarded anybody for having gone to them. The
teachers had no jurisdiction over their pupils, nor any other
authority besides that natural authority, which superior virtue
and abilities never fail to procure from young people towards
those who are entrusted with any part of their education.
     At Rome, the study of the civil law made a part of the
education, not of the greater part of the citizens, but of some
particular families. The young people, however, who wished to
acquire knowledge in the law, had no public school to go to, and
had no other method of studying it than by frequenting the
company of such of their relations and friends as were supposed
to understand it. It is perhaps worth while to remark, that
though the Laws of the Twelve Tables were, many of them, copied
from those of some ancient Greek republics, yet law never seems
to have grown up to be a science in any republic of ancient
Greece. In Rome it became a science very early, and gave a
considerable degree of illustration to those citizens who had the
reputation of understanding it. In the republics of ancient
Greece, particularly in Athens, the ordinary courts of justice
consisted of numerous, and therefore disorderly, bodies of
people, who frequently decided almost at random, or as clamour,
faction, and party spirit happened to determine. The ignominy of
an unjust decision, when it was to be divided among five hundred,
a thousand, or fifteen hundred people (for some of their courts
were so very numerous), could not fall very heavy upon any
individual. At Rome, on the contrary, the principal courts of
justice consisted either of a single judge or of a small number
of judges, whose characters, especially as they deliberated
always in public, could not fail to be very much affected by any
rash or unjust decision. In doubtful cases such courts, from
their anxiety to avoid blame, would naturally endeavour to
shelter themselves under the example or precedent of the judges
who had sat before them, either in the same or in some other
court. This attention to practice and precedent necessarily
formed the Roman law into that regular and orderly system in
which it has been delivered down to us; and the like attention
has had the like effects upon the laws of every other country
where such attention has taken place. The superiority of
character in the Romans over that of the Greeks, so much remarked
by Polybius and Dionysius of Halicarnassus, was probably more
owing to the better constitution of their courts of justice than
to any of the circumstances to which those authors ascribe it.
The Romans are said to have been particularly distinguished for
their superior respect to an oath. But the people who were
accustomed to make oath only before some diligent and
well-informed court of justice would naturally be much more
attentive to what they swore than they who were accustomed to do
the same thing before mobbish and disorderly assemblies.
     The abilities, both civil and military, of the Greeks and
Romans will readily be allowed to have been at least equal to
those of any modern nation. Our prejudice is perhaps rather to
overrate them. But except in what related to military exercises,
the state seems to have been at no pains to form those great
abilities, for I cannot be induced to believe that the musical
education of the Greeks could be of much consequence in forming
them. Masters, however, had been found, it seems, for instructing
the better sort of people among those nations in every art and
science in which the circumstances of their society rendered it
necessary or convenient for them to be instructed. The demand for
such instruction produced what it always produces- the talent for
giving it; and the emulation which an unrestrained competition
never fails to excite, appears to have brought that talent to a
very high degree of perfection. In the attention which the
ancient philosophers excited, in the empire which they acquired
over the opinions and principles of their auditors, in the
faculty which they possessed of giving a certain tone and
character to the conduct and conversation of those auditors, they
appear to have been much superior to any modern teachers. In
modern times, the diligence of public teachers is more or less
corrupted by the circumstances which render them more or less
independent of their success and reputation in their particular
professions. Their salaries, too, put the private teacher, who
would pretend to come into competition with them, in the same
state with a merchant who attempts to trade without a bounty in
competition with those who trade with a considerable one. If he
sells his goods at nearly the same price, he cannot have the same
profit, and at least, if not bankruptcy and ruin, will infallibly
be his lot. If he attempts to sell them much dearer, he is likely
to have so few customers that his circumstances will not be much
mended. The privileges of graduation, besides, are in many
countries necessary, or at least extremely convenient, to most
men of learned professions, that is, to the far greater part of
those who have occasion for a learned education. But those
privileges can be obtained only by attending the lectures of the
public teachers. The most careful attendance upon the ablest
instructions of any private teacher cannot always give any title
to demand them. It is from these different causes that the
private teacher of any of the sciences which are commonly taught
in universities is in modern times generally considered as in the
very lowest order of men of letters. A man of real abilities can
scarce find out a more humiliating or a more unprofitable
employment to turn them to. The endowment of schools and colleges
have, in this manner, not only corrupted the diligence of public
teachers, but have rendered it almost impossible to have any good
private ones.
     Were there no public institutions for education, no system,
no science would be taught for which there was not some demand,
or which the circumstances of the times did not render it either
necessary, or convenient, or at least fashionable, to learn. A
private teacher could never find his account in teaching either
an exploded and antiquated system of a science acknowledged to be
useful, or a science universally believed to be a mere useless
and pedantic heap of sophistry and nonsense. Such systems, such
sciences, can subsist nowhere, but in those incorporated
societies for education whose prosperity and revenue are in a
great measure independent of their reputation and altogether
independent of their industry. Were there no public institutions
for education, a gentleman, after going through with application
and abilities the most complete course of education which the
circumstances of the times were supposed to afford, could not
come into the world completely ignorant of everything which is
the common subject of conversation among gentlemen and men of the
world.
     There are no public institutions for the education of women,
and there is accordingly nothing useless, absurd, or fantastical
in the common course of their education. They are taught what
their parents or guardians judge it necessary or useful for them
to learn, and they are taught nothing else. Every part of their
education tends evidently to some useful purpose; either to
improve the natural attractions of their person, or to form their
mind to reserve, to modesty, to chastity, and to economy; to
render them both likely to become the mistresses of a family, and
to behave properly when they have become such. In every part of
her life a woman feels some conveniency or advantage from every
part of her education. It seldom happens that a man, in any part
of his life, derives any conveniency or advantage from some of
the most laborious and troublesome parts of his education.
     Ought the public, therefore, to give no attention, it may be
asked, to the education of the people? Or if it ought to give
any, what are the different parts of education which it ought to
attend to in the different orders of the people? and in what
manner ought it to attend to them?
     In some cases the state of the society necessarily places
the greater part of individuals in such situations as naturally
form in them, without any attention of government, almost all the
abilities and virtues which that state requires, or perhaps can
admit of. In other cases the state of the society does not place
the part of individuals in such situations, and some attention of
government is necessary in order to prevent the almost entire
corruption and degeneracy of the great body of the people.
     In the progress of the division of labour, the employment of
the far greater part of those who live by labour, that is, of the
great body of the people, comes to be confined to a few very
simple operations, frequently to one or two. But the
understandings of the greater part of men are necessarily formed
by their ordinary employments. The man whose whole life is spent
in performing a few simple operations, of which the effects are
perhaps always the same, or very nearly the same, has no occasion
to exert his understanding or to exercise his invention in
finding out expedients for removing difficulties which never
occur. He naturally loses, therefore, the habit of such exertion,
and generally becomes as stupid and ignorant as it is possible
for a human creature to become. The torpor of his mind renders
him not only incapable of relishing or bearing a part in any
rational conversation, but of conceiving any generous, noble, or
tender sentiment, and consequently of forming any just judgment
concerning many even of the ordinary duties of private life. Of
the great and extensive interests of his country he is altogether
incapable of judging, and unless very particular pains have been
taken to render him otherwise, he is equally incapable of
defending his country in war. The uniformity of his stationary
life naturally corrupts the courage of his mind, and makes him
regard with abhorrence the irregular, uncertain, and adventurous
life of a soldier. It corrupts even the activity of his body, and
renders him incapable of exerting his strength with vigour and
perseverance in any other employment than that to which he has
been bred. His dexterity at his own particular trade seems, in
this manner, to be acquired at the expense of his intellectual,
social, and martial virtues. But in every improved and civilised
society this is the state into which the labouring poor, that is,
the great body of the people, must necessarily fall, unless
government takes some pains to prevent it.
     It is otherwise in the barbarous societies, as they are
commonly called, of hunters, of shepherds, and even of husbandmen
in that rude state of husbandry which precedes the improvement of
manufactures and the extension of foreign commerce. In such
societies the varied occupations of every man oblige every man to
exert his capacity and to invent expedients for removing
difficulties which are continually occurring. Invention is kept
alive, and the mind is not suffered to fall into that drowsy
stupidity which, in a civilised society, seems to benumb the
understanding of almost all the inferior ranks of people. In
those barbarous societies, as they are called, every man, it has
already been observed, is a warrior. Every man, too, is in some
measure a statesman, and can form a tolerable judgment concerning
the interest of the society and the conduct of those who govern
it. How far their chiefs are good judges in peace, or good
leaders in war, is obvious to the observation of almost every
single man among them. In such a society, indeed, no man can well
acquire that improved and refined understanding which a few men
sometimes possess in a more civilised state. Though in a rude
society there is a good deal of variety in the occupations of
every individual, there is not a great deal in those of the whole
society. Every man does, or is capable of doing, almost every
thing which any other man does, or is capable of doing. Every man
has a considerable degree of knowledge, ingenuity, and invention:
but scarce any man has a great degree. The degree, however, which
is commonly possessed, is generally sufficient for conducting the
whole simple business of the society. In a civilised state, on
the contrary, though there is little variety in the occupations
of the greater part of individuals, there is an almost infinite
variety in those of the whole society. These varied occupations
present an almost infinite variety of objects to the
contemplation of those few, who, being attached to no particular
occupation themselves, have leisure and inclination to examine
the occupations of other people. The contemplation of so great a
variety of objects necessarily exercises their minds in endless
comparisons and combinations, and renders their understandings,
in an extraordinary degree, both acute and comprehensive. Unless
those few, however, happen to be placed in some very particular
situations, their great abilities, though honourable to
themselves, may contribute very little to the good government or
happiness of their society. Notwithstanding the great abilities
of those few, all the nobler parts of the human character may be,
in a great measure, obliterated and extinguished in the great
body of the people.
     The education of the common people requires, perhaps, in a
civilised and commercial society the attention of the public more
than that of people of some rank and fortune. People of some rank
and fortune are generally eighteen or nineteen years of age
before they enter upon that particular business, profession, or
trade, by which they propose to distinguish themselves in the
world. They have before that full time to acquire, or at least to
fit themselves for afterwards acquiring, every accomplishment
which can recommend them to the public esteem, or render them
worthy of it. Their parents or guardians are generally
sufficiently anxious that they should be so accomplished, and
are, in most cases, willing enough to lay out the expense which
is necessary for that purpose. If they are not always properly
educated, it is seldom from the want of expense laid out upon
their education, but from the improper application of that
expense. It is seldom from the want of masters, but from the
negligence and incapacity of the masters who are to be had, and
from the difficulty, or rather from the impossibility, which
there is in the present state of things of finding any better.
The employments, too, in which people of some rank or fortune
spend the greater part of their lives are not, like those of the
common people, simple and uniform. They are almost all of them
extremely complicated, and such as exercise the head more than
the hands. The understandings of those who are engaged in such
employments can seldom grow torpid for want of exercise. The
employments of people of some rank and fortune, besides, are
seldom such as harass them from morning to night. They generally
have a good deal of leisure, during which they may perfect
themselves in every branch either of useful or ornamental
knowledge of which they may have laid the foundation, or for
which they may have acquired some taste in the earlier part of
life.
     It is otherwise with the common people. They have little
time to spare for education. Their parents can scarce afford to
maintain them even in infancy. As soon as they are able to work
they must apply to some trade by which they can earn their
subsistence. That trade, too, is generally so simple and uniform
as to give little exercise to the understanding, while, at the
same time, their labour is both so constant and so severe, that
it leaves them little leisure and less inclination to apply to,
or even to think of, anything else.
     But though the common people cannot, in any civilised
society, be so well instructed as people of some rank and
fortune, the most essential parts of education, however, to read,
write, and account, can be acquired at so early a period of life
that the greater part even of those who are to be bred to the
lowest occupations have time to acquire them before they can be
employed in those occupations. For a very small expense the
public can facilitate, can encourage, and can even impose upon
almost the whole body of the people the necessity of acquiring
those most essential parts of education.
     The public can facilitate this acquisition by establishing
in every parish or district a little school, where children may
be taught for a reward so moderate that even a common labourer
may afford it; the master being partly, but not wholly, paid by
the public, because, if he was wholly, or even principally, paid
by it, he would soon learn to neglect his business. In Scotland
the establishment of such parish schools has taught almost the
whole common people to read, and a very great proportion of them
to write and account. In England the establishment of charity
schools has had an effect of the same kind, though not so
universally, because the establishment is not so universal. If in
those little schools the books, by which the children are taught
to read, were a little more instructive than they commonly are,
and if, instead of a little smattering of Latin, which the
children of the common people are sometimes taught there, and
which can scarce ever be of any use to them, they were instructed
in the elementary parts of geometry and mechanics, the literary
education of this rank of people would perhaps be as complete as
it can be. There is scarce a common trade which does not afford
some opportunities of applying to it the principles of geometry
and mechanics, and which would not therefore gradually exercise
and improve the common people in those principles, the necessary
introduction to the most sublime as well as to the most useful
sciences.
     The public can encourage the acquisition of those most
essential parts of education by giving small premiums, and little
badges of distinction, to the children of the common people who
excel in them.
     The public can impose upon almost the whole body of the
people the necessity of acquiring those most essential parts of
education, by obliging every man to undergo an examination or
probation in them before he can obtain the freedom in any
corporation, or be allowed to set up any trade either in a
village or town corporate.
     It was in this manner, by facilitating the acquisition of
their military and gymnastic exercises, by encouraging it, and
even by imposing upon the whole body of the people the necessity
of learning those exercises, that the Greek and Roman republics
maintained the martial spirit of their respective citizens. They
facilitated the acquisition of those exercises by appointing a
certain place for learning and practising them, and by granting
to certain masters the privilege of teaching in that place. Those
masters do not appear to have had either salaries or exclusive
privileges of any kind. Their reward consisted altogether in what
they got from their scholars; and a citizen who had learnt his
exercises in the public gymnasia had no sort of legal advantage
over one who had learnt them privately, provided the latter had
learnt them equally well. Those republics encouraged the
acquisition of those exercises by bestowing little premiums and
badges of distinction upon: those who excelled in them. To have
gained a prize in the Olympic, Isthmian, or Nemaean games, gave
illustration, not only to the person who gained it, but to his
whole family and kindred. The obligation which every citizen was
under to serve a certain number of years, if called upon, in the
armies of the republic, sufficiently imposed the necessity of
learning those exercises, without which he could not be fit for
that service.
     That in the progress of improvement the practice of military
exercises, unless government takes proper pains to support it,
goes gradually to decay, and, together with it, the martial
spirit of the great body of the people, the example of modern
Europe sufficiently demonstrates. But the security of every
society must always depend, more or less, upon the martial spirit
of the great body of the people. In the present times, indeed,
that martial spirit alone, and unsupported by a well-disciplined
standing army, would not perhaps be sufficient for the defence
and security of any society. But where every citizen had the
spirit of a soldier, a smaller standing army would surely be
requisite. That spirit, besides, would necessarily diminish very
much the dangers to liberty, whether real or imaginary, which are
commonly apprehended from a standing army. As it would very much
facilitate the operations of that army against a foreign invader,
so it would obstruct them as much if, unfortunately, they should
ever be directed against the constitution of the state.
     The ancient institutions of Greece and Rome seem to have
been much more effectual for maintaining the martial spirit of
the great body of the people than the establishment of what are
called the militias of modern times. They were much more simple.
When they were once established they executed themselves, and it
required little or no attention from government to maintain them
in the most perfect vigour. Whereas to maintain, even in
tolerable execution, the complex regulations of any modern
militia, requires the continual and painful attention of
government, without which they are constantly falling into total
neglect and disuse. The influence, besides, of the ancient
institutions was much more universal. By means of them the whole
body of the people was completely instructed in the use of arms.
Whereas it is but a very small part of them who can ever be so
instructed by the regulations of any modern militia, except,
perhaps, that of Switzerland. But a coward, a man incapable
either of defending or of revenging himself, evidently wants one
of the most essential parts of the character of a man. He is as
much mutilated and deformed in his mind as another is in his
body, who is either deprived of some of its most essential
members, or has lost the use of them. He is evidently the more
wretched and miserable of the two; because happiness and misery,
which reside altogether in the mind, must necessarily depend more
upon the healthful or unhealthful, the mutilated or entire state
of the mind, than upon that of the body. Even though the martial
spirit of the people were of no use towards the defence of the
society, yet to prevent that sort of mental mutilation,
deformity, and wretchedness, which cowardice necessarily involves
in it, from spreading themselves through the great body of the
people, would still deserve the most serious attention of
government, in the same manner as it would deserve its most
serious attention to prevent a leprosy or any other loathsome and
offensive disease, though neither mortal nor dangerous, from
spreading itself among them, though perhaps no other public good
might result from such attention besides the prevention of so
great a public evil.
     The same thing may be said of the gross ignorance and
stupidity which, in a civilised society, seem so frequently to
benumb the understandings of all the inferior ranks of people. A
man without the proper use of the intellectual faculties of a
man, is, if possible, more contemptible than even a coward, and
seems to be mutilated and deformed in a still more essential part
of the character of human nature. Though the state was to derive
no advantage from the instruction of the inferior ranks of
people, it would still deserve its attention that they should not
be altogether uninstructed. The state, however, derives no
inconsiderable advantage from their instruction. The more they
are instructed the less liable they are to the delusions of
enthusiasm and superstition, which, among ignorant nations,
frequently occasion the most dreadful disorders. An instructed
and intelligent people, besides, are always more decent and
orderly than an ignorant and stupid one. They feel themselves,
each individually, more respectable and more likely to obtain the
respect of their lawful superiors, and they are therefore more
disposed to respect those superiors. They are more disposed to
examine, and more capable of seeing through, the interested
complaints of faction and sedition, and they are, upon that
account, less apt to be misled into any wanton or unnecessary
opposition to the measures of government. In free countries,
where the safety of government depends very much upon the
favourable judgment which the people may form of its conduct, it
must surely be of the highest importance that they should not be
disposed to judge rashly or capriciously concerning it. 
                          ARTICLE III    Of the Expense of the
Institutions for the Instruction of
                      People of all Ages 
     The institutions for the instruction of people of all ages
are chiefly those for religious instruction. This is a species of
instruction of which the object is not so much to render the
people good citizens in this world, as to prepare them for
another and a better world in a life to come. The teachers of the
doctrine which contains this instruction, in the same manner as
other teachers, may either depend altogether for their
subsistence upon the voluntary contributions of their hearers, or
they may derive it from some other fund to which the law of their
country may entitle them; such as a landed estate, a tithe or
land tax, an established salary or stipend. Their exertion, their
zeal and industry, are likely to be much greater in the former
situation than in the latter. In this respect the teachers of new
religions have always had a considerable advantage in attacking
those ancient and established systems of which the clergy,
reposing themselves upon their benefices, had neglected to keep
up the fervour of faith and devotion in the great body of the
people, and having given themselves up to indolence, were become
altogether incapable of making any vigorous exertion in defence
even of their own establishment. The clergy of an established and
well-endowed religion frequently become men of learning and
elegance, who possess all the virtues of gentlemen, or which can
recommend them to the esteem of gentlemen: but they are apt
gradually to lose the qualities, both good and bad, which gave
them authority and influence with the inferior ranks of people,
and which had perhaps been the original causes of the success and
establishment of their religion. Such a clergy, when attacked by
a set of popular and bold, though perhaps stupid and ignorant
enthusiasts, feel themselves as perfectly defenceless as the
indolent, effeminate, and full-fed nations of the southern parts
of Asia when they were invaded by the active, hardy, and hungry
Tartars of the North. Such a clergy, upon such an emergency, have
commonly no other resource than to call upon the civil magistrate
to persecute, destroy or drive out their adversaries, as
disturbers of the public peace. It was thus that the Roman
Catholic clergy called upon the civil magistrates to persecute
the Protestants, and the Church of England to persecute the
Dissenters; and that in general every religious sect, when it has
once enjoyed for a century or two the security of a legal
establishment, has found itself incapable of making any vigorous
defence against any new sect which chose to attack its doctrine
or discipline. Upon such occasions the advantage in point of
learning and good writing may sometimes be on the side of the
established church. But the arts of popularity, all the arts of
gaining proselytes, are constantly on the side of its
adversaries. In England those arts have been long neglected by
the well-endowed clergy of the established church, and are at
present chiefly cultivated by the Dissenters and by the
Methodists. The independent provisions, however, which in many
places have been made for dissenting teachers by means of
voluntary subscriptions, of trust rights, and other evasions of
the law, seem very much to have abated the zeal and activity of
those teachers. They have many of them become very learned,
ingenious, and respectable men; but they have in general ceased
to be very popular preachers. The Methodists, without half the
learning of the Dissenters, are much more in vogue.
     In the Church of Rome, the industry and zeal of the inferior
clergy are kept more alive by the powerful motive of
self-interest than perhaps in any established Protestant church.
The parochial clergy derive, many of them, a very considerable
part of their subsistence from the voluntary oblations of the
people; a source of revenue which confession gives them many
opportunities of improving. The mendicant orders derive their
whole subsistence from such oblations. It is with them as with
the hussars and light infantry of some armies; no plunder, no
pay. The parochial clergy are like those teachers whose reward
depends partly upon their salary, and partly upon the fees or
honoraries which they get from their pupils, and these must
always depend more or less upon their industry and reputation.
The mendicant orders are like those teachers whose subsistence
depends altogether upon the industry. They are obliged,
therefore, to use every art which can animate the devotion of the
common people. The establishment of the two great mendicant
orders of St. Dominic and St. Francis, it is observed by
Machiavel, revived, in the thirteenth and fourteenth centuries,
the languishing faith and devotion of the Catholic Church. In
Roman Catholic countries the spirit of devotion is supported
altogether by the monks and by the poorer parochial clergy. The
great dignitaries of the church, with all the accomplishments of
gentlemen and men of the world, and sometimes with those of men
of learning, are careful enough to maintain the necessary
discipline over their inferiors, but seldom give themselves any
trouble about the instruction of the people.
     "Most of the arts and professions in a state," says by far
the most illustrious philosopher and historian of the present
age, "are of such a nature that, while they promote the interests
of the society, they are also useful or agreeable to some
individuals; and in that case, the constant rule of the
magistrate, except perhaps on the first introduction of any art,
is to leave the profession to itself, and trust its encouragement
to the individuals who reap the benefit of it. The artisans,
finding their profits to rise by the favour of their customers,
increase as much as possible their skill and industry; and as
matters are not disturbed by any injudicious tampering, the
commodity is always sure to be at all times nearly proportioned
to the demand.
     "But there are also some callings, which, though useful and
even necessary in a state, bring no advantage or pleasure to any
individual, and the supreme power is obliged to alter its conduct
with regard to the retainers of those professions. It must give
them public encouragement in order to their subsistence, and it
must provide against that negligence to which they will naturally
be subject, either by annexing particular honours to the
profession, by establishing a long subordination of ranks and a
strict dependence, or by some other expedient. The persons
employed in the finances, fleets, and magistracy, are instances
of this order of men.
     "It may naturally be thought, at first sight, that the
ecclesiastics belong to the first class, and that their
encouragement, as well as that of lawyers and physicians, may
safely be entrusted to the liberality of individuals, who are
attached to their doctrines, and who find benefit or consolation
from their spiritual ministry and assistance. Their industry and
vigilance will, no doubt, be whetted by such an additional
motive; and their skill in the profession, as well as their
address in governing the minds of the people, must receive daily
increase from their increasing practice, study, and attention.
     "But if we consider the matter more closely, we shall find
that this interested diligence of the clergy is what every wise
legislator will study to prevent; because in every religion
except the true it is highly pernicious, and it has even a
natural tendency to pervert the true, by infusing into it a
strong mixture of superstition, folly, and delusion. Each ghostly
practitioner, in order to render himself more precious and sacred
in the eyes of his retainers, will inspire them with the most
violent abhorrence of all other sects, and continually endeavour,
by some novelty, to excite the languid devotion of his audience.
No regard will be paid to truth, morals, or decency in the
doctrines inculcated. Every tenet will be adopted that best suits
the disorderly affections of the human frame. Customers will be
drawn to each conventicle by new industry and address in
practising on the passions and credulity of the populace. And in
the end, the civil magistrate will find that he has dearly paid
for his pretended frugality, in saving a fixed establishment for
the priests; and that in reality the most decent and advantageous
composition which he can make with the spiritual guides, is to
bribe their indolence by assigning stated salaries to their
profession, and rendering it superfluous for them to be farther
active than merely to prevent their flock from straying in quest
of new pastures. And in this manner ecclesiastical
establishments, though commonly they arose at first from
religious views, prove in the end advantageous to the political
interests of society."
     But whatever may have been the good or bad effects of the
independent provision of the clergy, it has, perhaps, been very
seldom bestowed upon them from any view to those effects. Times
of violent religious controversy have generally been times of
equally violent political faction. Upon such occasions, each
political party has either found it, or imagined it, for its
interest to league itself with some one or other of the
contending religious sects. But this could be done only by
adopting, or at least by favouring, the tenets of that particular
sect. The sect which had the good fortune to be leagued with the
conquering party necessarily shared in the victory of its ally,
by whose favour and protection it was soon enabled in some degree
to silence and subdue all its adversaries. Those adversaries had
generally leagued themselves with the enemies of the conquering
party, and were therefore the enemies of that party. The clergy
of this particular sect having thus become complete masters of
the field, and their influence and authority with the great body
of the people being in its highest vigour, they were powerful
enough to overawe the chiefs and leaders of their own party, and
to oblige the civil magistrate to respect their opinions and
inclinations. Their first demand was generally that he should
silence and subdue an their adversaries: and their second, that
he should bestow an independent provision on themselves. As they
had generally contributed a good deal to the victory, it seemed
not unreasonable that they should have some share in the spoil.
They were weary, besides, of humouring the people, and of
depending upon their caprice for a subsistence. In making this
demand, therefore, they consulted their own ease and comfort,
without troubling themselves about the effect which it might have
in future times upon the influence and authority of their order.
The civil magistrate, who could comply with this demand only by
giving them something which he would have chosen much rather to
take, or to keep to himself, was seldom very forward to grant it.
Necessity, however, always forced him to submit at last, though
frequently not till after many delays, evasions, and affected
excuses.
     But if politics had never called in the aid of religion, had
the conquering party never adopted the tenets of one sect more
than those of another when it had gained the victory, it would
probably have dealt equally and impartially with all the
different sects, and have allowed every man to choose his own
priest and his own religion as he thought proper. There would in
this case, no doubt' have been a great multitude of religious
sects. Almost every different congregation might probably have
made a little sect by itself, or have entertained some peculiar
tenets of its own. Each teacher would no doubt have felt himself
under the necessity of making the utmost exertion and of using
every art both to preserve and to increase the number of his
disciples. But as every other teacher would have felt himself
under the same necessity, the success of no one teacher, or sect
of teachers, could have been very great. The interested and
active zeal of religious teachers can be dangerous and
troublesome only where there is either but one sect tolerated in
the society, or where the whole of a large society is divided
into two or three great sects; the teachers of each acting by
concert, and under a regular discipline and subordination. But
that zeal must be altogether innocent where the society is
divided into two or three hundred, or perhaps into as many
thousand small sects, of which no one could be considerable
enough to disturb the public tranquility. The teachers of each
sect, seeing themselves surrounded on all sides with more
adversaries than friends, would be obliged to learn that candour
and moderation which is so seldom to be found among the teachers
of those great sects whose tenets, being supported by the civil
magistrate, are held in veneration by almost all the inhabitants
of extensive kingdoms and empires, and who therefore see nothing
round them but followers, disciples, and humble admirers. The
teachers of each little sect, finding themselves almost alone,
would be obliged to respect those of almost every other sect, and
the concessions which they would mutually find it both convenient
and agreeable to make to one another, might in time probably
reduce the doctrine of the greater part of them to that pure and
rational religion, free from every mixture of absurdity,
imposture, or fanaticism, such as wise men have in all ages of
the world wished to see established; but such as positive law has
perhaps never yet established, and probably never will establish,
in any country: because, with regard to religion, positive law
always has been, and probably always will be, more or less
influenced by popular superstition and enthusiasm. This plan of
ecclesiastical government, or more properly of no ecclesiastical
government, was what the sect called Independents, a sect no
doubt of very wild enthusiasts, proposed to establish in England
towards the end of the civil war. If it had been established,
though of a very unphilosophical origin, it would probably by
this time have been productive of the most philosophical good
temper and moderation with regard to every sort of religious
principle. It has been established in Pennsylvania, where, though
the Quakers happen to be the most numerous, the law in reality
favours no one sect more than another, and it is there said to
have been productive of this philosophical good temper and
moderation.
     But though this equality of treatment should not be
productive of this good temper and moderation in all, or even in
the greater part of the religious sects of a particular country,
yet provided those sects were sufficiently numerous, and each of
them consequently too small to disturb the public tranquillity,
the excessive zeal of each for its particular tenets could not
well be productive of any very harmful effects, but, on the
contrary, of several good ones: and if the government was
perfectly decided both to let them all alone, and to oblige them
all to let alone one another, there is little danger that they
would not of their own accord subdivide themselves fast enough so
as soon to become sufficiently numerous.
     In every civilised society, in every society where the
distinction of ranks has once been completely established, there
have been always two different schemes or systems of morality
current at the same time; of which the one may be called the
strict or austere; the other the liberal, or, if you will, the
loose system. The former is generally admired and revered by the
common people: the latter is commonly more esteemed and adopted
by what are called people of fashion. The degree of
disapprobation with which we ought to mark the vices of levity,
the vices which are apt to arise from great prosperity, and from
the excess of gaiety and good humour, seems to constitute the
principal distinction between those two opposite schemes or
systems. In the liberal or loose system, luxury, wanton and even
disorderly mirth, the pursuit of pleasure to some degree of
intemperance, the breach of chastity, at least in one of the two
sexes, etc., provided they are not accompanied with gross
indecency, and do not lead to falsehood or injustice, are
generally treated with a good deal of indulgence, and are easily
either excused or pardoned altogether. In the austere system, on
the contrary, those excesses are regarded with the utmost
abhorrence and detestation. The vices of levity are always
ruinous to the common people, and a single week's thoughtlessness
and dissipation is often sufficient to undo a poor workman for
ever, and to drive him through despair upon committing the most
enormous crimes. The wiser and better sort of the common people,
therefore, have always the utmost abhorrence and detestation of
such excesses, which their experience tells them are so
immediately fatal to people of their condition. The disorder and
extravagance of several years, on the contrary, will not always
ruin a man of fashion, and people of that rank are very apt to
consider the power of indulging in some degree of excess as one
of the advantages of their fortune, and the liberty of doing so
without censure or reproach as one of the privileges which belong
to their station. In people of their own station, therefore, they
regard such excesses with but a small degree of disapprobation,
and censure them either very slightly or not at all.
     Almost all religious sects have begun among the common
people, from whom they have generally drawn their earliest as
well as their most numerous proselytes. The austere system of
morality has, accordingly, been adopted by those sects almost
constantly, or with very few exceptions; for there have been
some. It was the system by which they could best recommend
themselves to that order of people to whom they first proposed
their plan of reformation upon what had been before established.
Many of them, perhaps the greater part of them, have even
endeavoured to gain credit by refining upon this austere system,
and by carrying it to some degree of folly and extravagance; and
this excessive rigour has frequently recommended them more than
anything else to the respect and veneration of the common people.
     A man of rank and fortune is by his station the
distinguished member of a great society, who attend to every part
of his conduct, and who thereby oblige him to attend to every
part of it himself. His authority and consideration depend very
much upon the respect which this society bears to him. He dare
not do anything which would disgrace or discredit him in it, and
he is obliged to a very strict observation of that species of
morals, whether liberal or austere, which the general consent of
this society prescribes to persons of his rank and fortune. A man
of low condition, on the contrary, is far from being a
distinguished member of any great society. While he remains in a
country village his conduct may be attended to, and he may be
obliged to attend to it himself. In this situation, and in this
situation only, he may have what is called a character to lose.
But as soon as he comes into a great city he is sunk in obscurity
and darkness. His conduct is observed and attended to by nobody,
and he is therefore very likely to neglect it himself, and to
abandon himself to every sort of low profligacy and vice. He
never emerges so effectually from this obscurity, his conduct
never excites so much the attention of any respectable society,
as by his becoming the member of a small religious sect. He from
that moment acquires a degree of consideration which he never had
before. All his brother sectaries are, for the credit of the
sect, interested to observe his conduct, and if he gives occasion
to any scandal, if he deviates very much from those austere
morals which they almost always require of one another, to punish
him by what is always a very severe punishment, even where no
civil effects attend it, expulsion or excommunication from the
sect. In little religious sects, accordingly, the morals of the
common people have been almost always remarkably regular and
orderly; generally much more so than in the established church.
The morals of those little sects, indeed, have frequently been
rather disagreeably rigorous and unsocial.
     There are two very easy and effectual remedies, however, by
whose joint operation the state might, without violence, correct
whatever was unsocial or disagreeably rigorous in the morals of
all the little sects into which the country was divided.
     The first of those remedies is the study of science and
philosophy, which the state might render almost universal among
all people of middling or more than middling rank and fortune;
not by giving salaries to teachers in order to make them
negligent and idle, but by instituting some sort of probation,
even in the higher and more difficult sciences, to be undergone
by every person before he was permitted to exercise any liberal
profession, or before he could be received as a candidate for any
honourable office of trust or profit. If the state imposed upon
this order of men the necessity of learning, it would have no
occasion to give itself any trouble about providing them with
proper teachers. They would soon find better teachers for
themselves than any whom the state could provide for them.
Science is the great antidote to the poison of enthusiasm and
superstition; and where all the superior ranks of people were
secured from it, the inferior ranks could not be much exposed to
it.
     The second of those remedies is the frequency and gaiety of
public diversions. The state, by encouraging, that is by giving
entire liberty to all those who for their own interest would
attempt without scandal or indecency, to amuse and divert the
people by painting, poetry, music, dancing; by all sorts of
dramatic representations and exhibitions, would easily dissipate,
in the greater part of them, that melancholy and gloomy humour
which is almost always the nurse of popular superstition and
enthusiasm. Public diversions have always been the objects of
dread and hatred to all the fanatical promoters of those popular
frenzies. The gaiety and good humour which those diversions
inspire were altogether inconsistent with that temper of mind
which was fittest for their purpose, or which they could best
work upon. Dramatic representations, besides, frequently exposing
their artifices to public ridicule, and sometimes even to public
execration, were upon that account, more than all other
diversions, the objects of their peculiar abhorrence.
     In a country where the law favoured the teachers of no one
religion more than those of another, it would not be necessary
that any of them should have any particular or immediate
dependency upon the sovereign or executive power; or that he
should have anything to do either in appointing or in dismissing
them from their offices. In such a situation he would have no
occasion to give himself any concern about them, further than to
keep the peace among them in the same manner as among the rest of
his subjects; that is, to hinder them from persecuting, abusing,
or oppressing one another. But it is quite otherwise in countries
where there is an established or governing religion. The
sovereign can in this case never be secure unless he has the
means of influencing in a considerable degree the greater part of
the teachers of that religion.
     The clergy of every established church constitute a great
incorporation. They can act in concert, and pursue their interest
upon one plan and with one spirit, as much as if they were under
the direction of one man; and they are frequently, too, under
such direction. Their interest as an incorporated body is never
the same with that of the sovereign, and is sometimes directly
opposite to it. Their great interest is to maintain their
authority with the people; and this authority depends upon the
supposed certainty and importance of the whole doctrine which
they inculcate, and upon the supposed necessity of adopting every
part of it with the most implicit faith, in order to avoid
eternal misery. Should the sovereign have the imprudence to
appear either to deride or doubt himself of the most trifling
part of their doctrine, or from humanity attempt to protect those
who did either the one or the other, the punctilious honour of a
clergy who have no sort of dependency upon him is immediately
provoked to proscribe him as a profane person, and to employ all
the terrors of religion in order to oblige the people to transfer
their allegiance to some more orthodox and obedient prince.
Should he oppose any of their pretensions or usurpations, the
danger is equally great. The princes who have dared in this
manner to rebel against the church, over and above this crime of
rebellion have generally been charged, too, with the additional
crime of heresy, notwithstanding their solemn protestations of
their faith and humble submission to every tenet which she
thought proper to prescribe to them. But the authority of
religion is superior to every other authority. The fears which it
suggests conquer all other fears. When the authorized teachers of
religion propagate through the great body of the people doctrines
subversive of the authority of the sovereign, it is by violence
only, or by the force of a standing army, that he can maintain
his authority. Even a standing army cannot in this case give him
any lasting security; because if the soldiers are not foreigners,
which can seldom be the case, but drawn from the great body of
the people, which must almost always be the case, they are likely
to be soon corrupted by those very doctrines. The revolutions
which the turbulence of the Greek clergy was continually
occasioning at Constantinople, as long as the eastern empire
subsisted; the convulsions which, during the course of several
centuries, the turbulence of the Roman clergy was continually
occasioning in every part of Europe, sufficiently demonstrate how
precarious and insecure must always be the situation of the
sovereign who has no proper means of influencing the clergy of
the established and governing religion of his country.
     Articles of faith, as well as all other spiritual matters,
it is evident enough, are not within the proper department of a
temporal sovereign, who, though he may be very well qualified for
protecting, is seldom supposed to be so for instructing the
people. With regard to such matters, therefore, his authority can
seldom be sufficient to counterbalance the united authority of
the clergy of the established church. The public tranquillity,
however, and his own security, may frequently depend upon the
doctrines which they may think proper to propagate concerning
such matters. As he can seldom directly oppose their decision,
therefore, with proper weight and authority, it is necessary that
he should be able to influence it; and be can influence it only
by the fears and expectations which he may excite in the greater
part of the individuals of the order. Those fears and
expectations may consist in the fear of deprivation or other
punishment, and in the expectation of further preferment.
     In all Christian churches the benefices of the clergy are a
sort of freeholds which they enjoy, not during pleasure, but
during life or good behaviour. If they held them by a more
precarious tenure, and were liable to be turned out upon every
slight disobligation either of the sovereign or of his ministers,
it would perhaps be impossible for them to maintain their
authority with the people, who would then consider them as
mercenary dependents upon the court, in the security of whose
instructions they could no longer have any confidence. But should
the sovereign attempt irregularly, and by violence, to deprive
any number of clergymen of their freeholds, on account, perhaps,
of their having propagated, with more than ordinary zeal, some
factious or seditious doctrine, he would only render, by such
persecution, both them and their doctrine ten times more popular,
and therefore ten times more troublesome and dangerous, than they
had been before. Fear is in almost all cases a wretched
instrument of government, and ought in particular never to be
employed against any order of men who have the smallest
pretensions to independency. To attempt to terrify them serves
only to irritate their bad humour, and to confirm them in an
opposition which more gentle usage perhaps might easily induce
them either to soften or to lay aside altogether. The violence
which the French government usually employed in order to oblige
all their parliaments, or sovereign courts of justice, to
enregister any unpopular edict, very seldom succeeded. The means
commonly employed, however, the imprisonment of all the
refractory members, one would think were forcible enough. The
princes of the house of Stewart sometimes employed the like means
in order to influence some of the members of the Parliament of
England; and they generally found them equally intractable. The
Parliament of England is now managed in another manner; and a
very small experiment which the Duke of Choiseul made about
twelve years ago upon the Parliament of Paris, demonstrated
sufficiently that all the parliaments of France might have been
managed still more easily in the same manner. That experiment was
not pursued. For though management and persuasion are always the
easiest and the safest instruments of governments, as force and
violence are the worst and the most dangerous, yet such, it
seems, is the natural insolence of man that he almost always
disdains to use the good instrument, except when he cannot or
dare not use the bad one. The French government could and durst
use force, and therefore disdained to use management and
persuasion. But there is no order of men, it appears, I believe,
from the experience of all ages, upon whom it is so dangerous, or
rather so perfectly ruinous, to employ force and violence, as
upon the respected clergy of any established church. The rights,
the privileges, the personal liberty of every individual
ecclesiastic who is upon good terms with his own order are, even
in the most despotic governments, more respected than those of
any other person of nearly equal rank and fortune. It is so in
every gradation of despotism, from that of the gentle and mild
government of Paris to that of the violent and furious government
of Constantinople. But though this order of men can scarce ever
be forced, they may be managed as easily as any other; and the
security of the sovereign, as well as the public tranquillity,
seems to depend very much upon the means which he has of managing
them; and those means seem to consist altogether in the
preferment which he has to bestow upon them.
     In the ancient constitution of the Christian church, the
bishop of each diocese was elected by the joint votes of the
clergy and of the people of the episcopal city. The people did
not long retain their right of election; and while they did
retain it, they almost always acted under the influence of the
clergy, who in such spiritual matters appeared to be their
natural guides. The clergy, however, soon grew weary of the
trouble of managing them, and found it easier to elect their own
bishops themselves. The abbot, in the same manner, was elected by
the monks of the monastery, at least in the greater part of the
abbacies. All the inferior ecclesiastical benefices comprehended
within the diocese were collated by the bishop, who bestowed them
upon such ecclesiastics as he thought proper. All church
preferments were in this manner in the disposal of the church.
The sovereign, though he might have some indirect influence in
those elections, and though it was sometimes usual to ask both
his consent to elect and his approbation of the election, yet had
no direct or sufficient means of managing the clergy. The
ambition of every clergyman naturally led him to pay court not so
much to his sovereign as to his own order, from which only he
could expect preferment.
     Through the greater part of Europe the Pope gradually drew
to himself first the collation of almost all bishoprics and
abbacies, or of what were called Consistorial benefices, and
afterwards, by various machinations and pretences, of the greater
part of inferior benefices comprehended within each diocese;
little more being left to the bishop than what was barely
necessary to give him a decent authority with his own clergy. By
this arrangement the condition of the sovereign was still worse
than it had been before. The clergy of all the different
countries of Europe were thus formed into a sort of spiritual
army, dispersed in different quarters, indeed, but of which all
the movements and operations could now be directed by one head,
and conducted upon one uniform plan. The clergy of each
particular country might be considered as a particular detachment
of that army, or which the operations could easily be supported
and seconded by all the other detachments quartered in the
different countries round about. Each detachment was not only
independent of the sovereign of the country in which it was
quartered, and by which it was maintained, but dependent upon a
foreign sovereign, who could at any time turn its arms against
the sovereign of that particular country, and support them by the
arms of all the other detachments.
     Those arms were the most formidable that can well be
imagined. In the ancient state of Europe, before the
establishment of arts and manufactures, the wealth of the clergy
gave them the same sort of influence over the common people which
that of the great barons gave them over their respective vassals,
tenants, and retainers. In the great landed estates which the
mistaken piety both of princes and private persons had bestowed
upon the church, jurisdictions were established of the same kind
with those of the great barons, and for the same reason. In those
great landed estates, the clergy, or their bailiffs, could easily
keep the peace without the support or assistance either of the
king or of any other person; and neither the king nor any other
person could keep the peace there without the support and
assistance of the clergy. The jurisdictions of the clergy,
therefore, in their particular baronies or manors, were equally
independent, and equally exclusive of the authority of the king's
courts, as those of the great temporal lords. The tenants of the
clergy were, like those of the great barons, almost all tenants
at will, entirely dependent upon their immediate lords, and
therefore liable to be called out at pleasure in order to fight
in any quarrel in which the clergy might think proper to engage
them. Over and above the rents of those estates, the clergy
possessed in the tithes, a very large portion of the rents of all
the other estates in every kingdom of Europe. The revenues
arising from both those species of rents were, the greater part
of them, paid in kind, in corn, wine, cattle poultry, etc. The
quantity exceeded greatly what the clergy could themselves
consume; and there were neither arts nor manufactures for the
produce of which they could exchange the surplus. The clergy
could derive advantage from this immense surplus in no other way
than by employing it, as the great barons employed the like
surplus of their revenues, in the most profuse hospitality, and
in the most extensive charity. Both the hospitality and the
charity of the ancient clergy, accordingly, are said to have been
very great. They not only maintained almost the whole poor of
every kingdom, but many knights and gentlemen had frequently no
other means of subsistence than by travelling about from
monastery to monastery, under pretence of devotion, but in
reality to enjoy the hospitality of the clergy. The retainers of
some particular prelates were often as numerous as those of the
greatest lay-lords; and the retainers of all the clergy taken
together were, perhaps, more numerous than those of all the
lay-lords. There was always much more union among the clergy than
among the lay-lords. The former were under a regular discipline
and subordination to the papal authority. The latter were under
no regular discipline or subordination, but almost always equally
jealous of one another, and of the king. Though the tenants and
retainers of the clergy, therefore, had both together been less
numerous than those of the great lay-lords, and their tenants
were probably much less numerous, yet their union would have
rendered them more formidable. The hospitality and charity of the
clergy, too, not only gave them the command of a great temporal
force, but increased very much the weight of their spiritual
weapons. Those virtues procured them the highest respect and
veneration among all the inferior ranks of people, of whom many
were constantly, and almost all occasionally, fed by them.
Everything belonging or related to so popular an order, its
possessions, its privileges, its doctrines, necessarily appeared
sacred in the eyes of the common people, and every violation of
them, whether real or pretended, the highest act of sacrilegious
wickedness and profaneness. In this state of things, if the
sovereign frequently found it difficult to resist the confederacy
of a few of the great nobility, we cannot wonder that he should
find it still more so to resist the united force of the clergy of
his own dominions, supported by that of the clergy of all the
neighbouring dominions. In such circumstances the wonder is, not
that he was sometimes obliged to yield, but that he ever was able
to resist.
     The privilege of the clergy in those ancient times (which to
us who live in the present times appear the most absurd), their
total exemption from the secular jurisdiction, for example, or
what in England was called the benefit of the clergy, were the
natural or rather the necessary consequences of this state of
things. How dangerous must it have been for the sovereign to
attempt to punish a clergyman for any crime whatever, if his own
order were disposed to protect him, and to represent either the
proof as insufficient for convicting so holy a man, or the
punishment as too severe to be inflicted upon one whose person
had been rendered sacred by religion? The sovereign could, in
such circumstances, do no better than leave him to be tried by
the ecclesiastical courts, who, for the honour of their own
order, were interested to restrain, as much as possible, every
member of it from committing enormous crimes, or even from giving
occasion to such gross scandal as might disgust the minds of the
people.
     In the state in which things were through the greater part
of Europe during the tenth, eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth
centuries, and for some time both before and after that period,
the constitution of the Church of Rome may be considered as the
most formidable combination that ever was formed against the
authority and security of civil government, as well as against
the liberty, reason, and happiness of mankind, which can flourish
only where civil government is able to protect them. In that
constitution the grossest delusions of superstition were
supported in such a manner by the private interests of so great a
number of people as put them out of all danger from any assault
of human reason: because though human reason might perhaps have
been able to unveil, even to the eyes of the common people, some
of the delusions of superstition, it could never have dissolved
the ties of private interest. Had this constitution been attacked
by no other enemies but the feeble efforts of human reason, it
must have endured for ever. But that immense and well-built
fabric, which all the wisdom and virtue of man could never have
shaken, much less have overturned, was by the natural course of
things, first weakened, and afterwards in part destroyed, and is
now likely, in the course of a few centuries more, perhaps, to
crumble into ruins altogether.
     The gradual improvements of arts, manufactures, and
commerce, the same causes which destroyed the power of the great
barons, destroyed in the same manner, through the greater part of
Europe, the whole temporal power of the clergy. In the produce of
arts, manufactures, and commerce, the clergy, like the great
barons, found something for which they could exchange their rude
produce, and thereby discovered the means of spending their whole
revenues upon their own persons, without giving any considerable
share of them to other people. Their charity became gradually
less extensive, their hospitality less liberal or less profuse.
Their retainers became consequently less numerous, and by degrees
dwindled away altogether. The clergy too, like the great barons,
wished to get a better rent from their landed estates, in order
to spend it, in the same manner, upon the gratification of their
own private vanity and folly. But this increase of rent could be
got only by granting leases to their tenants, who thereby became
in a great measure independent of them. The ties of interest
which bound the inferior ranks of people to the clergy were in
this manner gradually broken and dissolved. They were even broken
and dissolved sooner than those which bound the same ranks of
people to the great barons: because the benefices of the church
being, the greater part of them, much smaller than the estates of
the great barons, the possessor of each benefice was much sooner
able to spend the whole of its revenue upon his own person.
During the greater part of the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries
the power of the great barons was, through the greater part of
Europe, in full vigour. But the temporal power of the clergy, the
absolute command which they had once had over the great body of
the people, was very much decayed. The power of the church was by
that time very nearly reduced through the greater part of Europe
to what arose from her spiritual authority; and even that
spiritual authority was much weakened when it ceased to be
supported by the charity and hospitality of the clergy. The
inferior ranks of people no longer looked upon that order, as
they had done before, as the comforters of their distress, and
the relievers of their indigence. On the contrary, they were
provoked and disgusted by the vanity, luxury, and expense of the
richer clergy, who appeared to spend upon their own pleasures
what had always before been regarded as the patrimony of the
poor.
     In this situation of things, the sovereigns in the different
states of Europe endeavoured to recover the influence which they
had once had in the disposal of the great benefices of the
church, by procuring to the deans and chapters of each diocese
the restoration of their ancient right of electing the bishop,
and to the monks of each abbacy that of electing the abbot. The
re-establishing of this ancient order was the object of several
statutes enacted in England during the course of the fourteenth
century, particularly of what is called the Statute of Provisors;
and of the Pragmatic Sanction established in France in the
fifteenth century. In order to render the election valid, it was
necessary that the sovereign should both consent to it
beforehand, and afterwards approve of the person elected; and
though the election was still supposed to be free, he had,
however, all the indirect means which his situation necessarily
afforded him of influencing the clergy in his own dominions.
Other regulations of a similar tendency were established in other
parts of Europe. But the power of the pope in the collation of
the great benefices of the church seems, before the Reformation,
to have been nowhere so effectually and so universally restrained
as in France and England. The Concordat afterwards, in the
sixteenth century, gave to the kings of France the absolute right
of presenting to all the great, or what are called the
consistorial, benefices of the Gallican Church.
     Since the establishment of the Pragmatic Sanction and of the
Concordat, the clergy of France have in general shown less
respect to the decrees of the papal court than the clergy of any
other Catholic country. In all the disputes which their sovereign
has had with the pope, they have almost constantly taken party
with the former. This independency of the clergy of France upon
the court of Rome seems to be principally founded upon the
Pragmatic Sanction and the Concordat. In the earlier periods of
the monarchy, the clergy of France appear to have been as much
devoted to the pope as those of any other country. When Robert,
the second prince of the Capetian race, was most unjustly
excommunicated by the court of Rome, his own servants, it is
said, threw the victuals which came from his table to the dogs,
and refused to taste anything themselves which little been
polluted by the contact of a person in his situation. They were
taught to do so, it may very safely be presumed, by the clergy of
his own dominions.
     The claim of collating to the great benefices of the church,
a claim in defence of which the court of Rome had frequently
shaken, and sometimes overturned the thrones of some of the
greatest sovereigns in Christendom, was in this manner either
restrained or modified, or given up altogether, in many different
parts of Europe, even before the time of the Reformation. As the
clergy had now less influence over the people, so the state had
more influence over the clergy. The clergy, therefore, had both
less power and less inclination to disturb the state.
     The authority of the Church of Rome was in this state of
declension when the disputes which gave birth to the Reformation
began in Germany, and soon spread themselves through every part
of Europe. The new doctrines were everywhere received with a high
degree of popular favour. They were propagated with all that
enthusiastic zeal which commonly animates the spirit of party
when it attacks established authority. The teachers of those
doctrines, though perhaps in other respects not more learned than
many of the divines who defended the established church, seem in
general to have been better acquainted with ecclesiastical
history, and with the origin and progress of that system of
opinions upon which the authority of the church was established,
and they had thereby some advantage in almost every dispute. The
austerity of their manners gave them authority with the common
people, who contrasted the strict regularity of their conduct
with the disorderly lives of the greater part of their own
clergy. They possessed, too, in a much higher degree than their
adversaries all the arts of popularity and of gaining proselytes,
arts which the lofty and dignified sons of the church had long
neglected as being to them in a great measure useless. The reason
of the new doctrines recommended them to some, their novelty to
many; the hatred and contempt of the established clergy to a
still greater number; but the zealous, passionate, and fanatical,
though frequently coarse and rustic, eloquence with which they
were almost everywhere inculcated, recommended them to by far the
greatest number.
     The success of the new doctrines was almost everywhere so
great that the princes who at that time happened to be on bad
terms with the court of Rome were by means of them easily
enabled, in their own dominions, to overturn the church, which,
having lost the respect and veneration of the inferior ranks of
people, could make scarce any resistance. The court of Rome had
disobliged some of the smaller princes in the northern parts of
Germany, whom it had probably considered as too insignificant to
be worth the managing. They universally, therefore, established
the Reformation in their own dominions. The tyranny of Christian
II and of Troll, Archbishop of Upsala, enabled Gustavus Vasa to
expel them both from Sweden. The pope favoured the tyrant and the
archbishop, and Gustavus Vasa found no difficulty in establishing
the Reformation in Sweden. Christian II was afterwards deposed
from the throne of Denmark, where his conduct had rendered him as
odious as in Sweden. The pope, however, was still disposed to
favour him, and Frederick of Holstein, who had mounted the throne
in his stead, revenged himself by following the example of
Gustavus Vasa. The magistrates of Berne and Zurich, who had no
particular quarrel with the pope, established with great ease the
Reformation in their respective cantons, where just before some
of the clergy had, by an imposture somewhat grosser than
ordinary, rendered the whole order both odious and contemptible.
     In this critical situation of its affairs, the papal court
was at sufficient pains to cultivate the friendship of the
powerful sovereigns of France and Spain, of whom the latter was
at that time Emperor of Germany. With their assistance it was
enabled, though not without great difficulty and much bloodshed,
either to suppress altogether or to obstruct very much the
progress of the Reformation in their dominions. It was well
enough inclined, too, to be complaisant to the King of England.
But from the circumstances of the times, it could not be so
without giving offence to a still greater sovereign, Charles V,
King of Spain and Emperor of Germany. Henry VIII accordingly,
though he did not embrace himself the greater part of the
doctrines of the Reformation, was yet enabled, by their general
prevalence, to suppress all the monasteries, and to abolish the
authority of the Church of Rome in his dominions. That he should
go so far, though he went no further, gave some satisfaction to
the patrons of the Reformation, who having got possession of the
government in the reign of his son and successor, completed
without any difficulty the work which Henry VIII had begun.
     In some countries, as in Scotland, where the government was
weak, unpopular, and not very firmly established, the Reformation
was strong enough to overturn, not only the church, but the state
likewise for attempting to support the church.
     Among the followers of the Reformation dispersed in all the
different countries of Europe, there was no general tribunal
which, like that of the court of Rome, or an oecumenical council,
could settle all disputes among them, and with irresistible
authority prescribe to all of them the precise limits of
orthodoxy. When the followers of the Reformation in one country,
therefore, happened to differ from their brethren in another, as
they had no common judge to appeal to, the dispute could never be
decided; and many such disputes arose among them. Those
concerning the government of the church, and the right of
conferring ecclesiastical benefices, were perhaps the most
interesting to the peace and welfare of civil society. They gave
birth accordingly to the two principal parties of sects among the
followers of the Reformation, the Lutheran and Calvinistic sects,
the only sects among them of which the doctrine and discipline
have ever yet been established by law in any part of Europe.
     The followers of Luther, together with what is called the
Church of England, preserved more or less of the episcopal
government, established subordination among the clergy, gave the
sovereign the disposal of all the bishoprics and other
consistorial benefices within his dominions, and thereby rendered
him the real head of the church; and without depriving the bishop
of the right of collating to the smaller benefices within his
diocese, they, even to those benefices, not only admitted, but
favoured the right of presentation both in the sovereign and in
all other lay-patrons. This system of church government was from
the beginning favourable to peace and good order, and to
submission to the civil sovereign. It has never, accordingly,
been the occasion of any tumult or civil commotion in any country
in which it has once been established. The Church of England in
particular has always valued herself, with great reason, upon the
unexceptionable loyalty of her principles. Under such a
government the clergy naturally endeavour to recommend themselves
to the sovereign, to the court, and to the nobility and gentry of
the country, by whose influence they chiefly expect to obtain
preferment. They pay court to those patrons sometimes, no doubt,
by the vilest flattery and assentation, but frequently, too, by
cultivating all those arts which best deserve, and which are
therefore most likely to gain them the esteem of people of rank
and fortune; by their knowledge in all the different branches of
useful and ornamental learning, by the decent liberality of their
manners, by the social good humour of their conversation, and by
their avowed contempt of those absurd and hypocritical
austerities which fanatics inculcate and pretend to practise, in
order to draw upon themselves the veneration, and upon the
greater part of men of rank and fortune, who avow that they do
not practise them, the abhorrence of the common people. Such a
clergy, however, while they pay their court in this manner to the
higher ranks of life, are very apt to neglect altogether the
means of maintaining their influence and authority with the
lower. They are listened to, esteemed, and respected by their
superiors; but before their inferiors they are frequently
incapable of defending, effectually and to the conviction of such
hearers, their own sober and moderate doctrines against the most
ignorant enthusiast who chooses to attack them.
     The followers of Zwingli, or more properly those of Calvin,
on the contrary, bestowed upon the people of each parish,
whenever the church became vacant, the right of electing their
own pastor, and established at the same time the most perfect
equality among the clergy. The former part of this institution,
as long as it remained in vigour, seems to have been productive
of nothing but disorder and confusion, and to have tended equally
to corrupt the morals both of the clergy and of the people. The
latter part seems never to have had any effects but what were
perfectly agreeable.
     As long as the people of each parish preserved the right of
electing their own pastors, they acted almost always under the
influence of the clergy, and generally of the most factious and
fanatical of the order. The clergy, in order to preserve their
influence in those popular elections, became, or affected to
become, many of them, fanatics themselves, encouraged fanaticism
among the people, and gave the preference almost always to the
most fanatical candidate. So small a matter as the appointment of
a parish priest occasioned almost always a violent contest, not
only in one parish, but in all the neighbouring parishes, who
seldom failed to take part in the quarrel. When the parish
happened to be situated in a great city, it divided all the
inhabitants into two parties; and when that city happened either
to constitute itself a little republic, or to be the head and
capital of a little republic, as is the case with many of the
considerable cities in Switzerland and Holland, every paltry
dispute of this kind, over and above exasperating the animosity
of all their other factions, threatened to leave behind it both a
new schism in the church, and a new faction in the state. In
those small republics, therefore, the magistrate very soon found
it necessary, for the sake of preserving the public peace, to
assume to himself the right of presenting to all vacant
benefices. In Scotland, the most extensive country in which this
Presbyterian form of church government has ever been established,
the rights of patronage were in effect abolished by the act which
established Presbytery in the beginning of the reign of William
III. That act at least put it in the power of certain classes of
people in each parish to purchase, for a very small price, the
right of electing their own pastor. The constitution which this
act established was allowed to subsist for about two-and-twenty
years, but was abolished by the 10th of Queen Anne, c. 12, on
account of the confusions and disorders which this more popular
mode of, election had almost everywhere occasioned. In so
extensive a country as Scotland, however, a tumult in a remote
parish was not so likely to give disturbance to government as in
a smaller state. The 10th of Queen Anne restored the rights of
patronage. But though in Scotland the law gives the benefice
without any exception to the person presented by the patron, yet
the church requires sometimes (for she has not in this respect
been very uniform in her decisions) a certain concurrence of the
people before she will confer upon the presentee what is called
the cure of souls, or the ecclesiastical jurisdiction in the
parish. She sometimes at least, from an affected concern for the
peace of the parish, delays the settlement till this concurrence
can be procured. The private tampering of some of the
neighbouring clergy, sometimes to procure, but more frequently to
prevent, this concurrence, and the popular arts which they
cultivate in order to enable them upon such occasions to tamper
more effectually, are perhaps the causes which principally keep
up whatever remains of the old fanatical spirit, either in the
clergy or in the people of Scotland.
     The equality which the Presbyterian form of church
government establishes among the clergy, consists, first, in the
equality of authority or ecclesiastical jurisdiction; and,
secondly, in the equality of benefice. In all Presbyterian
churches the equality of authority is perfect: that of benefice
is not so. The difference, however, between one benefice and
another is seldom so considerable as commonly to tempt the
possessor even of the small one to pay court to his patron by the
vile arts of flattery and assentation in order to get a better.
In all the Presbyterian churches, where the rights of patronage
are thoroughly established, it is by nobler and better arts that
the established clergy in general endeavour to gain the favour of
their superiors; by their learning, by the irreproachable
regularity of their life, and by the faithful and diligent
discharge of their duty. Their patrons even frequently complain
of the independency of their spirit, which they are apt to
construe into ingratitude for past favours, but which at worst,
perhaps, is seldom any more than that indifference which
naturally arises from the consciousness that no further favours
of the kind are ever to be expected. There is scarce perhaps to
be found anywhere in Europe a more learned, decent, independent,
and respectable set of men than the greater part of the
Presbyterian clergy of Holland, Geneva, Switzerland, and
Scotland.
     Where the church benefices are all nearly equal, none of
them can be very great, and this mediocrity of benefice, though
it may no doubt be carried, too far, has, however, some very
agreeable effects. Nothing but the most exemplary morals can give
dignity to a man of small fortune. The vices of levity and vanity
necessarily render him ridiculous, and are, besides, almost as
ruinous to him as they are to the common people. In his own
conduct, therefore, he is obliged to follow that system of morals
which the common people respect the most. He gains their esteem
and affection by that plan of life which his own interest and
situation would lead him to follow. The common people look upon
him with that kindness with which we naturally regard one who
approaches somewhat to our own condition, but who, we think,
ought to be in a higher. Their kindness naturally provokes his
kindness. He becomes careful to instruct them, and attentive to
assist and relieve them. He does not even despise the prejudices
of people who are disposed to be so favourable to him, and never
treats them with those contemptuous and arrogant airs which we so
often meet with in the proud dignitaries of opulent and
well-endowed churches. The Presbyterian clergy, accordingly, have
more influence over the minds of the common people than perhaps
the clergy of any other established church. It is accordingly in
Presbyterian countries only that we ever find the common people
converted, without persecution, completely, and almost to a man,
to the established church.
     In countries where church benefices are the greater part of
them very moderate, a chair in a university is generally a better
establishment than a church benefice. The universities have, in
this case, the picking and choosing of their members from all the
churchmen of the country, who, in every country, constitute by
far the most numerous class of men of letters. Where church
benefices, on the contrary, are many of them very considerable,
the church naturally draws from the universities the greater part
of their eminent men of letters, who generally find some patron
who does himself honour by procuring them church preferment. In
the former situation we are likely to find the universities
filled with the most eminent men of letters that are to be found
in the country. In the latter we are likely to find few eminent
men among them, and those few among the youngest members of the
society, who are likely, too, to be drained away from it before
they can have acquired experience and knowledge enough to be of
much use to it. It is observed by Mr. de Voltaire, that Father
Porrie, a Jesuit of no great eminence in the republic of letters,
was the only professor they had ever had in France whose works
were worth the reading. In a country which has produced so many
eminent men of letters, it must appear somewhat singular that
scarce one of them should have been a professor in a university.
The famous Gassendi was, in the beginning of his life, a
professor in the University of Aix. Upon the first dawning of his
genius, it was represented to him that by going into the church
he could easily find a much more quiet and comfortable
subsistence, as well as a better situation for pursuing his
studies; and he immediately followed the advice. The observation
of Mr. de Voltaire may be applied, I believe, not only to France,
but to all other Roman Catholic countries. We very rarely find,
in any of them, an eminent man of letters who is a professor in a
university, except, perhaps, in the professions of law and
physic; professions from which the church is not so likely to
draw them. After the Church of Rome, that of England is by far
the richest and best endowed church in Christendom. In England,
accordingly, the church is continually draining the universities
of all their best and ablest members; and an old college tutor,
who is known and distinguished in Europe as an eminent man of
letters, is as rarely to be found there as in any Roman Catholic
country. In Geneva, on the contrary, in the Protestant cantons of
Switzerland, in the Protestant countries of Germany, in Holland,
in Scotland, in Sweden, and Denmark, the most eminent men of
letters whom those countries have produced, have, not all indeed,
but the far greater part of them, been professors in
universities. In those countries the universities are continually
draining the church of all its most eminent men of letters.
     It may, perhaps, be worth while to remark that, if we expect
the poets, a few orators, and a few historians, the far greater
part of the other eminent men of letters, both of Greece and
Rome, appear to have been either public or private teachers;
generally either of philosophy or of rhetoric. This remark will
be found to hold true from the days of Lysias and Isocrates, of
Plato and Aristotle, down to those of Plutarch and Epictetus, of
Suetonius and Quintilian. To impose upon any man the necessity of
teaching, year after year, any particular branch of science,
seems, in reality, to be the most effectual method for rendering
him completely master of it himself. By being obliged to go every
year over the same ground, if he is good for anything, he
necessarily becomes, in a few years, well acquainted with every
part of it: and if upon any particular point he should form too
hasty an opinion one year, when he comes in the course of his
lectures to reconsider the same subject the year thereafter, he
is very likely to correct it. As to be a teacher of science is
certainly the natural employment of a mere man of letters, so is
it likewise, perhaps, the education which is most likely to
render him a man of solid learning and knowledge. The mediocity
of church benefices naturally tends to draw the greater part of
men of letters, in the country where it takes place, to the
employment in which they can be the most useful to the public,
and, at the same time, to give them the best education, perhaps,
they are capable of receiving. It tends to render their learning
both as solid as possible, and as useful as possible.
     The revenue of every established church, such parts of it
excepted as may arise from particular lands or manors, is a
branch, it ought to be observed, of the general revenue of the
state which is thus diverted to a purpose very different from the
defence of the state. The tithe, for example, is a real land-tax,
which puts it out of the power of the proprietors of land to
contribute so largely towards the defence of the state as they
otherwise might be able to do. The rent of land, however, is,
according to some, the sole fund, and, according to others, the
principal fund, from which, in all great monarchies, the
exigencies of the state must be ultimately supplied. The more of
this fund that is given to the church, the less, it is evident,
can be spared to the state. It may be laid down as a certain
maxim that, all other things being supposed equal, the richer the
church, the poorer must necessarily be, either the sovereign on
the one hand, or the people on the other; and, in all cases, the
less able must the state be to defend itself. In several
Protestant countries, particularly in all the Protestant cantons
of Switzerland, the revenue which anciently belonged to the Roman
Catholic Church, the tithes and church lands, has been found a
fund sufficient, not only to afford competent salaries to the
established clergy, but to defray, with little or no addition,
all the other expenses of the state. The magistrates of the
powerful canton of Berne, in particular, have accumulated out of
the savings from this fund a very large sum, supposed to amount
to several millions, part of which is deposited in a public
treasure, and part is placed at interest in what are called the
public funds of the different indebted nations of Europe; chiefly
in those of France and Great Britain. What may be the amount of
the whole expense which the church, either of Berne, or of any
other Protestant canton, costs the state, I do not pretend to
know. By a very exact account it appears that, in 1755, the whole
revenue of the clergy of the Church of Scotland, including their
glebe or church lands, and the rent of their manses or
dwelling-houses, estimated according to a reasonable valuation,
amounted only to L68,514 1s. 5 1/12d. This very moderate revenue
affords a decent subsistence to nine hundred and forty-four
ministers. The whole expense of the church, including what is
occasionally laid out for the building and reparation of
churches, and of the manses of ministers, cannot well be supposed
to exceed eighty or eighty-five thousand pounds a year. The most
opulent church in Christendom does not maintain better the
uniformity of faith, the fervour of devotion, the spirit of
order, regularity, and austere morals in the great body of the
people, than this very poorly endowed Church of Scotland. All the
good effects, both civil and religious, which an established
church can be supposed to produce, are produced by it as
completely as by any other. The greater part of the Protestant
churches of Switzerland, which in general are not better endowed
than the Church of Scotland, produce those effects in a still
higher degree. In the greater part of the Protestant cantons
there is not a single person to be found who does not profess
himself to be of the established church. If he professes himself
to be of any other, indeed, the law obliges him to leave the
canton. But so severe, or rather indeed so oppressive a law,
could never have been executed in such free countries had not the
diligence of the clergy beforehand converted to the established
church the whole body of the people, with the exception of,
perhaps, a few individuals only. In some parts of Switzerland,
accordingly, where, from the accidental union of a Protestant and
Roman Catholic country, the conversion has not been so complete,
both religions are not only tolerated but established by law.
     The proper performance of every service seems to require
that its pay or recompense should be, as exactly as possible,
proportioned to the nature of the service. If any service is very
much underpaid, it is very apt to suffer by the meanness and
incapacity of the greater part of those who are employed in it.
If it is very much overpaid, it is apt to suffer, perhaps, still
more by their negligence and idleness. A man of a large revenue,
whatever may be his profession, thinks he ought to live like
other men of large revenues, and to spend a great part of his
time in festivity, in vanity, and in dissipation. But in a
clergyman this train of life not only consumes the time which
ought to be employed in the duties of his function, but in the
eyes of the common people destroys almost entirely that sanctity
of character which can alone enable him to perform those duties
with proper weight and authority.
                            PART 4
       Of the Expense of Supporting the Dignity of the Sovereign 
     Over and above the expenses necessary for enabling the
sovereign to perform his several duties, a certain expense is
requisite for the support of his dignity. This expense varies
both with the different periods of improvement, and with the
different forms of government.
     In an opulent and improved society, where all the different
orders of people are growing every day more expensive in their
houses, in their furniture, in their tables, in their dress, and
in their equipage, it cannot well be expected that the sovereign
should alone hold out against the fashion. He naturally,
therefore, or rather necessarily, becomes more expensive in all
those different articles too. His dignity even seems to require
that he should become so.
     As in point of dignity a monarch is more raised above his
subjects than the chief magistrate of any republic is ever
supposed to be above his fellow-citizens, so a greater expense is
necessary for supporting that higher dignity. We naturally expect
more splendour in the court of a king than in the mansion-house
of a doge or burgomaster.
                           CONCLUSION 
     The expense of defending the society, and that of supporting
the dignity of the chief magistrate, are both laid out for the
general benefit of the whole society. It is reasonable,
therefore, that they should be defrayed by the general
contribution of the whole society, all the different members
contributing, as nearly as possible, in proportion to their
respective abilities.
     The expense of the administration of justice, too, may, no
doubt, be considered as laid out for the benefit of the whole
society. There is no impropriety, therefore, in its being
defrayed by the general contribution of the whole society. The
persons, however, who gave occasion to this expense are those
who, by their injustice in one way or another, make it necessary
to seek redress or protection from the courts of justice. The
persons again most immediately benefited by this expense are
those whom the courts of justice either restore to their rights
or maintain in their rights. The expense of the administration of
justice, therefore, may very properly be defrayed by the
particular contribution of one or other, or both, of those two
different sets of persons, according as different occasions may
require, that is, by the fees of court. It cannot be necessary to
have recourse to the general contribution of the whole society,
except for the conviction of those criminals who have not
themselves any estate or fund sufficient for paying those fees.
     Those local or provincial expenses of which the benefit is
local or provincial (what is laid out, for example, upon the
police of a particular town or district) ought to be defrayed by
a local or provincial revenue, and ought to be no burden upon the
general revenue of the society. It is unjust that the whole
society should contribute towards an expense of which the benefit
is confined to a part of the society.
     The expense of maintaining good roads and communications is,
no doubt, beneficial to the whole society, and may, therefore,
without any injustice. be defrayed by the general contribution of
the whole society. This expense, however, is most immediately and
directly beneficial to those who travel or carry goods from one
place to another, and to those who consume such goods. The
turnpike tolls in England, and the duties called peages in other
countries, lay it altogether upon those two different sets of
people, and thereby discharge the general revenue of the society
from a very considerable burden.
     The expense of the institutions for education and religious
instruction is likewise, no doubt, beneficial to the whole
society, and may, therefore, without injustice, be defrayed by
the general contribution of the whole society. This expense,
however, might perhaps with equal propriety, and even with some
advantage, be defrayed altogether by those who receive the
immediate benefit of such education and instruction, or by the
voluntary contribution of those who think they have occasion for
either the one or the other.
     When the institutions or public works which are beneficial
to the whole society either cannot be maintained altogether, or
are not maintained altogether by the contribution of such
particular members of the society as are most immediately
benefited by them, the deficiency must in most cases be made up
by the general contribution of the whole society. The general
revenue of the society, over and above defraying the expense of
defending the society, and of supporting the dignity of the chief
magistrate, must make up for the deficiency of many particular
branches of revenue. The sources of this general or public
revenue I shall endeavour to explain in the following chapter.
                            CHAPTER II   Of the Sources of the
General or Public Revenue of the Society 
     THE revenue which must defray, not only the expense of
defending the society and of supporting the dignity of the chief
magistrate, but all the other necessary expenses of government
for which the constitution of the state has not provided any
particular revenue, may be drawn either, first, from some fund
which peculiarly belongs to the sovereign or commonwealth, and
which is independent of the revenue of the people; or, secondly,
from the revenue of the people.
                             PART 1
      Of the Funds or Sources of Revenue which may peculiarly
               belong to the Sovereign or Commonwealth 
     THE funds or sources of revenue which may peculiarly belong
to the sovereign or commonwealth must consist either in stock or
in land.
     The sovereign, like any other owner of stock, may derive a
revenue from it, either by employing it himself, or by lending
it. His revenue is in the one case profit, in the other interest.
     The revenue of a Tartar or Arabian chief consists in profit.
It arises principally from the milk and increase of his own herds
and flocks, of which he himself superintends the management, and
is the principal shepherd or herdsman of his own horde or tribe.
It is, however, in this earliest and rudest state of civil
government only that profit has ever made the principal part of
the public revenue of a monarchial state.
     Small republics have sometimes derived a considerable
revenue from the profit of mercantile projects. The republic of
Hamburg is said to do so from the profits of a public wine cellar
and apothecary's shop. The state cannot be very great of which
the sovereign has leisure to carry on the trade of a wine
merchant or apothecary. The profit of a public bank has been a
source of revenue to more considerable states. It has been so not
only to Hamburg, but to Venice and Amsterdam. A revenue of this
kind has even by some people been thought not below the attention
of so great an empire as that of Great Britain. Reckoning the
ordinary dividend of the Bank of England at five and a half per
cent and its capital at ten millions seven hundred and eighty
thousand pounds, the net annual profit, after paying the expense
of management, must amount, it is said, to five hundred and
ninety-two thousand nine hundred pounds. Government, it is
pretended, could borrow this capital at three per cent interest,
and by taking the management of the bank into its own hands,
might make a clear profit of two hundred and sixty-nine thousand
five hundred pounds a year. The orderly, vigilant, and
parsimonious administration of such aristocracies as those of
Venice and Amsterdam is extremely proper, it appears from
experience, for the management of a mercantile project of this
kind. But whether such a government as that of England- which,
whatever may be its virtues, has never been famous for good
economy; which, in time of peace, has generally conducted itself
with the slothful and negligent profusion that is perhaps natural
to monarchies; and in time of war has constantly acted with all
the thoughtless extravagance that democracies are apt to fall
into- could be safely trusted with the management of such a
project, must at least be good deal more doubtful.
     The post office is properly a mercantile project. The
government advances the expense of establishing the different
offices, and of buying or hiring the necessary horses or
carriages, and is repaid with a large profit by the duties upon
what is carried. It is perhaps the only mercantile project which
has been successfully managed by, I believe, every sort of
government. The capital to be advanced is not very considerable.
There is no mystery in the business. The returns are not only
certain, but immediate.
     Princes, however, have frequently engaged in many other
mercantile projects, and have been willing, like private persons,
to mend their fortunes by becoming adventurers in the common
branches of trade. They have scarce ever succeeded. The profusion
with which the affairs of princes are always managed renders it
almost impossible that they should. The agents of a prince regard
the wealth of their master as inexhaustible; are careless at what
price they buy; are careless at what price they sell; are
careless at what expense they transport his goods from one place
to another. Those agents frequently live with the profusion of
princes, and sometimes too, in spite of that profusion, and by a
proper method of making up their accounts, acquire the fortunes
of princes. It was thus, as we are told by Machiavel, that the
agents of Lorenzo of Medicis, not a prince of mean abilities,
carried on his trade. The republic of Florence was several times
obliged to pay the debt into which their extravagance had
involved him. He found it convenient, accordingly, to give up the
business of merchant, the business to which his family had
originally owed their fortune, and in the latter part of his life
to employ both what remained of that fortune, and the revenue of
the state of which he had the disposal, in projects and expenses
more suitable to his station.
     No two characters seem more inconsistent than those of
trader and sovereign. If the trading spirit of the English East
India Company renders them very bad sovereigns, the spirit of
sovereignty seems to have rendered them equally bad traders.
While they were traders only they managed their trade
successfully, and were able to pay from their profits a moderate
dividend to the proprietors of their stock. Since they became
sovereigns, with a revenue which, it is said, was originally more
than three millions sterling, they have been obliged to beg
extraordinary assistance of government in order to avoid
immediate bankruptcy. In their former situation, their servants
in India considered themselves as the clerks of merchants: in
their present situation, those servants consider themselves as
the ministers of sovereigns.
     A state may sometimes derive some part of its public revenue
from the interest of money, as well as from the profits of stock.
If it has amassed a treasure, it may lend a part of that treasure
either to foreign states, or to its own subjects.
     The canton of Berne derives a considerable revenue by
lending a part of its treasure to foreign states; that is, by
placing it in the public funds of the different indebted nations
of Europe, chiefly in those of France and England. The security
of this revenue must depend, first, upon the security of the
funds in which it is placed, or upon the good faith of the
government which has the management of them; and, secondly, upon
the certainty or probability of the continuance of peace with the
debtor nation. In the case of a war, the very first act of
hostility, on the part of the debtor nation, might be the
forfeiture of the funds of its creditor. This policy of lending
money to foreign states is, so far as I know, peculiar to the
canton of Berne.
     The city of Hamburg has established a sort of public
pawnshop, which lends money to the subjects of the state upon
pledges at six per cent interest. This pawnshop or Lombard, as it
is called, affords a revenue, it is pretended, to the state of a
hundred and fifty thousand crowns, which, at four and sixpence
the crown, amounts to L33,750 sterling.
     The government of Pennsylvania, without amassing any
treasure, invented a method of lending, not money indeed, but
what is equivalent to money, to its subjects. By advancing to
private people at interest, and upon land security to double the
value, paper bills of credit to be redeemed fifteen years after
their date, and in the meantime made transferable from hand to
hand like bank notes, and declared by act of assembly to be a
legal tender in all payments from one inhabitant of the province
to another, it raised a moderate revenue, which went a
considerable way towards defraying an annual expense of about
L4500, the whole ordinary expense of that frugal and orderly
government. The success of an expedient of this kind must have
depended upon three different circumstances; first, upon the
demand for some other instrument of commerce besides gold and
silver money; or upon the demand for such a quantity of
consumable stock as could not be had without sending abroad the
greater part of their gold and silver money in order to purchase
it; secondly, upon the good credit of the government which made
use of this expedient; and, thirdly, upon the moderation with
which it was used, the whole value of the paper bills of credit
never exceeding that of the gold and silver money which would
have been necessary for carrying on their circulation had there
been no paper bills of credit. The same expedient was upon
different occasions adopted by several other American colonies:
but, from want of this moderation, it produced, in the greater
part of them, much more disorder than conveniency.
     The unstable and perishable nature of stock and credit,
however, render them unfit to be trusted to as the principal
funds of that sure, steady, and permanent revenue which can alone
give security and dignity to government. The government of no
great nation that was advanced beyond the shepherd state seems
ever to have derived the greater part of its public revenue from
such sources.
     Land is a fund of a more stable and permanent nature; and
the rent of public lands, accordingly, has been the principal
source of the public revenue of many a great nation that was much
advanced beyond the shepherd state. From the produce or rent of
the public lands, the ancient republics of Greece and Italy
derived, for a long time, the greater part of that revenue which
defrayed the necessary expenses of the commonwealth. The rent of
the crown lands constituted for a long time the greater part of
the revenue of the ancient sovereigns of Europe.
     War and the preparation for war are the two circumstances
which in modern times occasion the greater part of the necessary
expense of all great states. But in the ancient republics of
Greece and Italy every citizen was a soldier, who both served and
prepared himself for service at his own expense. Neither of those
two circumstances, therefore, could occasion any very
considerable expense to the state. The rent of a very moderate
landed estate might be fully sufficient for defraying all the
other necessary expenses of government.
     In the ancient monarchies of Europe, the manners and customs
of the times sufficiently Prepared the great body of the people
for war; and when they took the field, they were, by the
condition of their feudal tenures, to be maintained either at
their own expense, or at that of their immediate lords, without
bringing any new charge upon the sovereign. The other expenses of
government were, the greater part of them, very moderate. The
administration of justice, it has been shown, instead of being a
cause of expense, was a source of revenue. The labour of the
country people, for three days before and for three days after
harvest, was thought a fund sufficient for making and maintaining
all the bridges, highways, and other public works which the
commerce of the country was supposed to require. In those days
the principal expense of the sovereign seems to have consisted in
the maintenance of his own family and household. The officers of
his household, accordingly, were then the great officers of
state. The lord treasurer received his rents. The lord steward
and lord chamberlain looked after the expense of his family. The
care of his stables was committed to the lord constable and the
lord marshal. His houses were all built in the form of castles,
and seem to have been the principal fortresses which he
possessed. The keepers of those houses or castles might be
considered as a sort of military governors. They seem to have
been the only military officers whom it was necessary to maintain
in time of peace. In these circumstances the rent of a great
landed estate might, upon ordinary occasions, very well defray
all the necessary expenses of government.
     In the present state of the greater part of the civilised
monarchies of Europe, the rent of all the lands in the country,
managed as they probably would be if they all belonged to one
proprietor, would scarce perhaps amount to the ordinary revenue
which they levy upon the people even in peaceable times. The
ordinary revenue of Great Britain, for example, including not
only what is necessary for defraying the current expense of the
year, but for paying the interest of the public debts, and for
sinking a part of the capital of those debts, amounts to upwards
of ten millions a year. But the land-tax, at four shillings in
the pound, falls short of two millions a year. This land-tax, as
it is called, however, is supposed to be one-fifth, not only of
the rent of all the land, but of that of all the houses, and of
the interest of all the capital stock of Great Britain, that part
of it only excepted which is either let to the public, or
employed as farming stock in the cultivation of land. A very
considerable part of the produce of this tax arises from the rent
of houses, and the interest of capital stock. The land-tax of the
city of London, for example, at four shillings in the pound,
amounts to L123,399 6s. 7d. That of the city of Westminster, to
L63,092 1s. 5d. That of the palaces of Whitehall and St. James's,
to L30,754 6s. 3d. A certain proportion of the land-tax is in the
same manner assessed upon all the other cities and towns
corporate in the kingdom, and arises almost altogether, either
from the rent of houses, or from what is supposed to be the
interest of trading and capital stock. According to the
estimation, therefore, by which Great Britain is rated to the
land-tax, the whole mass of revenue arising from the rent of all
the lands, from that of all the houses, and from the interest of
all the capital stock, that part of it only excepted which is
either lent to the public, or employed in the cultivation of
land, does not exceed ten millions sterling a year, the ordinary
revenue which government levies upon the people even in peaceable
times. The estimation by which Great Britain is rated to the
land-tax is, no doubt, taking the whole kingdom at an average,
very much below the real value; though in several particular
counties and districts it is said to be nearly equal to that
value. The rent of the lands alone, exclusively of that of
houses, and of the interest of stock, has by many people been
estimated at twenty millions, an estimation made in a great
measure at random, and which, I apprehend, is as likely to be
above as below the truth. But if the lands of Great Britain, in
the present state of their cultivation, do not afford a rent of
more than twenty millions a year, they could not well afford the
half, most probably not the fourth part of that rent, if they all
belonged to a single proprietor, and were put under the
negligent, expensive, and oppressive management of his factors
and agents. The crown lands of Great Britain do not at present
afford the fourth part of the rent which could probably be drawn
from them if they were the property of private persons. If the
crown lands were more extensive, it is probable they would be
still worse managed.
     The revenue which the great body of the people derives from
land is in proportion, not to the rent, but to the produce of the
land. The whole annual produce of the land of every country, if
we except what is reserved for seed, is either annually consumed
by the great body of the people, or exchanged for something else
that is consumed by them. Whatever keeps down the produce of the
land below what it would otherwise rise to keeps down the revenue
of the great body of the people still more than it does that of
the proprietors of land. The rent of land, that portion of the
produce which belongs to the proprietors, is scarce anywhere in
Great Britain supposed to be more than a third part of the whole
produce. If the land which in one state of cultivation affords a
rent of ten millions sterling a year would in another afford a
rent of twenty millions, the rent being, in both cases, supposed
a third part of the produce, the revenue of the proprietors would
be less than it otherwise might be by ten millions a year only;
but the revenue of the great body of the people would be less
than it otherwise might be by thirty millions a year, deducting
only what would be necessary for seed. The population of the
country would be less by the number of people which thirty
millions a year, deducting always the seed, could maintain
according to the particular mode of living and expense which
might take place in the different ranks of men among whom the
remainder was distributed.
     Though there is not at present, in Europe, any civilised
state of any kind which derives the greater part of its public
revenue from the rent of lands which are the property of the
state, yet in all the great monarchies of Europe there are still
many large tracts of land which belong to the crown. They are
generally forest; and sometimes forest where, after travelling
several miles, you will scarce find a single tree; a mere waste
and loss of country in respect both of produce and population. In
every great monarchy of Europe the sale of the crown lands would
produce a very large sum of money, which, if applied to the
payment of the public debts, would deliver from mortgage a much
greater revenue than any which those lands have ever afforded to
the crown. In countries where lands, improved and cultivated very
highly, and yielding at the time of sale as great a rent as can
easily be got from them, commonly sell at thirty years' purchase,
the unimproved, uncultivated, and low-rented crown lands might
well be expected to sell at forty, fifty, or sixty years'
purchase. The crown might immediately enjoy the revenue which
this great price would redeem from mortgage. In the course of a
few years it would probably enjoy another revenue. When the crown
lands had become private property, they would, in the course of a
few years, become well improved and well cultivated. The increase
of their produce would increase the population of the country by
augmenting the revenue and consumption of the people. But the
revenue which the crown derives from the duties of customs and
excise would necessarily increase with the revenue and
consumption of the people.
     The revenue which, in any civilised monarchy, the crown
derives from the crown lands, though it appears to cost nothing
to individuals, in reality costs more to the society than perhaps
any other equal revenue which the crown enjoys. It would, in all
cases, be for the interest of the society to replace this revenue
to the crown by some other equal revenue, and to divide the lands
among the people, which could not well be done better, perhaps,
than by exposing them to public sale.
     Lands for the purposes of pleasure and magnificence- parks,
gardens, public walks, etc., possessions which are everywhere
considered as causes of expense, not as sources of revenue- seem
to be the only lands which, in a great and civilised monarchy,
ought to belong to the crown.
     Public stock and public lands, therefore, the two sources of
revenue which may peculiarly belong to the sovereign or
commonwealth, being both improper and insufficient funds for
defraying the necessary expense of any great and civilised state,
it remains that this expense must, the greater part of it, be
defrayed by taxes of one kind or another; the people contributing
a part of their own private revenue in order to make up a public
revenue to the sovereign or commonwealth.
                             PART 2
                            Of Taxes 
     THE private revenue of individuals, it has been shown in the
first book of this Inquiry, arises ultimately from three
different sources: Rent, Profit, and Wages. Every tax must
finally be paid from some one or other of those three different
sorts of revenue, or from all of them indifferently. I shall
endeavour to give the best account I can, first, of those taxes
which, it is intended, should fall upon rent; secondly, of those
which, it is intended, should fall upon profit; thirdly, of those
which, it is intended, should fall upon wages; and, fourthly, of
those which, it is intended, should fall indifferently upon all
those three different sources of private revenue. The particular
consideration of each of these four different sorts of taxes will
divide the second part of the present chapter into four articles,
three of which will require several other subdivisions. Many of
those taxes, it will appear from the following review, are not
finally paid from the fund, or source of revenue, upon which it
was intended they should fall.
     Before I enter upon the examination of particular taxes, it
is necessary to premise the four following maxims with regard to
taxes in general.
     I. The subjects of every state ought to contribute towards
the support of the government, as nearly as possible, in
proportion to their respective abilities; that is, in proportion
to the revenue which they respectively enjoy under the protection
of the state. The expense of government to the individuals of a
great nation is like the expense of management to the joint
tenants of a great estate, who are all obliged to contribute in
proportion to their respective interests in the estate. In the
observation or neglect of this maxim consists what is called the
equality or inequality of taxation. Every tax, it must be
observed once for all, which falls finally upon one only of the
three sorts of revenue above mentioned, is necessarily unequal in
so far as it does not affect the other two. In the following
examination of different taxes I shall seldom take much further
notice of this sort of inequality, but shall, in most cases,
confine my observations to that inequality which is occasioned by
a particular tax falling unequally even upon that particular sort
of private revenue which is affected by it.
     II. The tax which each individual is bound to pay ought to
be certain, and not arbitrary. The time of payment, the manner of
payment, the quantity to be paid, ought all to be clear and plain
to the contributor, and to every other person. Where it is
otherwise, every person subject to the tax is put more or less in
the power of the tax-gathered, who can either aggravate the tax
upon any obnoxious contributor, or extort, by the terror of such
aggravation, some present or perquisite to himself. The
uncertainty of taxation encourages the insolence and favours the
corruption of an order of men who are naturally unpopular, even
where they are neither insolent nor corrupt. The certainty of
what each individual ought to pay is, in taxation, a matter of so
great importance that a very considerable degree of inequality,
it appears, I believe, from the experience of all nations, is not
near so great an evil as a very small degree of uncertainty.
     III. Every tax ought to be levied at the time, or in the
manner, in which it is most likely to be convenient for the
contributor to pay it. A tax upon the rent of land or of houses,
payable at the same term at which such rents are usually paid, is
levied at the time when it is most likely to be convenient for
the contributor to pay; or, when he is most likely to have
wherewithal to pay. Taxes upon such consumable goods as are
articles of luxury are all finally paid by the consumer, and
generally in a manner that is very convenient for him. He pays
them by little and little, as he has occasion to buy the goods.
As he is at liberty, too, either to buy, or not to buy, as he
pleases, it must be his own fault if he ever suffers any
considerable inconveniency from such taxes.
     IV. Every tax ought to be so contrived as both to take out
and to keep out of the pockets of the people as little as
possible over and above what it brings into the public treasury
of the state. A tax may either take out or keep out of the
pockets of the people a great deal more than it brings into the
public treasury, in the four following ways. First, the levying
of it may require a great number of officers, whose salaries may
eat up the greater part of the produce of the tax, and whose
perquisites may impose another additional tax upon the people.
Secondly, it may obstruct the industry the people, and discourage
them from applying to certain branches of business which might
give maintenance and unemployment to great multitudes. While it
obliges the people to pay, it may thus diminish, or perhaps
destroy, some of the funds which might enable them more easily to
do so. Thirdly, by the forfeitures and other penalties which
those unfortunate individuals incur who attempt unsuccessfully to
evade the tax, it may frequently ruin them, and thereby put an
end to the benefit which the community might have received from
the employment of their capitals. An injudicious tax offers a
great temptation to smuggling. But the penalties of smuggling
must rise in proportion to the temptation. The law, contrary to
all the ordinary principles of justice, first creates the
temptation, and then punishes those who yield to it; and it
commonly enhances the punishment, too, in proportion to the very
circumstance which ought certainly to alleviate it, the
temptation to commit the crime. Fourthly, by subjecting the
people to the frequent visits and the odious examination of the
tax-gatherers, it may expose them to much unnecessary trouble,
vexation, and oppression; and though vexation is not, strictly
speaking, expense, it is certainly equivalent to the expense at
which every man would be willing to redeem himself from it. It is
in some one or other of these four different ways that taxes are
frequently so much more burdensome to the people than they are
beneficial to the sovereign.
     The evident justice and utility of the foregoing maxims have
recommended them more or less to the attention of all nations.
All nations have endeavoured, to the best of their judgment, to
render their taxes as equal as they could contrive; as certain,
as convenient to the contributor, both in the time and in the
mode of payment, and, in proportion to the revenue which they
brought to the prince, as little burdensome to the people. The
following short review of some of the principal taxes which have
taken place in different ages and countries will show that the
endeavours of all nations have not in this respect been equally
successful. 
                           ARTICLE I
          Taxes upon Rent. Taxes upon the Rent of Land 
     A tax upon the rent of land may either every district being
valued at a certain rent, be imposed according to a certain
canon, which valuation is not afterwards to be altered, or it may
be imposed in such a manner as to vary with every variation in
the real rent of the land, and to rise or fall with the
improvement or declension of its cultivation.
     A land-tax which, like that of Great Britain, is assessed
upon each district according to a certain invariable canon,
though it should be equal at the time of its first establishment,
necessarily becomes unequal in process of time, according to the
unequal degrees of improvement or neglect in the cultivation of
the different parts of the country. In England, the valuation
according to which the different countries and parishes were
assessed to the land-tax by the 4th of William and Mary was very
unequal even at its first establishment. This tax, therefore, so
far offends against the first of the four maxims above mentioned.
It is perfectly agreeable to the other three. It is perfectly
certain. The time of payment for the tax, being the same as that
for the rent, is as convenient as it can be to the contributor
though the landlord is in all cases the real contributor, the tax
is commonly advanced by the tenant, to whom the landlord is
obliged to allow it in the payment of the rent. This tax is
levied by a much smaller number of officers than any other which
affords nearly the same revenue. As the tax upon each district
does not rise with the rise of the rent, the sovereign does not
share in the profits of the landlord's improvements. Those
improvements sometimes contribute, indeed, to the discharge of
the other landlords of the district. But the aggravation of the
tax which may sometimes occasion upon a particular estate is
always so very small that it never can discourage those
improvements, nor keep down the produce of the land below what it
would otherwise rise to. As it has no tendency to diminish the
quantity, it can have none to raise the price of that produce. It
does not obstruct the industry of the people. It subjects the
landlord to no other inconveniency besides the unavoidable one of
paying the tax.
     The advantage, however, which the landlord has derived from
the invariable constancy of the valuation by which all the lands
of Great Britain are rated to the land-tax, has been principally
owing to some circumstances altogether extraneous to the nature
of the tax.
     It has been owing in part to the great prosperity of almost
every part of the country, the rents of almost all the estates of
Great Britain having, since the time when this valuation was
first established, been continually rising, and scarce any of
them having fallen. The landlords, therefore, have almost all
gained the difference between the tax which they would have paid
according to the present rent of their estates, and that which
they actually pay according to the ancient valuation. Had the
state of the country been different, had rents been gradually
falling in consequence of the declension of cultivation, the
landlords would almost all have lost this difference. In the
state of things which has happened to take place since the
revolution, the constancy of the valuation has been advantageous
to the landlord and hurtful to the sovereign. In a different
state of things it might have been advantageous to the sovereign
and hurtful to the landlord.
     As the tax is made payable in money, so the valuation of the
land is expressed in money. Since the establishment of this
valuation the value of silver has been pretty uniform, and there
has been no alteration in the standard of the coin either as to
weight or fineness. Had silver risen considerably in its value,
as it seems to have done in the course of the two centuries which
preceded the discovery of the mines of America, the constancy of
the valuation might have proved very oppressive to the landlord.
Had silver fallen considerably in its value, as it certainly did
for about a century at least after the discovery of those mines,
the same constancy of valuation would have reduced very much this
branch of the revenue of the sovereign. Had any considerable
alteration been made in the standard of the money, either by
sinking the same quantity of silver to a lower denomination, or
by raising it to a higher; had an ounce of silver, for example,
instead of being coined into five shillings and twopence, been
coined either into pieces which bore so low a denomination as two
shillings and sevenpence, or into pieces which bore so high a one
as ten shillings and fourpence, it would in the one case have
hurt the revenue of the proprietor, in the other that of the
sovereign.
     In circumstances, therefore, somewhat different from those
which have actually taken place, this constancy of valuation
might have been a very great inconveniency, either to the
contributors, or to the commonwealth. In the course of ages such
circumstances, however, must, at some time or other, happen. But
though empires, like all the other works of men, have all
hitherto proved mortal, yet every empire aims at immortality.
Every constitution, therefore, which it is meant should be as
permanent as the empire itself, ought to be convenient, not in
certain circumstances only, but in all circumstances; or ought to
be suited, not to those circumstances which are transitory,
occasional, or accidental, but to those which are necessary and
therefore always the same.
     A tax upon the rent of land which varies with every
variation of the rent, or which rises and falls according to the
improvement or neglect of cultivation, is recommended by that
sect of men of letters in France who call themselves The
Economists as the most equitable of all taxes. All taxes, they
pretend, fall ultimately upon the rent of land, and ought
therefore to be imposed equally upon the fund which must finally
pay them. That all taxes ought to fall as equally as possible
upon the fund which must finally pay them is certainly true. But
without entering into the disagreeable discussion of the
metaphysical arguments by which they support their very ingenious
theory, it will sufficiently appear, from the following review,
what are the taxes which fall finally upon the rent of the land,
and what are those which fall finally upon some other fund.
     In the Venetian territory all the arable lands which are
given in lease to farmers are taxed at a tenth of the rent. The
leases are recorded in a public register which is kept by the
officers of revenue in each province or district. When the
proprietor cultivates his own lands, they are valued according to
an equitable estimation, and he is allowed a deduction of
one-fifth of the tax, so that for such lands he pays only eight
instead of ten per cent of the supposed rent.
     A land-tax of this kind is certainly more equal than the
land-tax of England. It might not, perhaps, be altogether so
certain, and the assessment of the tax might frequently occasion
a good deal more trouble to the landlord. It might, too, be a
good deal more expensive in the levying.
     Such a system of administration, however, might perhaps be
contrived as would, in a great measure, both prevent this
uncertainty and moderate this expense.
     The landlord and tenant, for example, might jointly be
obliged to record their lease in a public register. Proper
penalties might be enacted against concealing or misrepresenting
any of the conditions; and if part of those penalties were to be
paid to either of the two parties who informed against and
convicted the other of such concealment or misrepresentation, it
would effectually deter them from combining together in order to
defraud the public revenue. All the conditions of the lease might
be sufficiently known from such a record.
     Some landlords, instead of raising the rent, take a fine for
the renewal of the lease. This practice is in most cases the
expedient of a spendthrift, who for a sum of ready money sells a
future revenue of much greater value. It is in most cases,
therefore, hurtful to the landlords. It is frequently hurtful to
the tenant, and it is always hurtful to the community. It
frequently takes from the tenant so great a part of his capital,
and thereby diminishes so much his ability to cultivate the land,
that he finds it more difficult to pay a small rent than it would
otherwise have been to pay a great one. Whatever diminishes his
ability to cultivate, necessarily keeps down, below what it would
otherwise have been, the most important part of the revenue of
the community. By rendering the tax upon such fines a good deal
heavier than upon the ordinary rent, this hurtful practice might
be discouraged, to the no small advantage of all the different
parties concerned, of the landlord, of the tenant, of the
sovereign, and of the whole community.
     Some leases prescribe to the tenant a certain mode of
cultivation and a certain succession of crops during the whole
continuance of the lease. This condition, which is generally the
effect of the landlord's conceit of his own superior knowledge (a
conceit in most cases very ill founded), ought always to be
considered as an additional rent; as a rent in service instead of
a rent in money. In order to discourage the practice, which is
generally a foolish one, this species of rent might be valued
rather high, and consequently taxed somewhat higher than common
money rents.
     Some landlords, instead of a rent in money, require a rent
in kind, in corn, cattle, poultry, wine, oil, etc.; others,
again, require a rent in service. Such rents are always more
hurtful to the tenant than beneficial to the landlord. They
either take more or keep more out of the pocket of the former
than they put into that of the latter. In every country where
they take place the tenants are poor and beggarly, pretty much
according to the degree in which they take place. By valuing, in
the same manner, such rents rather high, and consequently taxing
them somewhat higher than common money rents, a practice which is
hurtful to the whole community might perhaps be sufficiently
discouraged.
     When the landlord chose to occupy himself a part of his own
lands, the rent might be valued according to an equitable
arbitration of the farmers and landlords in the neighbourhood,
and a moderate abatement of the tax might be granted to him, in
the same manner as in the Venetian territory, provided the rent
of the lands which he occupied did not exceed a certain sum. It
is of importance that the landlord should be encouraged to
cultivate a part of his own land. His capital is generally
greater than that of the tenant, and with less skill he can
frequently raise a greater produce. The landlord can afford to
try experiments, and is generally disposed to do so. His
unsuccessful experiments occasion only a moderate loss to
himself. His successful ones contribute to the improvement and
better cultivation of the whole country. It might be of
importance, however, that the abatement of the tax should
encourage him to cultivate to a certain extent only. If the
landlords should, the greater part of them, be tempted to farm
the whole of their own lands, the country (instead of sober and
industrious tenants, who are bound by their own interest to
cultivate as well as their capital and skill will allow them)
would be filled with idle and profligate bailiffs, whose abusive
management would soon degrade the cultivation and reduce the
annual produce of the land, to the diminution, not only of the
revenue of their masters, but of the most important part of that
of the whole society.
     Such a system of administration might, perhaps, free a tax
of this kind from any degree of uncertainty which could occasion
either oppression or inconveniency of the contributor; and might
at the same time serve to introduce into the common management of
land such a plan or policy as might contribute a good deal to the
general improvement and good cultivation of the country.
     The expense of levying a land-tax which varied with every
variation of the rent would no doubt be somewhat greater than
that of levying one which was already rated according to a fixed
valuation. Some additional expense would necessarily be incurred
both by the different register offices which it would be proper
to establish in the different districts of the country, and by
the different valuations which might occasionally be made of the
lands which the proprietor chose to occupy himself. The expense
of all this, however, might be very moderate, and much below what
is incurred in the levying of many other taxes which afford a
very inconsiderable revenue in comparison of what might easily be
drawn from a tax of this kind.
     The discouragement which a variable land-tax of this kind
might give to the improvement of land seems to be the most
important objection which can be made to it. The landlord would
certainly be less disposed to improve when the sovereign, who
contributed nothing to the expense, was to share in the profit of
the improvement. Even this objection might perhaps be obviated by
allowing the landlord, before he began his improvement, to
ascertain, in conjunction with the officers of revenue, the
actual value of his lands according to the equitable arbitration
of a certain number of landlords and farmers in the neighborhood,
equally chosen by both parties, and by rating him according to
this valuation for such a number of years as might be fully
sufficient for his complete indemnification. To draw the
attention of the sovereign towards the improvement of the land,
from a regard to the increase of his own revenue, is one of the
principal advantages proposed by this species of land-tax. The
term, therefore, allowed for the indemnification of the landlord
ought not to be a great deal longer than what was necessary for
that purpose, lest the remoteness of the interest should
discourage too much this attention. It had better, however, be
somewhat too long than in any respect too short. No incitement to
the attention of the sovereign can ever counterbalance the
smallest discouragement to that of the landlord. The attention of
the sovereign can be at best but a very general and vague
consideration of what is likely to contribute to the better
cultivation of the greater part of his dominions. The attention
of the landlord is a particular and minute consideration of what
is likely to be the most advantageous application of every inch
of ground upon his estate. The principal attention of the
sovereign ought to be to encourage, by every means in his power,
the attention both of the landlord and of the farmer, by allowing
both to pursue their own interest in their own way and according
to their own judgment; by giving to both the most perfect
security that they shall enjoy the full recompense of their own
industry; and by procuring to both the most extensive market for
every part of their produce, in consequence of establishing the
easiest and safest communications both by land and by water
through every part of his own dominions as well as the most
unbounded freedom of exportation to the dominions of all other
princes.
     If by such a system of administration a tax of this kind
could be so managed as to give, not only no discouragement, but,
on the contrary, some encouragement to the improvement of land,
it does not appear likely to occasion any other inconveniency to
the landlord, except always the unavoidable one of being obliged
to pay the tax.
     In all the variations of the state of the society, in the
improvement and in the declension of agriculture; in all the
variations in the value of silver, and in all those in the
standard of the coin, a tax of this kind would, of its own accord
and without any attention of government, readily suit itself to
the actual situation of things, and would be equally just and
equitable in all those different changes. It would, therefore, be
much more proper to be established as a perpetual and unalterable
regulation, or as what is called a fundamental law of the
commonwealth, than any tax which was always to be levied
according to a certain valuation.
     Some states, instead of the simple and obvious expedient of
a register of leases, have had recourse to the laborious and
expensive one of an actual survey and valuation of all the lands
in the country. They have suspected, probably, that the lessor
and lessee, in order to defraud the public revenue, might combine
to conceal the real terms of the lease. Domesday-Book seems to
have been the result of a very accurate survey of this kind.
     In the ancient dominions of the King of Prussia, the
land-tax is assessed according to an actual survey and valuation,
which is reviewed and altered from time to time. According to
that valuation, the lay proprietors pay from twenty to
twenty-five per cent of their revenue. Ecclesiastics from forty
to forty-five per cent. The survey and valuation of Silesia was
made by order of the present king; it is said with great
accuracy. According to that valuation, the lands belonging to the
Bishop of Breslaw are taxed at twenty-five per cent of their
rent. The other revenues of the ecclesiastics of both religions,
at fifty per cent. The commanderies of the Teutonic order, and of
that of Malta, at forty per cent. Lands held by a noble tenure,
at thirty-eight and one-third per cent. Lands held by a base
tenure, at thirty-five and one-third per cent.
     The survey and valuation of Bohemia is said to have been the
work of more than a hundred years. It was not perfected till
after the peace of 1748, by the orders of the present empress
queen. The survey of the duchy of Milan, which was begun in the
time of Charles VI, was not perfected till after 1760. It is
esteemed one of the most accurate that has ever been made. The
survey of Savoy and Piedmont was executed under the orders of the
late King of Sardinia.
     In the dominions of the King of Prussia the revenue of the
church is taxed much higher than that of lay proprietors. The
revenue of the church is, the greater part of it, a burden upon
the rent of land. It seldom happens that any part of it is
applied towards the improvement of land, or is so employed as to
contribute in any respect towards increasing the revenue of the
great body of the people. His Prussian Majesty had probably, upon
that account, thought it reasonable that it should contribute a
good deal more towards relieving the exigencies of the state. In
some countries the lands of the church are exempted from all
taxes. In others they are taxed more lightly than other lands. In
the duchy of Milan, the lands which the church possessed before
1575 are rated to the tax at a third only of their value.
     In Silesia, lands held by a noble tenure are taxed three per
cent higher than those held by a base tenure. The honours and
privileges of different kinds annexed to the former, his Prussian
Majesty had probably imagined, would sufficiently compensate to
the proprietor a small aggravation of the tax; while at the same
time the humiliating inferiority of the latter would be in some
measure alleviated by being taxed somewhat more lightly. In other
countries, the system of taxation, instead of alleviating,
aggravates this inequality. In the dominions of the King of
Sardinia, and in those provinces of France which are subject to
what is called the real or predial taille, the tax falls
altogether upon the lands held by a base tenure. Those held by a
noble one are exempted.
     A land-tax assessed according to a general survey and
valuation, how equal soever it may be at first, must, in the
course of a very moderate period of time, become unequal. To
prevent its becoming so would require the continual and painful
attention of government to all the variations in the state and
produce of every different farm in the country. The governments
of Prussia, of Bohemia, of Sardinia, and of the duchy of Milan
actually exert an attention of this kind; an attention so
unsuitable to the nature of government that it is not likely to
be of long continuance, and which, if it is continued, will
probably in the long-run occasion much more trouble and vexation
than it can possibly bring relief to the contributors.
     In 1666, the generality of Montauban was assessed to the
real or predial taille according, it is said, to a very exact
survey and valuation. By 1727, this assessment had become
altogether unequal. In order to remedy this inconveniency,
government has found no better expedient than to impose upon the
whole generality an additional tax of a hundred and twenty
thousand livres. This additional tax is rated upon all the
different districts subject to the taille according to the old
assessment. But it is levied only upon those which in the actual
state of things are by that assessment undertaxed, and it is
applied to the relief of those which by the same assessment are
overtaxed. Two districts, for example, one of which ought in the
actual state of things to be taxed at nine hundred, the other at
eleven hundred livres, are by the old assessment both taxed at a
thousand livres. Both these districts are by the additional tax
rated at eleven hundred livres each. But this additional tax is
levied only upon the district undercharged, and it is applied
altogether to the relief of that overcharged, which consequently
pays only nine hundred livres. The government neither gains nor
loses by the additional tax, which is applied altogether to
remedy the inequalities arising from the old assessment. The
application is pretty much regulated according to the discretion
of the intendant of the generality, and must, therefore, be in a
great measure arbitrary. 
     Taxes which are proportioned, not to the Rent, but to the
                            Produce of Land 
     Taxes upon the produce of land are in reality taxes upon the
rent; and though they may be originally advanced by the farmer,
are finally paid by the landlord. When a certain portion of the
produce is to be paid away for a tax, the farmer computes, as
well as he can, what the value of this portion is, one year with
another, likely to amount to, and he makes a proportionable
abatement in the rent which he agrees to pay to the landlord.
There is no farmer who does not compute beforehand what the
church tithe, which is a land-tax of this kind, is, one year with
another, likely to amount to.
     The tithe, and every other land-tax of this kind, under the
appearance of perfect equality, are very unequal taxes; a certain
portion of the produce being, in different situations, equivalent
to a very different portion of the rent. In some very rich lands
the produce is so great that the one half of it is fully
sufficient to replace to the farmer his capital employed in
cultivation, together with the ordinary profits of farming stock
in the neighbourhood. The other half, or, what comes to the same
thing, the value of the other half, he could afford to pay as
rent to the landlord, if there was no tithe. But if a tenth of
the produce is taken from him in the way of tithe, he must
require an abatement of the fifth part of his rent, otherwise he
cannot get back his capital with the ordinary profit. In this
case the rent of the landlord, instead of amounting to a half or
five-tenths of the whole produce, will amount only to four-tenths
of it. In poorer lands, on the contrary, the produce is sometimes
so small, and the expense of cultivation so great, that it
requires four-fifths of the whole produce to replace to the
farmer his capital with the ordinary profit. In this case, though
there was no tithe, the rent of the landlord could amount to no
more than one-fifth or two-tenths of the whole produce. But if
the farmer pays one-tenth of the produce in the way of tithe, he
must require an equal abatement of the rent of the landlord,
which will thus be reduced to one-tenth only of the whole
produce. Upon the rent of rich lands, the tithe may sometimes be
a tax of no more than one-fifth part, or four shillings in the
pound; whereas upon that of poorer lands, it may sometimes be a
tax of one-half, or of ten shillings in the pound.
     The tithe, as it is frequently a very unequal tax upon the
rent, so it is always a great discouragement both to the
improvements of the landlord and to the cultivation of the
farmer. The one cannot venture to make the most important, which
are generally the most expensive improvements, nor the other to
raise the most valuable, which are generally too the most
expensive crops, when the church, which lays out no part of the
expense, is to share so very largely in the profit. The
cultivation of madder was for a long time confined by the tithe
to the United Provinces, which, being Presbyterian countries, and
upon that account exempted from this destructive tax, enjoyed a
sort of monopoly of that useful dyeing drug against the rest of
Europe. The late attempts to introduce the culture of this plant
into England have been made only in consequence of the statute
which enacted that five shillings an acre should be received in
lieu of all manner of tithe upon madder.
     As through the greater part of Europe the church, so in many
different countries of Asia the state, is principally supported
by a land-tax, proportioned, not to the rent, but to the produce
of the land. In China, the principal revenue of the sovereign
consists in a tenth part of the produce of all lands of the
empire. This tenth part, however, is estimated so very moderately
that, in many provinces, it is said not to exceed a thirtieth
part of the ordinary produce. The land-tax or land-rent which
used to be paid to the Mahometan government of Bengal, before
that country fell into the hands of the English East India
Company, is said to have amounted to about a fifth part of the
produce. The land-tax of ancient Egypt is said likewise to have
amounted to a fifth part.
     In Asia, this sort of land-tax is said to interest the
sovereign in the improvement and cultivation of land. The
sovereigns of China, those of Bengal while under the Mahometan
government, and those of ancient Egypt, are said accordingly to
have been extremely attentive to the making and maintaining of
good roads and navigable canals, in order to increase, as much as
possible, both the quantity and value of every part of the
produce of the land, by procuring to every part of it the most
extensive market which their own dominions could afford. The
tithe of the church is divided into such small portions that no
one of its proprietors can have any interest of this kind. The
parson of a parish could never find his account in making a road
or canal to a distant part of the country, in order to extend the
market for the produce of his own particular parish. Such taxes,
when destined for the maintenance of the state, have some
advantages which may serve in some measure to balance their
inconveniency. When destined for the maintenance of the church,
they are attended with nothing but inconveniency.
     Taxes upon the produce of land may be levied either in kind,
or, according to a certain valuation, in money.
     The parson of a parish, or a gentleman of small fortune who
lives upon his estate, may sometimes, perhaps, find some
advantage in receiving, the one his tithe, and the other his
rent, in kind. The quantity to be collected, and the district
within which it is to be collected, are so small that they both
can oversee, with their own eyes, the collection and disposal of
every part of what is due to them. A gentleman of great fortune,
who lived in the capital, would be in danger of suffering much by
the neglect, and more by the fraud of his factors and agents, if
the rents of an estate in a distant province were to be paid to
him in this manner. The loss of the sovereign from the abuse and
depredation of his tax-gatherers would necessarily be much
greater. The servants of the most careless private person are,
perhaps, more under the eye of their master than those of the
most careful prince; and a public revenue which was paid in kind
would suffer so much from the mismanagement of the collectors
that a very small part of what was levied upon the people would
ever arrive at the treasury of the prince. Some part of the
public revenue of China, however, is said to be paid in this
manner. The mandarins and other tax-gatherers will, no doubt,
find their advantage in continuing the practice of a payment
which is so much more liable to abuse than any payment in money.
     A tax upon the produce of land which is levied in money may
be levied either according to a valuation which varies with all
the variations of the market price, or according to a fixed
valuation, a bushel of wheat, for example, being always valued at
one and the same money price, whatever may be the state of the
market. The produce of a tax levied in the former way will vary
only according to the variations in the real produce of the land,
according to the improvement or neglect of cultivation. The
produce of a tax levied in the latter way will vary, not only
according to the variations in the produce of the land, but
according to both those in the value of the precious metals and
those in the quantity of those metals which is at different times
contained in coin of the same denomination. The produce of the
former will always bear the same proportion to the value of the
real produce of the land. The produce of the latter may, at
different times, bear very different proportions to that value.
     When, instead either of a certain portion of the produce of
land, or of the price of a certain portion, a certain sum of
money is to be paid in full compensation for all tax or tithe,
the tax becomes, in this case, exactly of the same nature with
the land-tax of England. It neither rises nor falls with the rent
of the land. It neither encourages nor discourages improvement.
The tithe in the greater part of those parishes which pay what is
called a Modus in lieu of all other tithe is a tax of this kind.
During the Mahometan government of Bengal, instead of the payment
in kind of a fifth part of the produce, a modus, and, it is said,
a very moderate one, was established in the greater part of the
districts or zemindaries of the country. Some of the servants of
the East India Company, under pretence of restoring the public
revenue to its proper value, have, in some provinces, exchanged
this modus for a payment in kind. Under their management this
change is likely both to discourage cultivation, and to give new
opportunities for abuse in the collection of the public revenue
which has fallen very much below what it was said to have been
when it first fell under the management of the company. The
servants of the company may, perhaps, have profited by this
change, but at the expense, it is probable, both of their masters
and of the country. 
                Taxes upon the Rent of House. 
     The rent of a house may be distinguished into two parts, of
which the one may very properly be called the Building-rent; the
other is commonly called the Ground-rent.
     The building-rent is the interest or profit of the capital
expended in building the house. In order to put the trade of a
builder upon a level with other trades, it is necessary that this
rent should be sufficient, first, to pay him the same interest
which he would have got for his capital if he had lent it upon
good security; and, secondly, to keep the house in constant
repair, or, what comes to the same thing, to replace, within a
certain term of years, the capital which had been employed in
building it. The building-rent, or the ordinary profit of
building, is, therefore, everywhere regulated by the ordinary
interest of money. Where the market rate of interest is four per
cent the rent of a house which, over and above paying the
ground-rent, affords six or six and a half per cent upon the
whole expense of building, may perhaps afford a sufficient profit
to the builder. Where the market rate of interest is five per
cent, it may perhaps require seven or seven and a half per cent.
If, in proportion to the interest of money, the trade of the
builder affords at any time a much greater profit than this, it
will soon draw so much capital from other trades as will reduce
the profit to its proper level. If it affords at any time much
less than this, other trades will soon draw so much capital from
it as will again raise that profit.
     Whatever part of the whole rent of a house is over and above
what is sufficient for affording this reasonable profit naturally
goes to the ground-rent; and where the owner of the ground and
the owner of the building are two different persons, is, in most
cases, completely paid to the former. This surplus rent is the
price which the inhabitant of the house pays for some real or
supposed advantage of the situation. In country houses at a
distance from any great town, where there is plenty of ground to
choose upon, the ground-rent is scarce anything, or no more than
what the ground which the house stands upon would pay if employed
in agriculture. In country villas in the neighborhood of some
great town, it is sometimes a good deal higher, and the peculiar
conveniency or beauty of situation is there frequently very well
paid for. Ground-rents are generally highest in the capital, and
in those particular parts of it where there happens to be the
greatest demand for houses, whatever be the reason of that
demand, whether for trade and business, for pleasure and society,
or for mere vanity and fashion.
     A tax upon house-rent, payable by the tenant and
proportioned to the whole rent of each house, could not, for any
considerable time at least, affect the building-rent. If the
builder did not get his reasonable profit, he would be obliged to
quit the trade; which, by raising the demand for building, would
in a short time bring back his profit to its proper level with
that of other trades. Neither would such a tax fall altogether
upon the ground-rent; but it would divide itself in such a manner
as to fall partly upon the inhabitant of the house, and partly
upon the owner of the ground.
     Let us suppose, for example, that a particular person judges
that he can afford for house-rent an expense of sixty pounds a
year; and let us suppose, too, that a tax of four shillings in
the pound, or of one-fifth, payable by the inhabitant, is laid
upon house-rent. A house of sixty pounds rent will in this case
cost him seventy-two pounds a year, which is twelve pounds more
than he thinks he can afford. He will, therefore, content himself
with a worse house, or a house of fifty pounds rent, which, with
the additional ten pounds that he must pay for the tax, will make
up the sum of sixty pounds a year, the expense which he judges he
can afford; and in order to pay the tax he will give up a part of
the additional conveniency which he might have had from a house
of ten pounds a year more rent. He will give up, I say, a part of
this additional conveniency; for he will seldom be obliged to
give up the whole, but will, in consequence of the tax, get a
better house for fifty pounds a year than he could have got if
there had been no tax. For as a tax of this kind by taking away
this particular competitor, must diminish the competition for
houses of sixty pounds rent, so it must likewise diminish it for
those of fifty pounds rent, and in the same manner for those of
all other rents, except the lowest rent, for which it would for
some time increase the competition. But the rents of every class
of houses for which the competition was diminished would
necessarily be more or less reduced. As no part of this
reduction, however, could, for any considerable time at least,
affect the building-rent, the whole of it must in the long-run
necessarily fall upon the ground-rent. The final payment of this
tax, therefore, would fall partly upon the inhabitant of the
house, who, in order to pay his share, would be obliged to give
up a part of his conveniency, and partly upon the owner of the
ground, who, in order to pay his share, would be obliged to give
up a part of his revenue. In what proportion this final payment
would be divided between them it is not perhaps very easy to
ascertain. The division would probably be very different in
different circumstances, and a tax of this kind might, according
to those different circumstances, affect very unequally both the
inhabitant of the house and the owner of the ground.
     The inequality with which a tax of this kind might fall upon
the owners of different ground-rents would arise altogether from
the accidental inequality of this division. But the inequality
with which it might fall upon the inhabitants of different houses
would arise not only from this, but from another cause. The
proportion of the expense of house-rent to the whole expense of
living is different in the different degrees of fortune. It is
perhaps highest in the highest degree, and it diminishes
gradually through the inferior degrees, so as in general to be
lowest in the lowest degree. The necessaries of life occasion the
great expense of the poor. They find it difficult to get food,
and the greater part of their little revenue is spent in getting
it. The luxuries and vanities of life occasion the principal
expense of the rich, and a magnificent house embellishes and sets
off to the best advantage all the other luxuries and vanities
which they possess. A tax upon house-rents, therefore, would in
general fall heaviest upon the rich; and in this sort of
inequality there would not, perhaps, be anything very
unreasonable. It is not very unreasonable that the rich should
contribute to the public expense, not only in proportion to their
revenue, but something more than in that proportion.
     The rent of houses, though it in some respects resembles the
rent of land, is in one respect essentially different from it.
The rent of land is paid for the use of a productive subject. The
land which pays it produces it. The rent of houses is paid for
the use of an unproductive subject. Neither the house nor the
ground which it stands upon produce anything. The person who pays
the rent, therefore, must draw it from some other source of
revenue distinct from the independent of this subject. A tax upon
the rent of houses, so far as it falls upon the inhabitants, must
be drawn from the same source as the rent itself, and must be
paid from their revenue, whether derived from the wages of
labour, the profits of stock, or the rent of land. So far as it
falls upon the inhabitants, it is one of those taxes which fall,
not upon one only, but indifferently upon all the three different
sources of revenue, and is in every respect of the same nature as
a tax upon any other sort of consumable commodities. In general
there is not, perhaps, any one article of expense or consumption
by which the liberality or narrowness of a man's whole expense
can be better judged of than by his house-rent. A proportional
tax upon this particular article of expense might, perhaps,
produce a more considerable revenue than any which has hitherto
been drawn from it in any part of Europe. If the tax indeed was
very high, the greater part of people would endeavour to evade
it, as much as they could, by contenting themselves with smaller
houses, and by turning the greater part of their expense into
some other channel.
     The rent of houses might easily be ascertained with
sufficient accuracy by a policy of the same kind with that which
would be necessary for ascertaining the ordinary rent of land.
Houses not inhabited ought to pay no tax. A tax upon them would
fall altogether upon the proprietor, who would thus be taxed for
a subject which afforded him neither conveniency nor revenue.
Houses inhabited by the proprietor ought to be rated, not
according to the expense which they might have cost in building,
but according to the rent which an equitable arbitration might
judge them likely to bring if leased to a tenant. If rated
according to the expense which they may have cost in building, a
tax of three or four shillings in the pound, joined with other
taxes, would ruin almost all the rich and great families of this,
and, I believe, of every other civilised country. Whoever will
examine, with attention, the different town and country houses of
some of the richest and greatest families in this country will
find that, at the rate of only six and a half or seven per cent
upon the original expense of building, their house-rent is nearly
equal to the whole net rent of their estates. It is the
accumulated expense of several successive generations, laid out
upon objects of great beauty and magnificance, indeed; but, in
proportion to what they cost, of very small exchangeable value.
     Ground-rents are a still more proper subject of taxation
than the rent of houses. A tax upon ground-rents would not raise
the rents of houses. It would fall altogether upon the owner of
the ground-rent, who acts always as a monopolist, and exacts the
greatest rent which can be got for the use of his ground. More or
less can be got for it according as the competitors happen to be
richer or poorer, or can afford to gratify their fancy for a
particular spot of ground at a greater or smaller expense. In
every country the greatest number of rich competitors is in the
capital, and it is there accordingly that the highest
ground-rents are always to be found. As the wealth of those
competitors would in no respect be increased by a tax upon
ground-rents, they would not probably be disposed to pay more for
the use of the ground. Whether the tax was to be advanced by the
inhabitant, or by the owner of the ground, would be of little
importance. The more the inhabitant was obliged to pay for the
tax, the less he would incline to pay for the ground; so that the
final payment of the tax would fall altogether upon the owner of
the ground-rent. The ground-rents of uninhabited houses ought to
pay no tax.
     Both ground-rents and the ordinary rent of land are a
species of revenue which the owner, in many cases, enjoys without
any care or attention of his own. Though a part of this revenue
should be taken from him in order to defray the expenses of the
state, no discouragement will thereby be given to any sort of
industry. The annual produce of the land and labour of the
society, the real wealth and revenue of the great body of the
people, might be the same after such a tax as before.
Ground-rents and the ordinary rent of land are, therefore,
perhaps, the species of revenue which can best bear to have a
peculiar tax imposed upon them.
     Ground-rents seem, in this respect, a more proper subject of
peculiar taxation than even the ordinary rent of land. The
ordinary rent of land is, in many cases, owing partly at least to
the attention and good management of the landlord. A very heavy
tax might discourage too, much this attention and good
management. Ground-rents, so far as they exceed the ordinary rent
of land, are altogether owing to the good government of the
sovereign, which, by protecting the industry either of the whole
people, or of the inhabitants of some particular place, enables
them to pay so much more than its real value for the ground which
they build their houses upon; or to make to its owner so much
more than compensation for the loss which he might sustain by
this use of it. Nothing can be more reasonable than that a fund
which owes its existence to the good government of the state
should be taxed peculiarly, or should contribute something more
than the greater part of other funds, towards the support of that
government.
     Though, in many different countries of Europe, taxes have
been imposed upon the rent of houses, I do not know of any in
which ground-rents have been considered as a separate subject of
taxation. The contrivers of taxes have, probably, found some
difficulty in ascertaining what part of the rent ought to be
considered as ground-rent, and what part ought to be considered
as building-rent. It should not, however, seem very difficult to
distinguish those two parts of the rent from one another.
     In Great Britain the rent of houses is supposed to be taxed
in the same proportion as the rent of land by what is called the
annual land-tax. The valuation, according to which each different
parish and district is assessed to this tax, is always the same.
It was originally extremely unequal, and it still continues to be
so. Through the greater part of the kingdom this tax falls still
more lightly upon the rent of houses than upon that of land. In
some few districts only, which were originally rated high, and in
which the rents of houses have fallen considerably, the land-tax
of three or four shillings in the pound is said to amount to an
equal proportion of the real rent of houses. Untenanted houses,
though by law subject to the tax, are, in most districts,
exempted from it by the favour of the assessors; and this
exemption sometimes occasions some little variation in the rate
of particular houses, though that of the district is always the
same. Improvements of rent, by new buildings, repairs, etc., go
to the discharge of the district, which occasions still further
variations in the rate of particular houses.
     In the province of Holland every house is taxed at two and a
half per cent of its value, without any regard either to the rent
which it actually pays, or to the circumstances of its being
tenanted or untenanted. There seems to be a hardship in obliging
the proprietor to pay a tax for an untenanted house, from which
he can derive no revenue, especially so very heavy a tax. In
Holland, where the market rate of interest does not exceed three
per cent, two and a half per cent upon the whole value of the
house must, in most cases, amount to more than a third of the
building-rent, perhaps of the whole rent. The valuation, indeed,
according to which the houses are rated, though very unequal, is
said to be always below the real value. When a house is rebuilt,
improved, or enlarged, there is a new valuation, and the tax is
rated accordingly.
     The contrivers of the several taxes which in England have,
at different times, been imposed upon houses, seem to have
imagined that there was some great difficulty in ascertaining,
with tolerable exactness, what was the real rent of every house.
They have regulated their taxes, therefore, according to some
more obvious circumstances, such as they had probably imagined
would, in most cases, bear some proportion to the rent.
     The first tax of this kind was hearth-money, or a tax of two
shillings upon every hearth. In order to ascertain how many
hearths were in the house, it was necessary that the tax-gatherer
should enter every room in it. This odious visit rendered the tax
odious. Soon after the revolution, therefore, it was abolished as
a badge of slavery.
     The next tax of this kind was a tax of two shillings upon
every dwelling-house inhabited. A house with ten windows to pay
four shillings more. A house with twenty windows and upwards to
pay eight shillings. This tax was afterwards so far altered that
houses with twenty windows, and with less than thirty, were
ordered to pay ten shillings, and those with thirty windows and
upwards to pay twenty shillings. The number of windows can, in
most cases, be counted from the outside, and, in all cases,
without entering every room in the house. The visit of the
tax-gatherer, therefore, was less offensive in this tax than in
the hearth-money.
     This tax was afterwards repealed, and in the room of it was
established the window-tax, which has undergone, too, several
alterations and augmentations. The window-tax, as it stands at
present (January 1775), over and above the duty of three
shillings upon every house in England, and of one shilling upon
every house in Scotland, lays a duty upon every window, which, in
England, augments gradually from twopence, the lowest rate, upon
houses with not more than seven windows, to two shillings, the
highest rate, upon houses with twenty-five windows and upwards.
     The principal objection to all such taxes of the worst is
their inequality, an inequality of the worst kind, as they must
frequently fall much heavier upon the poor than upon the rich. A
house of ten pounds rent in a country town may sometimes have
more windows than a house of five hundred pounds rent in London;
and though the inhabitant of the former is likely to be a much
poorer man than that of the latter, yet so far as his
contribution is regulated by the window-tax, he must contribute
more to the support of the state. Such taxes are, therefore,
directly contrary to the first of the four maxims above
mentioned. They do not seem to offend much against any of the
other three.
     The natural tendency of the window-tax, and of all other
taxes upon houses, is to lower rents. The more a man pays for the
tax, the less, it is evident, he can afford to pay for the rent.
Since the imposition of the window-tax, however, the rents of
houses have upon the whole risen, more or less, in almost every
town and village of Great Britain with which I am acquainted.
Such has been almost everywhere the increase of the demand for
houses, that it has raised the rents more than the window-tax
could sink them; one of the many proofs of the great prosperity
of the country, and of the increasing revenue of its inhabitants.
Had it not been for the tax, rents would probably have risen
still higher. 
                               ARTICLE II
       Taxes on Profit, or upon the Revenue arising from Stock 
     The revenue or profit arising from stock naturally divides
itself into two parts; that which pays the interest, and which
belongs to the owner of the stock, and that surplus part which is
over and above what is necessary for paying the interest.
     This latter part of profit is evidently a subject not
taxable directly. It is the compensation, and in most cases it is
no more than a very moderate compensation, for the risk and
trouble of employing the stock. The employer must have this
compensation, otherwise he cannot, consistently with his own
interest, continue the employment. If he was taxed directly,
therefore, in proportion to the whole profit, he would be obliged
either to raise the rate of his profit, or to charge the tax upon
the interest of money; that is, to pay less interest. If he
raised the rate of his profit in proportion to the tax, the whole
tax, though it might be advanced by him, would be finally paid by
one or other of two different sets of people, according to the
different ways in which he might employ the stock of which he had
the management. If he employed it as a farming stock in the
cultivation of land, he could raise the rate of his profit only
by retaining a greater portion, or, what comes to the same thing,
the price of a greater portion of the produce of the land; and as
this could be done only by a reduction of rent, the final payment
of the tax would fall upon the landlord. If he employed it as a
mercantile or manufacturing stock, he could raise the rate of his
profit only by raising the price of his goods; in which case the
final payment of the tax would fall altogether upon the consumers
of those goods. If he did not raise the rate of his profit, he
would be obliged to charge the whole tax upon that part of it
which was allotted for the interest of money. He could afford
less interest for whatever stock he borrowed, and the whole
weight of the tax would in this case fall ultimately upon the
interest of money. So far as he could not relieve himself from
the tax in the one way, he would be obliged to relieve himself in
the other.
     The interest of money seems at first sight a subject equally
capable of being taxed directly as the rent of land. Like the
rent of land, it is a net produce which remains after completely
compensating the whole risk and trouble of employing the stock.
As a tax upon the rent of land cannot raise rents; because the
net produce which remains after replacing the stock of the
farmer, together with his reasonable profit, cannot be greater
after the tax than before it, so, for the same reason, a tax upon
the interest of money could not raise the rate of interest; the
quantity of stock or money in the country, like the quantity of
land, being supposed to remain the same after the tax as before
it. The ordinary rate of profit, it has been shown in the first
book, is everywhere regulated by the quantity of stock to be
employed in proportion to the quantity of the employment, or of
the business which must be done by it. But the quantity of the
employment, or of the business to be done by stock, could neither
be increased nor diminished by any tax upon the interest of
money. If the quantity of the stock to be employed, therefore,
was neither increased nor diminished by it, the ordinary rate of
profit would necessarily remain the same. But the portion of this
profit necessary for compensating the risk and trouble of the
employer would likewise remain the same, that risk and trouble
being in no respect altered. The residue, therefore, that portion
which belongs to the owner of the stock, and which pays the
interest of money, would necessarily remain the same too. At
first sight, therefore, the interest of money seems to be a
subject as fit to be taxed directly as the rent of land.
     There are, however, two different circumstances which render
the interest of money a much less proper subject of direct
taxation than the rent of land.
     First, the quantity and value of the land which any man
possesses can never be a secret, and can always be ascertained
with great exactness. But the whole amount of the capital stock
which he possesses is almost always a secret, and can scarce ever
be ascertained with tolerable exactness. It is liable, besides,
to almost continual variations. A year seldom passes away,
frequently not a month, sometimes scarce a single day, in which
it does not rise or fall more or less. An inquisition into every
man's private circumstances, and an inquisition which, in order
to accommodate the tax to them, watched over all the fluctuations
of his fortunes, would be a source of such continual and endless
vexation as no people could support.
     Secondly, land is a subject which cannot be removed; whereas
stock easily may. The proprietor of land is necessarily a citizen
of the particular country in which his estate lies. The
proprietor of stock is properly a citizen of the world, and is
not necessarily attached to any particular country. He would be
apt to abandon the country in which he was exposed to a vexatious
inquisition, in order to be assessed to a burdensome tax, and
would remove his stock to some other country where he could
either carry on his business, or enjoy his fortune more at his
ease. By removing his stock he would put an end to all the
industry which it had maintained in the country which he left.
Stock cultivates land; stock employs labour. A tax which tended
to drive away stock from any particular country would so far tend
to dry up every source of revenue both to the sovereign and to
the society. Not only the profits of stock, but the rent of land
and the wages of labour would necessarily be more or less
diminished by its removal.
     The nations, accordingly, who have attempted to tax the
revenue arising from stock, instead of any severe inquisition of
this kind, have been obliged to content themselves with some very
loose, and, therefore, more or less arbitrary, estimation. The
extreme inequality and uncertainty of a tax assessed in this
manner can be compensated only by its extreme moderation, in
consequence of which every man finds himself rated so very much
below his real revenue that he gives himself little disturbance
though his neighbour should be rated somewhat lower.
     By what is called the land-tax in England, it was intended
that stock should be taxed in the same proportion as land. When
the tax upon land was at four shillings in the pound, or at
one-fifth of the supposed rent, it was intended that stock should
be taxed at one-fifth of the supposed interest. When the present
annual land-tax was first imposed, the legal rate of interest was
six per cent. Every hundred pounds stock, accordingly, was
supposed to be taxed at twenty-four shillings, the fifth part of
six pounds. Since the legal rate of interest has been reduced to
five per cent every hundred pounds stock is supposed to be taxed
at twenty shillings only. The sum to be raised by what is called
the land-tax was divided between the country and the principal
towns. The greater part of it was laid upon the country; and of
what was laid upon the towns, the greater part was assessed upon
the houses. What remained to be assessed upon the stock or trade
of the towns (for the stock upon the land was not meant to be
taxed) was very much below the real value of that stock or trade.
Whatever inequalities, therefore, there might be in the original
assessment gave little disturbance. Every parish and district
still continues to be rated for its land, its houses, and its
stock, according to the original assessment; and the almost
universal prosperity of the country, which in most places has
raised very much the value of all these, has rendered those
inequalities of still less importance now. The rate, too, upon
each district continuing always the same, the uncertainty of this
tax so far as it might be assessed upon the stock of any
individual, has been very much diminished, as well as rendered of
much less consequence. If the greater part of the lands of
England are not rated to the land-tax at half their actual value,
the greater part of the stock of England is, perhaps, scarce
rated at the fiftieth part of its actual value. In some towns the
whole land-tax is assessed upon houses, as in Westminster, where
stock and trade are free. It is otherwise in London.
     In all countries a severe inquisition into the circumstances
of private persons has been carefully avoided.
     At Hamburg every inhabitant is obliged to pay to the state
one-fourth per cent of all that he possesses; and as the wealth
of the people of Hamburg consists principally in stock, this tax
may be considered as a tax upon stock. Every man assesses
himself, and, in the presence of the magistrate, puts annually
into the public coffer a certain sum of money which he declares
upon oath to be one-fourth per cent of all that he possesses, but
without declaring what it amounts to, or being liable to any
examination upon that subject. This tax is generally supposed to
be paid with great fidelity. In a small republic, where the
people have entire confidence in their magistrates, are convinced
of the necessity of the tax for the support of the state, and
believe that it will be faithfully applied to that purpose, such
conscientious and voluntary payment may sometimes be expected. It
is not peculiar to the people of Hamburg.
     The canton of Unterwald in Switzerland is frequently ravaged
by storms and inundations, and is thereby exposed to
extraordinary expenses. Upon such occasions the people assemble,
and every one is said to declare with the greatest frankness what
he is worth in order to be taxed accordingly. At Zurich the law
orders that, in cases of necessity, every one should be taxed in
proportion to his revenue- the amount of which he is obliged to
declare upon oath. They have no suspicion, it is said, that any
of their fellow-citizens will deceive them. At Basel the
principal revenue of the state arises from a small custom upon
goods exported. All the citizens make oath that they will pay
every three months all the taxes imposed by the law. All
merchants and even all innkeepers are trusted with keeping
themselves the account of the goods which they sell either within
or without the territory. At the end of every three months they
send this account to the treasurer with the amount of the tax
computed at the bottom of it. It is not suspected that the
revenue suffers by this confidence.
     To oblige every citizen to declare publicly upon oath the
amount of his fortune must not, it seems, in those Swiss cantons
be reckoned a hardship. At Hamburg it would be reckoned the
greatest. Merchants engaged in the hazardous protects of trade
all tremble at the thoughts of being obliged at all to expose the
real state of their circumstances. The ruin of their credit and
the miscarriage of their projects, they foresee, would too often
be the consequence. A sober and parsimonious people, who are
strangers to all such projects, do not feel that they have
occasion for any such concealment.
     In Holland, soon after the exaltation of the late Prince of
Orange to the stadtholdership, a tax of two per cent, or the
fiftieth penny, as it was called, was imposed upon the whole
substance of every citizen. Every citizen assessed himself and
paid his tax in the same manner as at Hamburg, and it was in
general supposed to have been paid with great fidelity. The
people had at that time the greatest affection for their new
government, which they had just established by a general
insurrection. The tax was to be paid but once, in order to
relieve the state in a particular exigency. It was, indeed, too
heavy to be permanent. In a country where the market rate of
interest seldom exceeds three per cent, a tax of two per cent
amounts to thirteen shillings and fourpence in the pound upon the
highest net revenue which is commonly drawn from stock. It is a
tax which very few people could pay without encroaching more or
less upon their capitals. In a particular exigency the people
may, from great public zeal, make a great effort, and give up
even a part of their capital in order to relieve the state. But
it is impossible that they should continue to do so for any
considerable time; and if they did, the tax would ruin them so
completely as to render them altogether incapable of supporting
the state.
     The tax upon stock imposed by the Land-tax Bill in England,
though it is proportioned to the capital, is not intended to
diminish or take away any part of that capital. It is meant only
to be a tax upon the interest of money proportioned to that upon
the rent of land, so that when the latter is at four shillings in
the pound, the former may be at four shillings in the pound too.
The tax at Hamburg and the still more moderate tax of Unterwald
and Zurich are meant, in the same manner, to be taxes, not upon
the capital, but upon the interest or net revenue of stock. That
of Holland was meant to be a tax upon the capital. 
         Taxes upon as Profit of particular Employments 
     In some countries extraordinary taxes are imposed upon the
profits of stock, sometimes when employed in particular branches
of trade, and sometimes when employed in agriculture.
     Of the former kind are in England the tax upon hawkers and
pedlars, that upon hackney coaches and chairs, and that which the
keepers of ale-houses pay for a licence to retail ale and
spirituous liquors. During the late war, another tax of the same
kind was proposed upon shops. The war having been undertaken, it
was said, in defence of the trade of the country, the merchants,
who were to profit by it, ought to contribute towards the support
of it.
     A tax, however, upon the profits of stock employed in any
particular branch of trade can never fall finally upon the
dealers (who must in all ordinary cases have their reasonable
profit, and where the competition is free can seldom have more
than that profit), but always upon the consumers, who must be
obliged to pay in the price of the goods the tax which the dealer
advances; and generally with some overcharge.
     A tax of this kind when it is proportioned to the trade of
the dealer is finally paid by the consumer, and occasions no
oppression to the dealer. When it is not so proportioned, but is
the same upon all dealers, though in this case, too, it is
finally paid by the consumer, yet it favours the great, and
occasions some oppression to the small dealer. The tax of five
shillings a week upon every hackney coach, and that of ten
shillings a year upon every hackney chair, so far as it is
advanced by the different keepers of such coaches and chairs, is
exactly enough proportioned to the extent of their respective
dealings. It neither favours the great, nor oppresses the smaller
dealer. The tax of twenty shillings a year for a licence to sell
ale; of forty shillings for a licence to sell spirituous liquors;
and of forty shillings more for a licence to sell wine, being the
same upon all retailers, must necessarily give some advantage to
the great, and occasion some oppression to the small dealers. The
former must find it more easy to get back the tax in the price of
their goods than the latter. The moderation of the tax, however,
renders this inequality of less importance, and it may to many
people appear not improper to give some discouragement to the
multiplication of little ale-houses. The tax upon shops, it was
intended, should be the same upon all shops. It could not well
have been otherwise. It would have been impossible to proportion
with tolerable exactness the tax upon a shop to the extent of the
trade carried on in it without such an inquisition as would have
been altogether insupportable in a free country. If the tax had
been considerable, it would have oppressed the small, and forced
almost the whole retail trade into the hands of the great
dealers. The competition of the former being taken away, the
latter would have enjoyed a monopoly of the trade, and like all
other monopolists would soon have combined to raise their profits
much beyond what was necessary for the payment of the tax. The
final payment, instead of falling upon the shopkeeper, would have
fallen upon the consumer, with a considerable overcharge to the
profit of the shopkeeper. For these reasons the project of a tax
upon shops was laid aside, and in the room of it was substituted
the subsidy, 1759.
     What in France is called the personal taille is, perhaps,
the most important tax upon the profits of stock employed in
agriculture that is levied in any part of Europe.
     In the disorderly state of Europe during the prevalence of
the feudal government, the sovereign was obliged to content
himself with taxing those who were too weak to refuse to pay
taxes. The great lords, though willing to assist him upon
particular emergencies, refused to subject themselves to any
constant tax, and he was not strong enough to force them. The
occupiers of land all over Europe were, the greater part of them,
originally bondmen. Through the greater part of Europe they were
gradually emancipated. Some of them acquired the property of
landed estates which they held by some base or ignoble tenure,
sometimes under the king, and sometimes under some other great
lord, like the ancient copy-holders of England. Others without
acquiring the property, obtained leases for terms of years of the
lands which they occupied under their lord, and thus became less
dependent upon him. The great lords seem to have beheld the
degree of prosperity and independency which this inferior order
of men had thus come to enjoy with a malignant and contemptuous
indignation, and willingly consented that the sovereign should
tax them. In some countries this tax was confined to the lands
which were held in property by an ignoble tenure; and, in this
case, the taille was said to be real. The land-tax established by
the late King of Sardinia, and the taille in the provinces of
Languedoc, Provence, Dauphine, and Brittany, in the generality of
Montauban, and in the elections of Agen and Comdom, as well as in
some other districts of France, are taxes upon lands held in
property by an ignoble tenure. In other countries the tax was
laid upon the supposed profits of all those who held in farm or
lease lands belonging to other people, whatever might be the
tenure by which the proprietor held them; and in this case the
taille was said to be personal. In the greater part of those
provinces of France which are called the Countries of Elections
the taille is of this kind. The real taille, as it is imposed
only upon a part of the lands of the country, is necessarily an
unequal, but it is not always an arbitrary tax, though it is so
upon some occasions. The personal taille, as it is intended to be
proportioned to the profits of a certain class of people which
can only be guessed at, is necessarily both arbitrary and
unequal.
     In France the personal taille at present (1775) annually
imposed upon the twenty generalities called the Countries of
Elections amounts to 40,107,239 livres, 16 sous. The proportion
in which this sum is assessed upon those different provinces
varies from year to year according to the reports which are made
to the king's council concerning the goodness or badness of the
crops, as well as other circumstances which may either increase
or diminish their respective abilities to pay. Each generality it
divided into a certain number of elections, and the proportion in
which the sum imposed upon the whole generality is divided among
those different elections varies likewise from year to year
according to the reports made to the council concerning their
respective abilities. It seems impossible that the council, with
the best intentions, can ever proportion with tolerable exactness
either of those two assessments to the real abilities of the
province or district upon which they are respectively laid.
Ignorance and misinformation must always, more or less, mislead
the most upright council. The proportion which each parish ought
to support of what is assessed upon the whole election, and that
which each individual ought to support of what is assessed upon
his particular parish, are both in the same manner varied, from
year to year, according as circumstances are supposed to require.
These circumstances are judged of, in the one case, by the
officers of the election, in the other by those of the parish,
and both the one and the other are, more or less, under the
direction and influence of the intendant. Not only ignorance and
misinformation, but friendship, party animosity, and private
resentment are said frequently to mislead such assessors. No man
subject to such a tax, it is evident, can ever be certain, before
he is assessed, of what he is to pay. He cannot even be certain
after he is assessed. If any person has been taxed who ought to
have been exempted, or if any person has been taxed beyond his
proportion, though both must pay in the meantime, yet if they
complain, and make good their complaints, the whole parish is
reimposed next year in order to reimburse them. If any of the
contributors become bankrupt or insolvent, the collector is
obliged to advance his tax, and the whole parish is reimposed
next year in order to reimburse the collector. If the collector
himself should become bankrupt, the parish which elects him must
answer for his conduct to the receiver general of the election.
But, as it might be troublesome for the receiver to prosecute the
whole parish, he takes at his choice five or six of the richest
contributors and obliges them to make good what had been lost by
the insolvency of the collector. The parish is afterwards
reimposed in order to reimburse those five or six. Such
reimpositions are always over and above the taille of the
particular year in which they are laid on.
     When a tax is imposed upon the profits of stock in a
particular branch of trade, the traders are all careful to bring
no more goods to market than what they can sell at a price
sufficient to reimburse them for advancing the tax. Some of them
withdraw a part of their stocks from the trade, and the market is
more sparingly supplied than before. The price of the goods
rises, and the final payment of the tax falls upon the consumer.
But when a tax is imposed upon the profits of stock employed in
agriculture, it is not the interest of the farmers to withdraw
any part of their stock from that employment. Each farmer
occupies a certain quantity of land, for which hi pays rent. For
the proper cultivation of this land a certain quantity of stock
is necessary, and by withdrawing any part of this necessary
quantity, the farmer is not likely to be more able to pay either
the rent or the tax. In order to pay the tax, it can never be his
interest to diminish the quantity of his produce, nor
consequently to supply the market more sparingly than before. The
tax, therefore, will never enable him to raise the price of his
produce so as to reimburse himself by throwing the final payment
upon the consumer. The farmer, however, must have his reasonable
profit as well as every other dealer, otherwise he must give up
the trade. After the imposition of a tax of this kind, he can get
this reasonable profit only by paying less rent to the landlord.
The more he is obliged to pay in the way of tax the less he can
afford to pay in the way of rent. A tax of this kind imposed
during the currency of a lease may, no doubt, distress or ruin
the farmer. Upon the renewal of the lease it must always fall
upon the landlord.
     In the countries where the personal taille takes place, the
farmer is commonly assessed in proportion to the stock which he
appears to employ in cultivation. He is, upon this account,
frequently afraid to have a good team of horses or oxen, but
endeavours to cultivate with the meanest and most wretched
instruments of husbandry that he can. Such is his distrust in the
justice of his assessors that he counterfeits poverty, and wishes
to appear scarce able to pay anything for fear of being obliged
to pay too much. By this miserable policy he does not, perhaps,
always consult his own interest in the most effectual manner, and
he probably loses more by the diminution of his produce than he
saves by that of his tax. Though, in consequence of this wretched
cultivation, the market is, no doubt, somewhat worse supplied,
yet the small rise of price which may occasion, as it is not
likely even to indemnify the farmer for the diminution of his
produce, it is still less likely to enable him to pay more rent
to the landlord. The public, the farmer, the landlord, all suffer
more or less by this degraded cultivation. That the personal
taille tends, in many different ways, to discourage cultivation,
and consequently to dry up the principal source of the wealth of
every great country, I have already had occasion to observe in
the third book of this Inquiry.
     What are called poll-taxes in the southern provinces of
North America, and in the West Indian Islands annual taxes of so
much a head upon every negro, are properly taxes upon the profits
of a certain species of stock employed in agriculture. As the
planters are, the greater part of them, both farmers and
landlords, the final payment of the tax falls upon them in their
quality of landlords without any retribution.
     Taxes of so much a head upon the bondmen employed in
cultivation seem anciently to have been common all over Europe.
There subsists at present a tax of this kind in the empire of
Russia. It is probably upon this account that poll-taxes of all
kinds have often been represented as badges of slavery. Every
tax, however, is to the person who pays it a badge, not of
slavery, but of liberty. It denotes that he is subject to
government, indeed, but that, as he has some property, he cannot
himself be the property of a master. A poll-tax upon slaves is
altogether different from a poll-tax upon freemen. The latter is
paid by the persons upon whom it is imposed; the former by a
different set of persons. The latter is either altogether
arbitrary or altogether unequal, and in most cases is both the
one and the other; the former, though in some respects unequal,
different slaves being of different values, is in no respect
arbitrary. Every master who knows the number of his own slaves
knows exactly what he has to pay. Those different taxes, however,
being called by the same name, have been considered as of the
same nature.
     The taxes which in Holland are imposed upon men- and
maid-servants are taxes, not upon stock, but upon expense, and so
far resemble the taxes upon consumable commodities. The tax of a
guinea a head for every man-servant which has lately been imposed
in Great Britain is of the same kind. It falls heaviest upon the
middling rank. A man of two hundred a year may keep a single
manservant. A man of ten thousand a year will not keep fifty. It
does not affect the poor.
     Taxes upon the profits of stock in particular employments
can never affect the interest of money. Nobody will lend his
money for less interest to those who exercise the taxed than to
those who exercise the untaxed employments. Taxes upon the
revenue arising from stock in all employments where the
government attempts to levy them with any degree of exactness,
will, in many cases, fall upon the interest of money. The
Vingtieme, or twentieth penny, in France is a tax of the same
kind with what is called the land-tax in England, and is
assessed, in the same manner, upon the revenue arising from land,
houses, and stock. So far as it affects stock it is assessed,
though not with great rigour, yet with much more exactness than
that part of the land-tax of England which is imposed upon the
same fund. It, in many cases, falls altogether upon the interest
of money. Money is frequently sunk in France upon what are called
Contracts for the constitution of a rent; that is, perpetual
annuities redeemable at any time by the debtor upon repayment of
the sum originally advanced, but of which this redemption is not
exigible by the creditor except in particular cases. The
Vingtieme, seems not to have raised the rate of those annuities,
though it is exactly levied upon them all. 
                Appendix to ARTICLES I and II.
     Taxes upon the Capital Value of Land, Houses, and Stock 
     While property remains in the possession of the same person,
whatever permanent taxes may have been imposed upon it, they have
never been intended to diminish or take away any part of its
capital value, but only some part of the revenue arising from it.
But when property changes hands, when it is transmitted either
from the dead to the living, or from the living to the living,
such taxes have frequently been imposed upon it as necessarily
take away some part of its capital value.
     The transference of all sorts of property from the dead to
the living, and that of immovable property, of lands and houses,
from the living to the living, are transactions which are in
their nature either public and notorious, or such as cannot be
long concealed. Such transactions, therefore, may be taxed
directly. The transference of stock, or movable property, from
the living to the living, by the lending of money, is frequently
a secret transaction, and may always be made so. It cannot
easily, therefore, be taxed directly. It has been taxed
indirectly in two different ways; first, by requiring that the
deed containing the obligation to repay should be written upon
paper or parchment which had paid a certain stamp-duty, otherwise
not to be valid; secondly, by requiring, under the like penalty
of invalidity, that it should be recorded either in a public or
secret register, and by imposing certain duties upon such
registration. Stamp-duties and duties of registration have
frequently been imposed likewise upon the deeds transferring
property of all kinds from the dead to the living, and upon those
transferring immovable property from the living to the living,
transactions which might easily have been taxed directly.
     The Vicesima Hereditatum, the twentieth penny of
inheritances imposed by Augustus upon the ancient Romans, was a
tax upon the transference of property from the dead to the
living. Dion Cassius, the author who writes concerning it the
least indistinctly, says that it was imposed upon all
successions, legacies, and donations in case of death, except
upon those to the nearest relations and to the poor.
     Of the same kind is the Dutch tax upon successions.
Collateral successions are taxed, according to the degree of
relation, from five to thirty per cent upon the whole value of
the succession. Testamentary donations, or legacies to
collaterals, are subject to the like duties. Those from husband
to wife, or from wife to husband, to the fiftieth penny. The
Luctuosa Hereditas, the mournful succession of ascendants to
descendants, to the twentieth penny only. Direct successions, or
those of descendants to ascendants, pay no tax. The death of a
father, to such of his children as live in the same house with
him, is seldom attended with any increase, and frequently with a
considerable diminution of revenue, by the loss of his industry,
of his office, or of some life-rent estate of which he may have
been in possession. That tax would be cruel and oppressive which
aggravated their loss by taking from them any part of his
succession. It may, however, sometimes be otherwise with those
children who, in the language of the Roman law, are said to be
emancipated; in that of the Scotch law, to be forisfamiliated;
that is, who have received their portion, have got families of
their own, and are supported by funds separate and independent of
those of their father. Whatever part of his succession might come
to such children would be a real addition to their fortune, and
might therefore, perhaps, without more inconveniency than what
attends all duties of this kind, be liable to some tax.
     The casualties of the feudal law were taxes upon the
transference of land, both from the dead to the living, and from
the living to the living. In ancient times they constituted in
every part of Europe one of the principal branches of the revenue
of the crown.
     The heir of every immediate vassal of the crown paid a
certain duty, generally a year's rent, upon receiving the
investiture of the estate. If the heir was a minor, the whole
rents of the estate during the continuance of the minority
devolved to the superior without any other charge besides the
maintenance of the minor, and the payment of the widow's dower
when there happened to be a dowager upon the land. When the minor
came to be of age, another tax, called Relief, was still due to
the superior, which generally amounted likewise to a year's rent.
A long minority, which in the present times so frequently
disburdens a great estate of all its incumbrances and restores
the family to their ancient splendour, could in those times have
no such effect. The waste, and not the disincumbrance of the
estate, was the common effect of a long minority.
     By the feudal law the vassal could not alienate without the
consent of his superior, who generally extorted a fine or
composition for granting it. This fine, which was at first
arbitrary, came in many countries to be regulated at a certain
portion of the price of the land. In some countries where the
greater part of the other feudal customs have gone into disuse,
this tax upon the alienation of land still continues to make a
very considerable branch of the revenue of the sovereign. In the
canton of Berne it is so high as a sixth part of the price of all
noble fiefs, and a tenth part of that of all ignoble ones. In the
canton of Lucerne the tax upon the sale of lands is not
universal, and takes place only in certain districts. But if any
person sells his land in order to remove out of the territory, he
pays ten per cent upon the whole price of the sale. Taxes of the
same kind upon the sale either of all lands, or of lands held by
certain tenures, take place in many other countries, and make a
more or less considerable branch of the revenue of the sovereign.
     Such transactions may be taxed indirectly by means either of
stamp-duties, or of duties upon registration, and those duties
either may or may not be proportioned to the value of the subject
which is transferred.
     In Great Britain the stamp-duties are higher or lower, not
so much according to the value of the property transferred (an
eighteenpenny or half-crown stamp being sufficient upon a bond
for the largest sum of money) as according to the nature of the
deed. The highest do not exceed six pounds upon every sheet of
paper or skin of parchment, and these high duties fall chiefly
upon grants from the crown, and upon certain law proceedings,
without any regard to the value of the subject. There are in
Great Britain no duties on the registration of deeds or writings,
except the fees of the officers who keep the register, and these
are seldom more than a reasonable recompense for their labour.
The crown derives no revenue from them.
     In Holland there are both stamp-duties and duties upon
registration, which in some cases are, and in some are not,
proportioned to the value of the property transferred. All
testaments must be written upon stamped paper of which the price
is proportioned to the property disposed of, so that there are
stamps which cost from threepence, or three stivers a sheet, to
three hundred florins, equal to about twenty-seven pounds ten
shillings of our money. If the stamp is of an inferior price to
what the testator ought to have made use of, his succession is
confiscated. This is over and above all their other taxes on
succession. Except bills of exchange, and some other mercantile
bills, all other deeds, bonds, and contracts are subject to a
stamp-duty. This duty, however, does not rise in proportion to
the value of the subject. All sales of land and of houses, and
all mortgages upon either, must be registered, and, upon
registration, pay a duty to the state of two and a half per cent
upon the amount of the price or of the mortgage. This duty is
extended to the sale of all ships and vessels of more than two
tons burden, whether decked or undecked. These, it seems, are
considered as a sort of houses upon the water. The sale of
movables, when it is ordered by a court of justice, is subject to
the like duty of two and a half per cent.
     In France there are both stamp-duties and duties upon
registration. The former are considered as a branch of the aides
or excise, and in the provinces where those duties take place are
levied by the excise officers. The latter are considered as a
branch of the domain of the crown, and are levied by a different
set of officers.
     Those modes of taxation, by stamp-duties and by duties upon
registration, are of very modern invention. In the course of
little more than a century, however, stamp-duties have, in
Europe, become almost universal, and duties upon registration
extremely common. There is no art which one government sooner
learns of another than that of draining money from the pockets of
the people.
     Taxes upon the transference of property from the dead to the
living fall finally as well as immediately upon the person to
whom the property is transferred. Taxes upon the sale of land
fall altogether upon the seller. The seller is almost always
under the necessity of selling, and must, therefore, take such a
price as he can get. The buyer is scarce ever under the necessity
of buying, and will, therefore, only give such a price as he
likes. He considers what the land will cost him in tax and price
together. The more he is obliged to pay in the way of tax, the
less he will be disposed to give in the way of price. Such taxes,
therefore, fall almost always upon a necessitous person, and
must, therefore, be frequently very cruel and oppressive. Taxes
upon the sale of new-built houses, where the building is sold
without the ground, fall generally upon the buyer, because the
builder must generally have his profit, otherwise he must give up
the trade. If he advances the tax, therefore, the buyer must
generally repay it to him. Taxes upon the sale of old houses, for
the same reason as those upon the sale of land, fall generally
upon the seller, whom in most cases either conveniency or
necessity obliges to sell. The number of new-built houses that
are annually brought to market is more or less regulated by the
demand. Unless the demand is such as to afford the builder his
profit, after paying all expenses, he will build no more houses.
The number of old houses which happen at any time to come to
market is regulated by accidents of which the greater part have
no relation to the demand. Two or three great bankruptcies in a
mercantile town will bring many houses to sale which must be sold
for what can be got for them. Taxes upon the sale of ground-rents
fall altogether upon the seller, for the same reason as those
upon the sale of land. Stamp-duties, and duties upon the
registration of bonds and contracts for borrowed money, fall
altogether upon the borrower, and, in fact, are always paid by
him. Duties of the same kind upon law proceedings fall upon the
suitors. They reduce to both the capital value of the subject in
dispute. The more it costs to acquire any property, the less must
be the net value of it when acquired.
     All taxes upon the transference of property of every kind,
so far as they diminish the capital value of that property, tend
to diminish the funds destined for the maintenance of productive
labour. They are all more or less unthrifty taxes that increase
the revenue of the sovereign, which seldom maintains any but
unproductive labourers, at the expense of the capital of the
people, which maintains none but productive.
     Such taxes, even when they are proportioned to the value of
the property transferred, are still unequal, the frequency of
transference not being always equal in property of equal value.
When they are not proportioned to this value, which is the case
with the greater part of the stamp-duties and duties of
registration, they are still more so. They are in no respect
arbitrary, but are or may be in all cases perfectly clear and
certain. Though they sometimes fall upon the person who is not
very able to pay, the time of payment is in most cases
sufficiently convenient for him. When the payment becomes due, he
must in most cases have the money to pay. They are levied at very
little expense, and in general subject the contributors to no
other inconveniency besides always the unavoidable one of paying
the tax.
     In France the stamp-duties are not much complained of. Those
of registration, which they call the Controle, are. They give
occasion, it is pretended, to much extortion in the officers of
the farmers-general who collect the tax, which is in a great
measure arbitrary and uncertain. In the greater part of the
libels which have been written against the present system of
finances in France the abuses of the Controle make a principal
article. Uncertainty, however, does not seem to be necessarily
inherent in the nature of such taxes. If the popular complaints
are well founded, the abuse must arise, not so much from the
nature of the tax as from the want of precision and distinctness
in the words of the edicts or laws which impose it.
     The registration of mortgages, and in general of all rights
upon immovable property, as it gives great security both to
creditors and purchasers, is extremely advantageous to the
public. That of the greater part of deeds of other kinds is
frequently inconvenient and even dangerous to individuals,
without any advantage to the public. All registers which, it is
acknowledged, ought to be kept secret, ought certainly never to
exist. The credit of individuals ought certainly never to depend
upon so very slender a security as the probity and religion of
the inferior officers of revenue. But where the fees of
registration have been made a source of revenue to the sovereign,
register offices have commonly been multiplied without end, both
for the deeds which ought to be registered, and for those which
ought not. In France there are several different sorts of secret
registers. This abuse, though not perhaps a necessary, it must be
acknowledged, is a very natural effect of such taxes.
     Such stamp-duties as those in England upon cards and dice,
upon newspapers and periodical pamphlets, etc., are properly
taxes upon consumption; the final payment falls upon the persons
who use or consume such commodities. Such stamp-duties as those
upon licences to retail ale, wine, and spirituous liquors, though
intended, perhaps, to fall upon the profits of the retailers, are
likewise finally paid by the consumers of those liquors. Such
taxes, though called by the same name, and levied by the same
officers and in the same manner with the stamp-duties above
mentioned upon the transference of property, are, however, of a
quite different nature, and fall upon quite different funds. 
                        ARTICLE III
               Taxes upon the Wages of Labour 
     The wages of the inferior classes of workmen, I have
endeavoured to show in the first book, are everywhere necessarily
regulated by two different circumstances; the demand for labour,
and the ordinary or average price of provisions. The demand for
labour, according as it happens to be either increasing,
stationary, or declining, or to require an increasing,
stationary, or declining population, regulates the subsistence of
the labourer, and determines in what degree it shall be, either
liberal, moderate, or scanty. The ordinary or average price of
provisions determines the quantity of money which must be paid to
the workman in order to enable him, one year with another, to
purchase this liberal, moderate, or scanty subsistence. While the
demand for labour and the price of provisions, therefore, remain
the same, a direct tax upon the wages of labour can have no other
effect than to raise them somewhat higher than the tax. Let us
suppose, for example, that in a particular place the demand for
labour and the price of provisions were such as to render ten
shillings a week the ordinary wages of labour, and that a tax of
one-fifth, or four shillings in the pound, was imposed upon
wages. If the demand for labour and the price of provisions
remained the same, it would still be necessary that the labourer
should in that place earn such a subsistence as could be bought
only for ten shillings a week free wages. But in order to leave
him such free wages after paying such a tax, the price of labour
must in that place soon rise, not to twelve shillings a week
only, but to twelve and sixpence; that is, in order to enable him
to pay a tax of one-fifth, his wages must necessarily soon rise,
not one-fifth part only, but one-fourth. Whatever was the
proportion of the tax, the wages of labour must in all cases
rise, not only in that proportion, but in a higher proportion. If
the tax, for example, was one-tenth, the wages of labour must
necessarily soon rise, not one-tenth part only, but one-eighth.
     A direct tax upon the wages of labour, therefore, though the
labourer might perhaps pay it out of his hand, could not properly
be said to be even advanced by him; at least if tile demand for
labour and the average price of provisions remained the same
after the tax as before it. In all such cases, not only the tax
but something more than the tax would in reality be advanced by
the person who immediately employed him. The final payment would
in different cases fall upon different persons. The rise which
such a tax might occasion in the wages of manufacturing labour
would be advanced by the master manufacturer, who would both be
entitled and obliged to charge it, with a profit, upon the price
of his goods. The final payment of this rise of wages, therefore,
together with the additional profit of the master manufacturer,
would fall upon the consumer. The rise which such a tax might
occasion in the wages of country labour would be advanced by the
farmer, who, in order to maintain the same number of labourers as
before, would be obliged to employ a greater capital. In order to
get back this greater capital, together with the ordinary profits
of stock, it would be necessary that he should retain a larger
portion, or what comes to the same thing, the price of a larger
portion, of the produce of the land, and consequently that he
should pay less rent to the landlord. The final payment of this
rise of wages, therefore, would in this case fall upon the
landlord, together with the additional profit of the farmer who
had advanced it. In all cases a direct tax upon the wages of
labour must, in the long-run, occasion both a greater reduction
in the rent of land, and a greater rise in the price of
manufactured goods, than would have followed from the proper
assessment of a sum equal to the produce of the tax partly upon
the rent of land, and partly upon consumable commodities.
     If direct taxes upon the wages of labour have not always
occasioned a proportionable rise in those wages, it is because
they have generally occasioned a considerable fall in the demand
for labour. The declension of industry, the decrease of
employment for the poor, the diminution of the annual produce of
the land and labour of the country, have generally been the
effects of such taxes. In consequence of them, however, the price
of labour must always be higher than it otherwise would have been
in the actual state of the demand: and this enhancement of price,
together with the profit of those who advance it, must always be
finally paid by the landlords and consumers.
     A tax upon the wages of country labour does not raise the
price of the rude produce of land in proportion to the tax, for
the same reason that a tax upon the farmer's profit does not
raise that price in that proportion.
     Absurd and destructive as such taxes are, however, they take
place in many countries. In France that part of the taille which
is charged upon the industry of workmen and day-labourers in
country villages is properly a tax of this kind. Their wages are
computed according to the common rate of the district in which
they reside, and that they may be as little liable as possible to
any overcharge, their yearly gains are estimated at no more than
two hundred working days in the year. The tax of each individual
is varied from year to year according to different circumstances,
of which the collector or the commissary whom the intendant
appoints to assist him are the judges. In Bohemia, in consequence
of the alteration in the system of finances which was begun in
1748, a very heavy tax is imposed upon the industry of
artificers. They are divided into four classes. The highest class
pay a hundred florins a year which, at two-and-twenty pence
halfpenny a florin, amounts to L9 7s. 6d. The second class are
taxed at seventy; the third at fifty; and the fourth,
comprehending artificers in villages, and the lowest class of
those in towns, at twenty-five florins.
     The recompense of ingenious artists and of men of liberal
professions, I have endeavoured to show in the first book,
necessarily keeps a certain proportion to the emoluments of
inferior trades. A tax upon this recompense, therefore, could
have no other effect than to raise it somewhat higher than in
proportion to the tax. If it did not rise in this manner, the
ingenious arts and the liberal professions, being no longer upon
a level with other trades, would be so much deserted that they
would soon return to that level.
     The emoluments of offices are not, like those of trades and
professions, regulated by the free competition of the market, and
do not, therefore, always bear a just proportion to what the
nature of the employment requires. They are, perhaps, in most
countries, higher than it requires; the persons who have the
administration of government being generally disposed to reward
both themselves and their immediate dependants rather more than
enough. The emoluments of offices, therefore, can in most cases
very well bear to be taxed. The persons, besides, who enjoy
public offices, especially the more lucrative, are in all
countries the objects of general envy, and a tax upon their
emoluments, even though it should be somewhat higher than upon
any other sort of revenue, is always a very popular tax. In
England, for example, when by the land-tax every other sort of
revenue was supposed to be assessed at four shillings in the
pound, it was very popular to lay a real tax of five shillings
and sixpence in the pound upon the salaries of offices which
exceeded a hundred pounds a year, the pensions of the younger
branches of the royal family, the pay of the officers of the army
and navy, and a few others less obnoxious to envy excepted. There
are in England no other direct taxes upon the wages of labour. 
                           ARTICLE IV   Taxes which, it is
intended, should fall indifferently upon every
                     different Species of Revenue 
     The taxes which, it is intended, should fall indifferently
upon every different species of revenue, are capitation taxes,
and taxes upon consumable commodities. These must be paid
indifferently from whatever revenue the contributors may possess;
from the rent of their land, from the profits of their stock, or
from the wages of their labour. 
                         Capitation Taxes 
     Capitation taxes, if it is attempted to proportion them to
the fortune or revenue of each contributor, become altogether
arbitrary. The state of a man's fortune varies from day to day,
and without an inquisition more intolerable than any tax, and
renewed at least once every year, can only be guessed at. His
assessment, therefore, must in most cases depend upon the good or
bad humour of his assessors, and must, therefore, be altogether
arbitrary and uncertain.
     Capitation taxes, if they are proportioned not to the
supposed fortune, but to the rank of each contributor, become
altogether unequal, the degrees of fortune being frequently
unequal in the same degree of rank.
     Such taxes, therefore, if it is attempted to render them
equal, become altogether arbitrary and uncertain, and if it is
attempted to render them certain and not arbitrary, become
altogether unequal. Let the tax be light or heavy, uncertainty is
always a great grievance. In a light tax a considerable degree of
inequality may be supported; in a heavy one it is altogether
intolerable.
     In the different poll-taxes which took place in England
during the reign of William III the contributors were, the
greater part of them, assessed according to the degree of their
rank; as dukes, marquisses, earls, viscounts, barons, esquires,
gentlemen, the eldest and youngest sons of peers, etc. All
shopkeepers and tradesmen worth more than three hundred pounds,
that is, the better sort of them, were subject to the same
assessment, how great soever might be the difference in their
fortunes. Their rank was more considered than their fortune.
Several of those who in the first poll-tax were rated according
to their supposed fortune were afterwards rated according to
their rank. Serjeants, attorneys, and proctors at law, who in the
first poll-tax were assessed at three shillings in the pound of
their supposed income, were afterwards assessed as gentlemen. In
the assessment of a tax which was not very heavy, a considerable
degree of inequality had been found less insupportable than any
degree of uncertainty.
     In the capitation which has been levied in France without
any interruption since the beginning of the present century, the
highest orders of people are rated according to their rank by an
invariable tariff; the lower orders of people, according to what
is supposed to be their fortune, by an assessment which varies
from year to year. The officers of the king's court, the judges
and other officers in the superior courts of justice, the
officers of the troops, etc., are assessed in the first manner.
The inferior ranks of people in the provinces are assessed in the
second. In France the great easily submit to a considerable
degree of inequality in a tax which, so far as it affects them,
is not a very heavy one, but could not brook the arbitrary
assessment of an intendant. The inferior ranks of people must, in
that country, suffer patiently the usage which their superiors
think proper to give them.
     In England the different poll-taxes never produced the sum
which had been expected from them, or which, it was supposed,
they might have produced, had they been exactly levied. In France
the capitation always produces the sum expected from it. The mild
government of England, when it assessed the different ranks of
people to the poll-tax, contented itself with what that
assessment happened to produce, and required no compensation for
the loss which the state might sustain either by those who could
not pay, or by those who would not pay (for there were many
such), and who, by the indulgent execution of the law, were not
forced to pay. The more severe government of France assesses upon
each generality a certain sum, which the intendant must find as
he can. If any province complains of being assessed too high, it
may, in the assessment of next year, obtain an abatement
proportioned to the overcharge of the year before. But it must
pay in the meantime. The intendant, in order to be sure of
finding the sum assessed upon his generality, was empowered to
assess it in a larger sum that the failure or inability of some
of the contributors might be compensated by the overcharge of the
rest, and till 1765 the fixation of this surplus assessment was
left altogether to his discretion. In that year, indeed, the
council assumed this power to itself. In the capitation of the
provinces, it is observed by the perfectly well-informed author
of the Memoires upon the impositions in France, the proportion
which falls upon the nobility, and upon those whose privileges
exempt them from the taille, is the least considerable. The
largest falls upon those subject to the taille, who are assessed
to the capitation at so much a pound of what they pay to that
other tax.
     Capitation taxes, so far as they are levied upon the lower
ranks of people, are direct taxes upon the wages of labour, and
are attended with all the inconveniences of such taxes.
     Capitation taxes are levied at little expense, and, where
they are rigorously exacted, afford a very sure revenue to the
state. It is upon this account that in countries where the ease,
comfort, and security of the inferior ranks of people are little
attended to, capitation taxes are very common. It is in general,
however, but a small part of the public revenue which, in a great
empire, has ever been drawn from such taxes, and the greatest sum
which they have ever afforded might always have been found in
some other way much more convenient to the people. 
              Taxes upon Consumable Commodities 
     The impossibility of taxing the people, in proportion to
their revenue, by any capitation, seems to have given occasion to
the invention of taxes upon consumable commodities. The state,
not knowing how to tax, directly and proportionably, the revenue
of its subjects, endeavours to tax it indirectly by taxing their
expense, which, it is supposed, will in most cases be nearly in
proportion to their revenue. Their expense is taxed by taxing the
consumable commodities upon which it is laid out.
     Consumable commodities are either necessaries or luxuries.
     By necessaries I understand not only the commodities which
are indispensably necessary for the support of life, but whatever
the custom of the country renders it indecent for creditable
people, even of the lowest order, to be without. A linen shirt,
for example, is, strictly speaking, not a necessary of life. The
Greeks and Romans lived, I suppose, very comfortably though they
had no linen. But in the present times, through the greater part
of Europe, a creditable day-labourer would be ashamed to appear
in public without a linen shirt, the want of which would be
supposed to denote that disgraceful degree of poverty which, it
is presumed, nobody can well fall into without extreme bad
conduct. Custom, in the same manner, has rendered leather shoes a
necessary of life in England. The poorest creditable person of
either sex would be ashamed to appear in public without them. In
Scotland, custom has rendered them a necessary of life to the
lowest order of men; but not to the same order of women, who may,
without any discredit, walk about barefooted. In France they are
necessaries neither to men nor to women, the lowest rank of both
sexes appearing there publicly, without any discredit, sometimes
in wooden shoes, and sometimes barefooted. Under necessaries,
therefore, I comprehend not only those things which nature, but
those things which the established rules of decency have rendered
necessary to the lowest rank of people. All other things I call
luxuries, without meaning by this appellation to throw the
smallest degree of reproach upon the temperate use of them. Beer
and ale, for example, in Great Britain, and wine, even in the
wine countries, I call luxuries. A man of any rank may, without
any reproach, abstain totally from tasting such liquors. Nature
does not render them necessary for the support of life, and
custom nowhere renders it indecent to live without them.
     As the wages of labour are everywhere regulated, partly by
the demand for it, and partly by the average price of the
necessary articles of subsistence, whatever raises this average
price must necessarily raise those wages so that the labourer may
still be able to purchase that quantity of those necessary
articles which the state of the demand for labour, whether
increasing, stationary, or declining, requires that he should
have. A tax upon those articles necessarily raises their price
somewhat higher than the amount of the tax, because the dealer,
who advances the tax, must generally get it back with a profit.
Such a tax must, therefore, occasion a rise in the wages of
labour proportionable to this rise of price.
     It is thus that a tax upon the necessaries of life operates
exactly in the same manner as a direct tax upon the wages of
labour. The labourer, though he may pay it out of his hand,
cannot, for any considerable time at least, be properly said even
to advance it. It must always in the long-run be advanced to him
by his immediate employer in the advanced rate of his wages. His
employer, if he is a manufacturer, will charge upon the price of
his goods this rise of wages, together with a profit; so that the
final payment of the tax, together with this overcharge, will
fall upon the consumer. If his employer is a farmer, the final
payment, together with a like overcharge, will fall upon the rent
of the landlord.
     It is otherwise with taxes upon what I call luxuries, even
upon those of the poor. The rise in the price of the taxed
commodities will not necessarily occasion any rise in the wages
of labour. A tax upon tobacco, for example, though a luxury of
the poor as well as of the rich, will not raise wages. Though it
is taxed in England at three times, and in France at fifteen
times its original price, those high duties seem to have no
effect upon the wages of labour. The same thing may be said of
the taxes upon tea and sugar, which in England and Holland have
become luxuries of the lowest ranks of people, and of those upon
chocolate, which in Spain is said to have become so. The
different taxes which in Great Britain have in the course of the
present century been imposed upon spirituous liquors are not
supposed to have had any effect upon the wages of labour. The
rise in the price of porter, occasioned by an additional tax of
three shillings upon the barrel of strong beer, has not raised
the wages of common labour in London. These were about eighteen
pence and twenty pence a day before the tax, and they are not
more now.
     The high price of such commodities does not necessarily
diminish the ability of the inferior ranks of people to bring up
families. Upon the sober and industrious poor, taxes upon such
commodities act as sumptuary laws, and dispose them either to
moderate, or to refrain altogether from the use of superfluities
which they can no longer easily afford. Their ability to bring up
families, in consequence of this forced frugality, instead of
being diminished, is frequently, perhaps, increased by the tax.
It is the sober and industrious poor who generally bring up the
most numerous families, and who principally supply the demand for
useful labour. All the poor, indeed, are not sober and
industrious, and the dissolute and disorderly might continue to
indulge themselves in the use of such commodities after this rise
of price in the same manner as before without regarding the
distress which this indulgence might bring upon their families.
Such disorderly persons, however, seldom rear up numerous
families, their children generally perishing from neglect,
mismanagement, and the scantiness or unwholesomeness of their
food. If by the strength of their constitution they survive the
hardships to which the bad conduct of their parents exposes them,
yet the example of that bad conduct commonly corrupts their
morals, so that, instead of being useful to society by their
industry, they become public nuisances by their vices and
disorders. Though the advanced price of the luxuries of the poor,
therefore, might increase somewhat the distress of such
disorderly families, and thereby diminish somewhat their ability
to bring up children, it would not probably diminish much the
useful population of the country.
     Any rise in the average price of necessaries, unless it is
compensated by a proportionable rise in the wages of labour, must
necessarily diminish more or less the ability of the poor to
bring up numerous families, and consequently to supply the demand
for useful labour, whatever may be the state of that demand,
whether increasing, stationary, or declining, or such as requires
an increasing, stationary, or declining population.
     Taxes upon luxuries have no tendency to raise the price of
any other commodities except that of the commodities taxed. Taxes
upon necessaries, by raising the wages of labour, necessarily
tend to raise the price of all manufactures, and consequently to
diminish the extent of their sale and consumption. Taxes upon
luxuries are finally paid by the consumers of the commodities
taxed without any retribution. They fall indifferently upon every
species of revenue, the wages of labour, the profits of stock,
and the rent of land. Taxes upon necessaries, so far as they
affect the labouring poor, are finally paid, partly by landlords
in the diminished rent of their lands, and partly by rich
consumers, whether landlords or others, in the advanced price of
manufactured goods, and always with a considerable overcharge.
The advanced price of such manufactures as are real necessaries
of life, and are destined for the consumption of the poor, of
coarse woollens, for example, must be compensated to the poor by
a further advancement of their wages. The middling and superior
ranks of people, if they understand their own interest, ought
always to oppose all taxes upon the necessaries of life, as well
as all direct taxes upon the wages of labour. The final payment
of both the one and the other falls altogether upon themselves,
and always with a considerable overcharge. They fall heaviest
upon the landlords, who always pay in a double capacity; in that
of landlords by the reduction of their rent, and in that of rich
consumers by the increase of their expense. The observation of
Sir Matthew Decker, that certain taxes are, in the price of
certain goods, sometimes repeated and accumulated four or five
times, is perfectly just with regard to taxes upon the
necessaries of life. In the price of leather, for example, you
must pay not only for the tax upon the leather of your own shoes,
but for a part of that upon those of the shoemaker and the
tanner. You must pay, too, for the tax upon the salt, upon the
soap, and upon the candles which those workmen consume while
employed in your service, and for the tax upon the leather which
the salt-maker, the soap-maker, and the candle-maker consume
while employed in their service.
     In Great Britain, the principal taxes upon the necessaries
of life are those upon the four commodities just now mentioned,
salt, leather, soap, and candles.
     Salt is a very ancient and a very universal subject of
taxation. It was taxed among the Romans, and it is so at present
in, I believe, every part of Europe. The quantity annually
consumed by any individual is so small, and may be purchased so
gradually, that nobody, it seems to have been thought, could feel
very sensibly even a pretty heavy tax upon it. It is in England
taxed at three shillings and fourpence a bushel- about three
times the original price of the commodity. In some other
countries the tax is still higher. Leather is a real necessary of
life. The use of linen renders soap such. In countries where the
winter nights are long, candles are a necessary instrument of
trade. Leather and soap are in Great Britain taxed at three
halfpence a pound, candles at a penny; taxes which, upon the
original price of leather, may amount to about eight or ten per
cent; upon that of soap to about twenty or five-and-twenty per
cent; and upon that of candles to about fourteen or fifteen per
cent; taxes which, though lighter than that upon salt, are still
very heavy. As all those four commodities are real necessaries of
life, such heavy taxes upon them must increase somewhat the
expense of the sober and industrious poor, and must consequently
raise more or less the wages of their labour.
     In a country where the winters are so cold as in Great
Britain, fuel is, during that season, in the strictest sense of
the word, a necessary of life, not only for the purpose of
dressing victuals, but for the comfortable subsistence of many
different sorts of workmen who work within doors; and coals are
the cheapest of all fuel. The price of fuel has so important an
influence upon that of labour that all over Great Britain
manufactures have confined themselves principally to the coal
countries, other parts of the country, on account of the high
price of this necessary article, not being able to work so cheap.
In some manufactures, besides, coal is a necessary instrument of
trade, as in those of glass, iron, and all other metals. If a
bounty could in any case be reasonable, it might perhaps be so
upon the transportation of coals from those parts of the country
in which they abound to those in which they are wanted. But the
legislature, instead of a bounty, has imposed a tax of three
shillings and threepence a ton upon coal carried coastways, which
upon most sorts of coal is more than sixty per cent of the
original price at the coal-pit. Coals carried either by land or
by inland navigation pay no duty. Where they are naturally cheap,
they are consumed duty free: where they are naturally dear, they
are loaded with a heavy duty.
     Such taxes, though they raise the price of subsistence, and
consequently the wages of labour, yet they afford a considerable
revenue to government which it might not be easy to find in any
other way. There may, therefore, be good reasons for continuing
them. The bounty upon the exportation of corn, so far as it tends
in the actual state of tillage to raise the price of that
necessary article, produces all the like bad effects, and instead
of affording any revenue, frequently occasions a very great
expense to government. The high duties upon the importation of
foreign corn, which in years of moderate plenty amount to a
prohibition, and the absolute prohibition of the importation
either of live cattle or of salt provisions, which takes place in
the ordinary state of the law, and which, on account of the
scarcity, is at present suspended for a limited time with regard
to Ireland and the British plantations, have all the bad effects
of taxes upon the necessaries of life, and produce no revenue to
government. Nothing seems necessary for the repeal of such
regulations but to convince the public of the futility of that
system in consequence of which they have been established.
     Taxes upon the necessaries of life are much higher in many
other countries than in Great Britain. Duties upon flour and meal
when ground at the mill, and upon bread when baked at the oven,
take place in many countries. In Holland the money price of the
bread consumed in towns is supposed to be doubled by means of
such taxes. In lieu of a part of them, the people who live in the
country pay every year so much a head according to the sort of
bread they are supposed to consume. Those who consume wheaten
bread pay three guilders fifteen stivers- about six shillings and
ninepence halfpenny. These, and some other taxes of the same
kind, by raising the price of labour, are said to have ruined the
greater part of the manufactures of Holland. Similar taxes,
though not quite so heavy, take place in the Milanese, in the
states of Genoa, in the duchy of Modena, in the duchies of Parma,
Placentia, and Guastalla, and in the ecclesiastical state. A
French author of some note has proposed to reform the finances of
his country by substituting in the room of the greater part of
other taxes this most ruinous of all taxes. There is nothing so
absurd, says Cicero, which has not sometimes been asserted by
philosophers.
     Taxes upon butchers' meat are still more common than those
upon bread. It may indeed be doubted whether butchers' meat is
anywhere a necessary of life. Grain and other vegetables, with
the help of milk, cheese, and butter, or oil where butter is not
to be had, it is known from experience, can, without any
butchers' meat, afford the most plentiful, the most wholesome,
the most nourishing, and the most invigorating diet. Decency
nowhere requires that any man should eat butchers' meat, as it in
most places requires that he should wear a linen shirt or a pair
of leather shoes.
     Consumable commodities, whether necessaries or luxuries, may
be taxed in two different ways. The consumer may either pay an
annual sum on account of his using or consuming goods of a
certain kind, or the goods may be taxed while they remain in the
hands of the dealer, and before they are delivered to the
consumer. The consumable goods which last a considerable time
before they are consumed altogether are most properly taxed in
the one way; those of which the consumption is either immediate
or more speedy, in the other. The coach-tax and plate-tax are
examples of the former method of imposing: the greater part of
the other duties of excise and customs, of the latter.
     A coach may, with good management, last ten or twelve years.
It might be taxed, once for all, before it comes out of the hands
of the coachmaker. But it is certainly more convenient for the
buyer to pay four pounds a year for the privilege of keeping a
coach than to pay all at once forty or forty-eight pounds
additional price to the coachmaker, or a sum equivalent to what
the tax is likely to cost him during the time he uses the same
coach. A service of plate, in the same manner, may last more than
a century. It is certainly easier for the consumer to pay five
shillings a year for every hundred ounces of plate, near one per
cent of the value, than to redeem this long annuity at
five-and-twenty or thirty years' purchase, which would enhance
the price at least five-and-twenty or thirty per cent. The
different taxes which affect houses are certainly more
conveniently paid by moderate annual payments than by a heavy tax
of equal value upon the first building or sale of the house.
     It was the well-known proposal of Sir Matthew Decker that
all commodities, even those of which the consumption is either
immediate or very speedy, should be taxed in this manner, the
dealer advancing nothing, but the consumer paying a certain
annual sum for the licence to consume certain goods. The object
of his scheme was to promote all the different branches of
foreign trade, particularly the carrying trade, by taking away
all duties upon importation and exportation, and thereby enabling
the merchant to employ his whole capital and credit in the
purchase of goods and the freight of ships, no part of either
being diverted towards the advancing of taxes. The project,
however, of taxing, in this manner, goods of immediate or speedy
consumption seems liable to the four following very important
objections. First, the tax would be more unequal, or not so well
proportioned to the expense and consumption of the different
contributors as in the way in which it is commonly imposed. The
taxes upon ale, wine, and spirituous liquors, which are advanced
by the dealers, are finally paid by the different consumers
exactly in proportion to their respective consumption. But if the
tax were to be paid by purchasing a licence to drink those
liquors, the sober would, in proportion to his consumption, be
taxed much more heavily than the drunken consumer. A family which
exercised great hospitality would be taxed much more lightly than
one who entertained fewer guests. Secondly, this mode of
taxation, by paying for an annual, half-yearly, or quarterly
licence to consume certain goods, would diminish very much one of
the principal conveniences of taxes upon goods of speedy
consumption the piecemeal payment. In the price of threepence
halfpenny, which is at present paid for a pot of porter, the
different taxes upon malt, hops, and beer, together with the
extraordinary profit which the brewer charges for having advanced
them, may perhaps amount to about three halfpence. If a workman
can conveniently spare those three halfpence, he buys a pot of
porter. If he cannot, he contents himself with a pint, and, as a
penny saved is a penny got, he thus gains a farthing by his
temperance. He pays the tax piecemeal as he can afford to pay it,
and when he can afford to pay it, and every act of payment is
perfectly voluntary, and what he can avoid if he chooses to do
so. Thirdly, such taxes would operate less as sumptuary laws.
When the licence was once purchased, whether the purchaser drank
much or drank little, his tax would be the same. Fourthly, if a
workman were to pay all at once, by yearly, half-yearly, or
quarterly payments, a tax equal to what he at present pays, with
little or no inconveniency, upon all the different pots and pints
of porter which he drinks in any such period of time, the sum
might frequently distress him very much. This mode of taxation,
therefore, it seems evident, could never, without the most
grievous oppression, produce a revenue nearly equal to what is
derived from the present mode without any oppression. In several
countries, however, commodities of an immediate or very speedy
consumption are taxed in this manner. In Holland people pay so
much a head for a licence to drink tea. I have already mentioned
a tax upon bread, which, so far as it is consumed in farm-houses
and country villages, is there levied in the same manner.
     The duties of excise are imposed briefly upon goods of home
produce destined for home consumption. They are imposed only upon
a few sorts of goods of the most general use. There can never be
any doubt either concerning the goods which are subject to those
duties, or concerning the particular duty which each species of
goods is subject to. They fall almost altogether upon what I call
luxuries, excepting always the four duties above mentioned, upon
salt soap, leather, candles, and, perhaps, that upon green glass.
     The duties of customs are much more ancient than those of
excise. They seem to have been called customs as denoting
customary payments which had been in use from time immemorial.
They appear to have been originally considered as taxes upon the
profits of merchants. During the barbarous times of feudal
anarchy, merchants, like all the other inhabitants of burghs,
were considered as little better than emancipated bondmen, whose
persons were despised, and whose gains were envied. The great
nobility, who had consented that the king should tallage the
profits of their own tenants, were not unwilling that he should
tallage likewise those of an order of men whom it was much less
their interest to protect. In those ignorant times it was not
understood that the profits of merchants are a subject not
taxable directly, or that the final payment of all such taxes
must fall, with a considerable overcharge, upon the consumers.
     The gains of alien merchants were looked upon more
unfavourably than those of English merchants. It was natural,
therefore, that those of the former should be taxed more heavily
than those of the latter. This distinction between the duties
upon aliens and those upon English merchants, which was begun
from ignorance, has been continued from the spirit of monopoly,
or in order to give our own merchants an advantage both in the
home and in the foreign market.
     With this distinction, the ancient duties of customs were
imposed equally upon all sorts of goods, necessaries as well as
luxuries, goods exported as well as goods imported. Why should
the dealers in one sort of goods, it seems to have been thought,
be more favoured than those in another? or why should the
merchant exporter be more favoured than the merchant importer?
     The ancient customs were divided into three branches. The
first, and perhaps the most ancient of all those duties, was that
upon wool and leather. It seems to have been chiefly or
altogether an exportation duty. When the woollen manufacture came
to be established in England, lest the king should lose any part
of his customs upon wool by the exportation of woollen cloths, a
like duty was imposed upon them. The other two branches were,
first, a duty upon wine, which, being imposed at so much a ton,
was called a tonnage, and, secondly, a duty upon all other goods,
which, being imposed at so much a pound of their supposed value,
was called a poundage. In the forty-seventh year of Edward III a
duty of sixpence in the pound was imposed upon all goods exported
and imported, except wools, wool-fells, leather, and wines, which
were subject to particular duties. In the fourteenth of Richard
II this duty was raised to one shilling in the pound, but three
years afterwards it was again reduced to sixpence. It was raised
to eightpence in the second year of Henry IV, and in the fourth
year of the same prince to one shilling. From this time to the
ninth year of William III this duty continued at one shilling in
the pound. The duties of tonnage and poundage were generally
granted to the king by one and the same Act of Parliament, and
were called the Subsidy of Tonnage and Poundage. The Subsidy of
Poundage having continued for so long a time at one shining in
the pound, or at five per cent, a subsidy came, in the language
of the customs, to denote a general duty of this kind of five per
cent. This subsidy, which is now called the Old Subsidy, still
continues to be levied according to the book of rates established
in the twelfth of Charles II. The method of ascertaining, by a
book of rates, the value of goods subject to this duty is said to
be older than the time of James I. The New Subsidy imposed by the
ninth and tenth of William III was an additional five per cent
upon the greater part of goods. The One-third and the Two-third
Subsidy made up between them another five per cent of which they
were proportionable parts. The Subsidy of 1747 made a fourth five
per cent upon the greater part of goods; and that of 1759 a fifth
upon some particular sorts of goods. Besides those five
subsidies, a great variety of other duties have occasionally been
imposed upon particular sorts of goods, in order sometimes to
relieve the exigencies of the state, and sometimes to regulate
the trade of the country according to the principles of the
mercantile system.
     That system has come gradually more and more into fashion.
The Old Subsidy was imposed indifferently upon exportation as
well as importation. The four subsequent subsidies, as well as
the other duties which have been occasionally imposed upon
particular sorts of goods have, with a few exceptions, been laid
altogether upon importation. The greater part of the ancient
duties which had been imposed upon the exportation of the goods
of home produce and manufacture have either been lightened or
taken away altogether. In most cases they have been taken away.
Bounties have even been given upon the exportation of some of
them. Drawbacks too, sometimes of the whole, and, in most cases,
of a part of the duties which are paid upon the importation of
foreign goods, have been granted upon their exportation. Only
half the duties imposed by the Old Subsidy upon importation are
drawn back upon exportation: but the whole of those imposed by
the latter subsidies and other imposts are, upon the greater part
of goods, drawn back in the same manner. This growing favour of
exportation, and discouragement of importation, have suffered
only a few exceptions, which chiefly concern the materials of
some manufactures. These our merchants and manufacturers are
willing should come as cheap as possible to themselves, and as
dear as possible to their rivals and competitors in other
countries. Foreign materials are, upon this account, sometimes
allowed to be imported duty free; Spanish wool, for example,
flax, and raw linen yarn. The exportation of the materials of
home produce, and of those which are the particular produce of
our colonies, has sometimes been prohibited, and sometimes
subjected to higher duties. The exportation of English wool has
been prohibited. That of beaver skins, of beaver wool, and of gum
Senega has been subjected to higher duties. Great Britain, by the
conquest of Canada and Senegal, having got almost the monopoly of
those commodities.
     That the mercantile system has not been very favourable to
the revenue of the great body of the people, to the annual
produce of the land and labour of the country, I have endeavoured
to show in the fourth book of this Inquiry. It seems not to have
been more favourable to the revenue of the sovereign, so far at
least as that revenue depends upon the duties of customs.
     In consequence of that system, the importation of several
sorts of goods has been prohibited altogether. This prohibition
has in some cases entirely prevented, and in others has very much
diminished the importation of those commodities by reducing the
importers to the necessity of smuggling. It has entirely
prevented the importation of foreign woollens, and it has very
much diminished that of foreign silks and velvets. In both cases
it has entirely annihilated the revenue of customs which might
have been levied upon such importation.
     The high duties which have been imposed upon the importation
of many different sorts of foreign goods, in order to discourage
their consumption in Great Britain, have in many cases served
only to encourage smuggling, and in all cases have reduced the
revenue of the customs below what more moderate duties would have
afforded. The saying of Dr. Swift, that in the arithmetic of the
customs two and two, instead of making four, make sometimes only
one, holds perfectly true with regard to such heavy duties which
never could have been imposed had not the mercantile system
taught us, in many cases, to employ taxation as an instrument,
not of revenue, but of monopoly.
     The bounties which are sometimes given upon the exportation
of home produce and manufactures, and the drawbacks which are
paid upon the re-exportation of the greater part of foreign
goods, have given occasion to many frauds, and to a species of
smuggling more destructive of the public revenue than any other.
In order to obtain the bounty or drawback, the goods, it is well
known, are sometimes shipped and sent to sea, but soon afterwards
clandestinely relanded in some other part of the country. The
defalcation of the revenue of customs occasioned by the bounties
and drawbacks, of which a great part are obtained fraudulently,
is very great. The gross produce of the customs in the year which
ended on the 5th of January 1755 amounted to L5,068,000. The
bounties which were paid out of this revenue, though in that year
there was no bounty upon corn, amounted to L167,800. The
drawbacks which were paid upon debentures and certificates, to
L2,156,800. Bounties and drawbacks together amounted to
L2,324,600. In consequence of these deductions the revenue of the
customs amounted only to L2,743,400: from which, deducting
L287,900 for the expense of management in salaries and other
incidents, the net revenue of the customs for that year comes out
to be L2,455,500. The expense of management amounts in this
manner to between five and six per cent upon the gross revenue of
the customs, and to something more than ten per cent upon what
remains of that revenue after deducting what is paid away in
bounties and drawbacks.
     Heavy duties being imposed upon almost all goods imported,
our merchant importers smuggle as much and make entry of as
little as they can. Our merchant exporters, on the contrary, make
entry of more than they export; sometimes out of vanity, and to
pass for great dealers in goods which pay no duty, and sometimes
to gain a bounty or a drawback. Our exports, in consequence of
these different frauds, appear upon the customhouse books greatly
to overbalance our imports, to the unspeakable comfort of those
politicians who measure the national prosperity by what they call
the balance of trade.
     All goods imported, unless particularly exempted, and such
exemptions are not very numerous, are liable to some duties of
customs. If any goods are imported not mentioned in the book of
rates, they are taxed at 4s. 9 9/20d. for every twenty shillings
value, according to the oath of the importer, that is, nearly at
five subsidies, or five poundage duties. The book of rates is
extremely comprehensive, and enumerates a great variety of
articles, many of them little used, and therefore not well known.
It is upon this account frequently uncertain under what article a
particular sort of goods ought to be classed, and consequently
what duty they ought to pay. Mistakes with regard to this
sometimes ruin the custom-house officer, and frequently occasion
much trouble, expense, and vexation to the importer. In point of
perspicuity, precision, and distinctness, therefore, the duties
of customs are much more inferior to those of excise.
     In order that the greater part of the members of any society
should contribute to the public revenue in proportion to their
respective expense, it does not seem necessary that every single
article of that expense should be taxed. The revenue which is
levied by the duties of excise is supposed to fall as equally
upon the contributors as that which is levied by the duties of
customs, and the duties of excise are imposed upon a few articles
only of the most general use and consumption. It has been the
opinion of many people that, by proper management, the duties of
customs might likewise, without any loss to the public revenue,
and with great advantage to foreign trade, be confined to a few
articles only.
     The foreign articles of the most general use and consumption
in Great Britain seem at present to consist chiefly in foreign
wines and brandies; in some of the productions of America and the
West Indies- sugar, rum, tobacco, cocoanuts, etc.; and in some of
those of the East Indies- tea, coffee, china-ware, spiceries of
all kinds, several sorts of piece-goods, etc. These different
articles afford, perhaps, at present, the greater part of the
revenue which is drawn from the duties of customs. The taxes
which at present subsist upon foreign manufactures, if you except
those upon the few contained in the foregoing enumeration, have
the greater part of them been imposed for the purpose, not of
revenue, but of monopoly, or to give our own merchants an
advantage in the home market. By removing all prohibitions, and
by subjecting all foreign manufactures to such moderate taxes as
it was found from experience afforded upon each article the
greatest revenue to the public, our own workmen might still have
a considerable advantage in the home market, and many articles,
some of which at present afford no revenue to government, and
others a very inconsiderable one, might afford a very great one.
     High taxes, sometimes by diminishing the consumption of the
taxed commodities, and sometimes by encouraging smuggling,
frequently afford a smaller revenue to government than what might
be drawn from more moderate taxes.
     When the diminution of revenue is the effect of the
diminution of consumption there can be but one remedy, and that
is the lowering of the tax.
     When the diminution of the revenue is the diminution of the
revenue is the effect of the encouragement given to smuggling, it
may perhaps be remedied in two ways; either by diminishing the
temptation to smuggle, or by increasing the difficulty of
smuggling. The temptation to smuggle can be diminished only by
the lowering of the tax, and the difficulty of smuggling can be
increased only by establishing that system of administration
which is most proper for preventing it.
     The excise laws, it appears, I believe, from experience,
obstruct and embarrass the operations of the smuggler much more
effectually than those of the customs. By introducing into the
customs a system of administration as similar to that of the
excise as the nature of the different duties will admit, the
difficulty of smuggling might be very much increased. This
alteration, it has been supposed by many people, might very
easily be brought about.
     The importer of commodities liable to any duties of customs,
it has been said, might as his option be allowed either to carry
them to his own private warehouse, or to lodge them in a
warehouse provided either at his own expense or at that of the
public, but under the key of the custom-house officer, and never
to be opened but in his presence. If the merchant carried them to
his own private warehouse, the duties to be immediately paid, and
never afterwards to be drawn back, and that warehouse to be at
all times subject to the visit and examination of the
custom-house officer, in order to ascertain how far the quantity
contained in it corresponded with that for which the duty had
been paid. If he carried them to the public warehouse, no duty to
be paid till they were taken out for home consumption. If taken
out for exportation, to be duty free, proper security being
always given that they should be so exported. The dealers in
those particular commodities, either by wholesale or retail, to
be at all times subject to the visit and examination of the
custom-house officer, and to be obliged to justify by proper
certificates the payment of the duty upon the whole quantity
contained in their shops or warehouses. What are called the
excise-duties upon rum imported are at present levied in this
manner, and the same system of administration might perhaps be
extended to all duties upon goods imported, provided always that
those duties were, like the duties of excise, confined to a few
sorts of goods of the most general use and consumption. If they
were extended to almost all sorts of goods, as at present, public
warehouses of sufficient extent could not easily be provided, and
goods of a very delicate nature, or of which the preservation
required much care and attention, could not safely be trusted by
the merchant in any warehouse but his own.
     If by such a system of administration smuggling, to any
considerable extent, could be prevented even under pretty high
duties, and if every duty was occasionally either heightened or
lowered according as it was most likely, either the one way or
the other, to afford the greatest revenue to the state, taxation
being always employed as an instrument of revenue and never of
monopoly, it seems not improbable that a revenue at least equal
to the present net revenue of the customs might be drawn from
duties upon the importation of only a few sorts of goods of the
most general use and consumption, and that the duties of customs
might thus be brought to the same degree of simplicity,
certainty, and precision as those of excise. What the revenue at
present loses by drawbacks upon the re-exportation of foreign
goods which are afterwards relanded and consumed at home would
under this system be saved altogether. If to this saving, which
would alone be very considerable, were added the abolition of all
bounties upon the exportation of home produce in all cases in
which those bounties were not in reality drawbacks of some duties
of excise which had before been advanced, it cannot well be
doubted but that the net revenue of customs might, after an
alteration of this kind, be fully equal to what it had ever been
before.
     If by such a change of system the public revenue suffered no
loss, the trade and manufactures of the country would certainly
gain a very considerable advantage. The trade in the commodities
not taxed, by far the greatest number, would be perfectly free,
and might be carried on to and from all parts of the world with
every possible advantage. Among those commodities would be
comprehended all the necessaries of life and all the materials of
manufacture. So far as the free importation of the necessaries of
life reduced their average money price in the home market it
would reduce the money price of labour, but without reducing in
any respect its real recompense. The value of money is in
proportion to the quantity of the necessaries of life which it
will purchase. That of the necessaries of life is altogether
independent of the quantity of money which can be had for them.
The reduction in the money price of labour would necessarily be
attended with a proportionable one in that of all home
manufactures, which would thereby gain some advantage in all
foreign markets. The price of some manufactures would be reduced
in a still greater proportion by the free importation of the raw
materials. If raw silk could be imported from China and Indostan
duty free, the silk manufacturers in England could greatly
undersell those of both France and Italy. There would be no
occasion to prohibit the importation of foreign silks and
velvets. The cheapness of their goods would secure to our own
workmen not only the possession of the home, but a very great
command of the foreign market. Even the trade in the commodities
taxed would be carried on with much more advantage than at
present. If those commodities were delivered out of the public
warehouse for foreign exportation, being in this case exempted
from all taxes, the trade in them would be perfectly free. The
carrying trade in all sorts of goods would under this system
enjoy every possible advantage. If those commodities were
delivered out for home consumption, the importer not being
obliged to advance the tax till he had an opportunity of selling
his goods, either to some dealer, or to some consumer, he could
always afford to sell them cheaper than if he had been obliged to
advance it at the moment of importation. Under the same taxes,
the foreign trade of consumption even in the taxed commodities
might in this manner be carried on with much more advantage than
it can be at present.
     It was the object of the famous excise scheme of Sir Robert
Walpole to establish, with regard to wine and tobacco, a system
not very unlike that which is here proposed. But though the bill
which was then brought into Parliament comprehended those two
commodities, only it was generally supposed to be meant as an
introduction to a more extensive scheme of the same kind,
faction, combined with the interest of smuggling merchants,
raised so violent, though so unjust, a clamour against that bill,
that the minister thought proper to drop it, and from a dread of
exciting a clamour of the same kind, none of his successors have
dared to resume the project.
     The duties upon foreign luxuries imported for home
consumption, though they sometimes fall upon the poor, fall
principally upon people of middling or more than middling
fortune. Such are, for example, the duties upon foreign wines,
upon coffee, chocolate, tea, sugar, etc.
     The duties upon the cheaper luxuries of home produce
destined for home consumption fall pretty equally upon people of
all ranks in proportion to their respective expense. The poor pay
the duties upon malt, hops, beer, and ale, upon their own
consumption: the rich, upon both their own consumption and that
of their servants.
     The whole consumption of the inferior ranks of people, or of
those below the middling rank, it must be observed, is in every
country much greater, not only in quantity, but in value, than
that of the middling and of those above the middling rank. The
whole expense of the inferior is much greater than that of the
superior ranks. In the first place, almost the whole capital of
every country is annually distributed among the inferior ranks of
people as the wages of productive labour. Secondly, a great part
of the revenue arising from both the rent of land and the profits
of stock is annually distributed among the same rank in the wages
and maintenance of menial servants, and other unproductive
labourers. Thirdly, some part of the profits of stock belongs to
the same rank as a revenue arising from the employment of their
small capitals. The amount of the profits annually made by small
shopkeepers, tradesmen, and retailers of all kinds is everywhere
very considerable, and makes a very considerable portion of the
annual produce. Fourthly, and lastly, some part even of the rent
of land belongs to the same rank, a considerable part of those
who are somewhat below the middling rank, and a small part even
to the lowest rank, common labourers sometimes possessing in
property an acre or two of land. Though the expense of those
inferior ranks of people, therefore, taking them individually, is
very small, yet the whole mass of it, taking them collectively,
amounts always to by much the largest portion of the whole
expense of the society; what remains of the annual produce of the
land and labour of the country for the consumption of the
superior ranks being always much less, not only in quantity, but
in value. The taxes upon expense, therefore, which fall chiefly
upon that of the superior ranks of people, upon the smaller
portion of the annual produce, are likely to be much less
productive than either those which fall indifferently upon the
expense of all ranks, or even those which fall chiefly upon that
of the inferior ranks; than either those which fall indifferently
upon the whole annual produce, or those which fall chiefly upon
the larger portion of it. The excise upon the materials and
manufacture of home-made fermented and spirituous liquors is
accordingly, of all the different taxes upon expense, by far the
most productive; and this branch of the excise falls very much,
perhaps principally, upon the expense of the common people. In
the year which ended on the 5th of July 1775, the gross produce
of this branch of the excise amounted to L3,341,837 9s. 9d.
     It must always be remembered, however, that it is the
luxurious and not the necessary expense of the inferior ranks of
people that ought ever to be taxed. The final payment of any tax
upon their necessary expense would fall altogether upon the
superior ranks of people; upon the smaller portion of the annual
produce, and not upon the greater. Such a tax must in all cases
either raise the wages of labour, or lessen the demand for it. It
could not raise the wages of labour without throwing the final
payment of the tax upon the superior ranks of people. It could
not lessen the demand for labour without lessening the annual
produce of the land and labour of the country, the fund from
which all taxes must be finally paid. Whatever might be the state
to which a tax of this kind reduced the demand for labour, it
must always raise wages higher than they otherwise would be in
that state, and the final payment of this enhancement of wages
must in all cases fall upon the superior ranks of people.
     Fermented liquors brewed, and spirituous liquors distilled,
not for sale, but for private use, are not in Great Britain
liable to any duties of excise. This exemption, of which the
object is to save private families from the odious visit and
examination of the tax-gatherer, occasions the burden of those
duties to fall frequently much lighter upon the rich than upon
the poor. It is not, indeed, very common to distil for private
use, though it is done sometimes. But in the country many
middling and almost all rich and great families brew their own
beer. Their strong beer, therefore, costs them eight shillings a
barrel less than it costs the common brewer, who must have his
profit upon the tax as well as upon all the other expense which
he advances. Such families, therefore, must drink their beer at
least nine or ten shillings a barrel cheaper than any liquor of
the same quality can be drunk by the common people, to whom it is
everywhere more convenient to buy their beer, by little and
little, from the brewery or the alehouse. Malt, in the same
manner, that is made for the use of a private family is not
liable to the visit or examination of the tax-gatherer; but in
this case the family must compound at seven shillings and
sixpence a head for the tax. Seven shillings and sixpence are
equal to the excise upon ten bushels of malt- a quantity fully
equal to what all the different members of any sober family, men,
women, and children, are at an average likely to consume. But in
rich and great families, where country hospitality is much
practised, the malt liquors consumed by the members of the family
make but a small part of the consumption of the house. Either on
account of this composition, however, or for other reasons, it is
not near so common to malt as to brew for private use. It is
difficult to imagine any equitable reason why those who either
brew or distil for private use should not be subject to a
composition of the same kind.
     A greater revenue than what is at present drawn from all the
heavy taxes upon malt, beer, and ale might be raised, it has
frequently been said, by a much lighter tax upon malt, the
opportunities of defrauding the revenue being much greater in a
brewery than in a malt-house, and those who brew for private use
being exempted from all duties or composition for duties, which
is not the case with those who malt for private use.
     In the porter brewery of London a quarter of malt is
commonly brewed into more than two barrels and a half, sometimes
into three barrels of porter. The different taxes upon malt
amount to six shillings a quarter, those upon strong beer and ale
to eight shillings a barrel. In the porter brewery, therefore,
the different taxes upon malt, beer, and ale amount to between
twenty-six and thirty shillings upon the produce of a quarter of
malt. In the country brewery for common country sale a quarter of
malt is seldom brewed into less than two barrels of strong and
one barrel of small beer, frequently into two barrels and a half
of strong beer. The different taxes upon small beer amount to one
shilling and fourpence a barrel. In the country brewery,
therefore, the different taxes upon malt, beer, and ale seldom
amount to less than twenty-three shillings and fourpence,
frequently to twenty-six shillings, upon the produce of a quarter
of malt. Taking the whole kingdom at an average, therefore, the
whole amount of the duties upon malt, beer, and ale cannot be
estimated at less than twenty-four or twenty-five shillings upon
the produce of a quarter of malt. But by taking off all the
different duties upon beer and ale, and by tripling the malt-tax,
or by raising it from six to eighteen shillings upon the quarter
of malt, a greater revenue, it is said, might be raised by this
single tax than what is at present drawn from all those heavier
taxes.
     Under the old malt tax, indeed, is comprehended a tax of
four shillings upon the hogshead of cyder, and another of ten
shillings upon the barrel of mum. In 1774, the tax upon cyder
produced only L3083 6s. 8d. It probably fell somewhat short of
its usual amount, all the different taxes upon cyder having, that
year, produced less than ordinary. The tax upon mum, though much
heavier, is still less productive, on account of the smaller
consumption of that liquor. But to balance whatever may be the
ordinary amount of those two taxes, there is comprehended under
what is called the country excise, first, the old excise of six
shillings and eightpence upon the hogshead of cyder; secondly, a
like tax of six shillings and eightpence upon the hogshead of
verjuice; thirdly, another of eight shillings and ninepence upon
the hogshead of vinegar; and, lastly, a fourth tax of elevenpence
upon the gallon of mead or metheglin: the produce of those
different taxes will probably much more than counterbalance that
of the duties imposed by what is called the annual malt tax upon
cyder and mum. 
                                                   L       s.   
d.   In 1772, the old malt-tax produced           722,023    11  
 11
            The additional                      356,776     7    
9 3/4   In 1773, the old tax produced                561,627    
3     7 1/2
            The additional                      278,650    15    
3 3/4   In 1774, the old tax produced                624,614   
17     5 3/4
            The additional                      310,745     2    
8 1/2   In 1775, the old tax produced                657,357    
0     8 1/4
            The additional                      323,785    12    
6 1/4
                                       
---------------------------
                                            4)3,835,580    12    
0 3/4
                                       
---------------------------
        Average of these four years             958,895     3   
0 3/16
                                       
---------------------------   In 1772, the country excise
produced       1,243,128     5     3
            The London brewery                  408,260     7    
2 3/4   In 1773, the country excise                1,245,808    
3     3
            The London brewery                  405,406    17   
10 1/2   In 1774, the country excise                1,246,373   
14     5 1/2
            The London brewery                  320,601    18    
0 1/4   In 1775, the country excise                1,214,583    
6     1
            The London brewery                  463,670     7    
0 1/4
                                       
---------------------------
                                            4)6,547,832    19    
2 1/4
                                       
---------------------------
        Average of these four years         1,636,958       4    
9 1/2   To which adding the average malt-tax, or   958,895      
3    0 3/16   The whole amount of those different
     taxes comes out to be                  2,595,853       7   9
11/19
                                       
---------------------------   But by tripling the malt-tax, or by
     raising it from six to eighteen
     shillings upon the quarter of malt,
     that single tax would produce          2,876,685       9   
0 9/16   A sum which exceeds the foregoing by       280,832      
1   2 14/16 
     Malt is consumed not only in the brewery of beer and ale,
but in the manufacture of wines and spirits. If the malt tax were
to be raised to eighteen shillings upon the quarter, it might be
necessary to make some abatement in the different excises which
are imposed upon those particular sorts of low wines and spirits
of which malt makes any part of the materials. In what are called
malt spirits it makes commonly but a third part of the materials,
the other two-thirds being either raw barley, or one-third barley
and one-third wheat. In the distillery of malt spirits, both the
opportunity and the temptation to smuggle are much greater than
either in a brewery or in a malt-house; the opportunity on
account of the smaller bulk and greater value of the commodity,
and the temptation on account of the superior height of the
duties, which amount to 3s. 10 2/3d.* upon the gallon of spirits.
By increasing the duties upon malt, and reducing those upon the
distillery, both the opportunities and the temptation to smuggle
would be diminished, which might occasion a still further
augmentation of revenue.    * Though the duties directly imposed
upon proof spirits amount only to 2s. 6d. per gallon, these added
to the duties upon the low wines, from which they are distilled,
amount to 3s. 10 2/3d. Both low wines and proof spirits are, to
prevent frauds, now rated according to what they gauge in the
wash. 
     It has for some time past been the policy of Great Britain
to discourage the consumption of spirituous liquors, on account
of their supposed tendency to ruin the health and to corrupt the
morals of the common people. According to this policy, the
abatement of the taxes upon the distillery ought not to be so
great as to reduce, in any respect, the price of those liquors.
Spirituous liquors might remain as dear as ever, while at the
same time the wholesome and invigorating liquors of beer and ale
might be considerably reduced in their price. The people might
thus be in part relieved from one of the burdens of which they at
present complain the most, while at the same time the revenue
might be considerably augmented.
     The objections of Dr. Davenant to this alteration in the
present system of excise duties seem to be without foundation.
Those objections are, that the tax, instead of dividing itself as
at present pretty equally upon the profit of the maltster, upon
that of the brewer, and upon that of the retailer, would, so far
as it affected profit, fall altogether upon that of the maltster;
that the maltster could not so easily get back the amount of the
tax in the advanced price of his malt as the brewer and retailer
in the advanced price of their liquor; and that so heavy a tax
upon malt might reduce the rent and profit of barley land.
     No tax can ever reduce, for any considerable time, the rate
of profit in any particular trade which must always keep its
level with other trades in the neighbourhood. The present duties
upon malt, beer, and ale do not affect the profits of the dealers
in those commodities, who all get back the tax with an additional
profit in the enhanced price of their goods. A tax, indeed, may
render the goods upon which it is imposed so dear as to diminish
the consumption of them. But the consumption of malt is in malt
liquors, and a tax of eighteen shillings upon the quarter of malt
could not well render those liquors dearer than the different
taxes, amounting to twenty-four or twenty-five shillings, do at
present. Those liquors, on the contrary, would probably become
cheaper, and the consumption of them would be more likely to
increase than to diminish.
     It is not very easy to understand why it should be more
difficult for the maltster to get back eighteen shillings in the
advanced price of his malt than it is at present for the brewer
to get back twenty-four or twenty-five, sometimes thirty,
shillings in that of his liquor. The maltster, indeed, instead of
a tax of six shillings, would be obliged to advance one of
eighteen shillings upon every quarter of malt. But the brewer is
at present obliged to advance a tax of twenty-four or
twenty-five, sometimes thirty, shillings upon every quarter of
malt which he brews. It could not be more inconvenient for the
maltster to advance a lighter tax than it is at present for the
brewer to advance a heavier one. The maltster doth not always
keep in his granaries a stock of malt which it will require a
longer time to dispose of than the stock of beer and ale which
the brewer frequently keeps in his cellars. The former,
therefore, may frequently get the returns of his money as soon as
the latter. But whatever inconveniency might arise to the
maltster from being obliged to advance a heavier tax, it could
easily be remedied by granting him a few months' longer credit
than is at present commonly given to the brewer.
     Nothing could reduce the rent and profit of barley land
which did not reduce the demand for barley. But a change of
system which reduced the duties upon a quarter of malt brewed
into beer and ale from twenty-four and twenty-five shillings to
eighteen shillings would be more likely to increase than diminish
that demand. The rent and profit of barley land, besides, must
always be nearly equal to those of other equally fertile and
equally well-cultivated land. If they were less, some part of the
barley land would soon be turned to some other purpose; and if
they were greater, more land would soon be turned to the raising
of barley. When the ordinary price of any particular produce of
land is at what may be called a monopoly price, a tax upon it
necessarily reduces the rent and profit of the land which grows
it. A tax upon the produce of those precious vineyards of which
the wine falls so much short of the effectual demand that its
price is always above the natural proportion to that of the
produce of other equally fertile and equally well cultivated land
would necessarily reduce the rent and profit of those vineyards.
The price of the wines being already the highest that could be
got for the quantity commonly sent to market, it could not be
raised higher without diminishing that quantity, and the quantity
could not be diminished without still greater loss, because the
lands could not be turned to any other equally valuable produce.
The whole weight of the tax, therefore, would fall upon the rent
and profit- properly upon the rent of the vineyard. When it has
been proposed to lay any new tax upon sugar, our sugar planters
have frequently complained that the whole weight of such taxes
fell, not upon the consumer, but upon the producer, they never
having been able to raise the price of their sugar after the tax
higher than it was before. The price had, it seems, before the
tax been a monopoly price, and the argument adduced to show that
sugar was an improper subject of taxation demonstrated, perhaps,
that it was a proper one, the gains of monopolists, whenever they
can be come at, being certainly of all subjects the most proper.
But the ordinary price of barley has never been a monopoly price,
and the rent and profit of barley land have never been above
their natural proportion to those of other equally fertile and
equally well-cultivated land. The different taxes which have been
imposed upon malt, beer, and ale have never lowered the price of
barley, have never reduced the rent and profit of barley land.
The price of malt to the brewer has constantly risen in
proportion to the taxes imposed upon it, and those taxes,
together with the different duties upon beer and ale, have
constantly either raised the price, or what comes to the same
thing, reduced the quality of those commodities to the consumer.
The final payment of those taxes has fallen constantly upon the
consumer, and not upon the producer.
     The only people likely to suffer by the change of system
here proposed are those who brew for their own private use. But
the exemption which this superior rank of people at present enjoy
from very heavy taxes which are paid by the poor labourer and
artificer is surely most unjust and unequal, and ought to be
taken away, even though this change was never to take place. It
has probably been the interest of this superior order of people,
however, which has hitherto prevented a change of system that
could not well fail both to increase the revenue and to relieve
the people.
     Besides such duties as those of customs and excise above
mentioned, there are several others which affect the price of
goods more unequally and more indirectly. Of this kind are the
duties which in French are called Peages, which in old Saxon
times were called Duties of Passage, and which seem to have been
originally established for the same purpose as our turnpike
tolls, or the tolls upon our canals and navigable rivers, for the
maintenance of the road or of the navigation. Those duties, when
applied to such purposes, are most properly imposed according to
the bulk or weight of the goods. As they were originally local
and provincial duties, applicable to local and provincial
purposes, the administration of them was in most cases entrusted
to the particular town, parish, or lordship in which they were
levied, such communities being in some way or other supposed to
be accountable for the application. The sovereign, who is
altogether unaccountable, has in many countries assumed to
himself the administration of those duties, and though he has in
most cases enhanced very much the duty, he has in many entirely
neglected the application. If the turnpike tolls of Great Britain
should ever become one of the resources of government, we may
learn, by the example of many other nations, what would probably
be the consequence. Such tolls are no doubt finally paid by the
consumer; but the consumer is not taxed in proportion to his
expense when he pays, not according to the value, but according
to the bulk or weight of what he consumes. When such duties are
imposed, not according to the bulk or weight, but according to
the supposed value of the goods, they become properly a sort of
inland customs or excises which obstruct very much the most
important of all branches of commerce, the interior commerce of
the country.
     In some small states duties similar to those passage duties
are imposed upon goods carried across the territory, either by
land or by water, from one foreign country to another. These are
in some countries called transit-duties. Some of the little
Italian states which are situated upon the Po and the rivers
which run into it derive some revenue from duties of this kind
which are paid altogether by foreigners, and which, perhaps, are
the only duties that one state can impose upon the subjects of
another without obstructing in any respect the industry or
commerce of its own. The most important transit-duty in the world
is that levied by the King of Denmark upon all merchant ships
which pass through the Sound.
     Such taxes upon luxuries as the greater part of the duties
of customs and excise, though they all fall indifferently upon
every different species of revenue, and are paid finally, or
without any retribution, by whoever consumes the commodities upon
which they are imposed, yet they do not always fall equally or
proportionably upon the revenue of every individual. As every
man's humour regulates the degree of his consumption, every man
contributes rather according to his humour than in proportion to
his revenue; the profuse contribute more, the parsimonious less,
than their proper proportion. During the minority of a man of
great fortune he contributes commonly very little, by his
consumption, towards the support of that state from whose
protection he derives a great revenue. Those who live in another
country contribute nothing, by their consumption, towards the
support of the government of that country in which is situated
the source of their revenue. If in this latter country there
should be no land-tax, nor any considerable duty upon the
transference either of movable or of immovable property, as is
the case in Ireland, such absentees may derive a great revenue
from the protection of a government to the support of which they
do not contribute a single shilling. This inequality is likely to
be greatest in a country of which the government is in some
respects subordinate and dependent upon that of some other. The
people who possess the most extensive property in the dependent
will in this case generally choose to live in the governing
country. Ireland is precisely in this situation, and we cannot,
therefore, wonder that the proposal of a tax upon absentees
should be so very popular in that country. It might, perhaps, be
a little difficult to ascertain either what sort or what degree
of absence would subject a man to be taxed as an absentee, or at
what precise time the tax should either begin or end. If you
except, however, this very peculiar situation, any inequality in
the contribution of individuals which can arise from such taxes
is much more than compensated by the very circumstance which
occasions that inequality- the circumstance that every man's
contribution is altogether voluntary, it being altogether in his
power either to consume or not to consume the commodity taxed.
Where such taxes, therefore, are properly assessed, and upon
proper commodities, they are paid with less grumbling than any
other. When they are advanced by the merchant or manufacturer,
the consumer, who finally pays them, soon comes to confound them
with the price of the commodities, and almost forgets that he
pays any tax.
     Such taxes are or may be perfectly certain, or may be
assessed so as to leave no doubt concerning either what ought to
be paid, or when it ought to be paid; concerning either the
quantity or the time of payment. Whatever uncertainty there may
sometimes be, either in the duties of customs in Great Britain,
or in other duties of the same kind in other countries, it cannot
arise from the nature of those duties, but from the inaccurate or
unskilful manner in which the law that imposes them is expressed.
     Taxes upon luxuries generally are, and always may be, paid
piecemeal, or in proportion as the contributors have occasion to
purchase the goods upon which they are imposed. In the time and
mode of payment they are, or may be, of all taxes the most
convenient. Upon the whole, such taxes, are, perhaps, as
agreeable to the three first of the four general maxims
concerning taxation as any other. They offend in every respect
against the fourth.
     Such taxes, in proportion to what they bring into the public
treasury of the state, always take out or keep out of the pockets
of the people more than almost any other taxes. They seem to do
this in all the four different ways in which it is possible to do
it.
     First, the levying of such taxes, even when imposed in the
most judicious manner, requires a great number of custom-house
and excise officers, whose salaries and perquisites are a real
tax upon the people, which brings nothing into the treasury of
the state. This expense, however, it must be acknowledged, is
more moderate in Great Britain than in most other countries. In
the year which ended on the 5th of July 1775, the gross produce
of the different duties, under the management of the
commissioners of excise in England, amounted to L5,507,308 18s. 8
1/4d., which was levied at an expense of little more than five
and a half per cent. From this gross produce, however, there must
be deducted what was paid away in bounties and drawbacks upon the
exportation of excisable goods, which will reduce the net produce
below five millions.* The levying of the salt duty, an excise
duty, but under a different management, is much more expensive.
The net revenue of the customs does not amount to two millions
and a half, which is levied at an expense of more than ten per
cent in the salaries of officers, and other incidents. But the
perquisites of custom-house officers are everywhere much greater
than their salaries; at some ports more than double or triple
those salaries. If the salaries of officers, and other incidents,
therefore, amount to more than ten per cent upon the net revenue
of the customs, the whole expense of levying that revenue may
amount, in salaries and perquisites together, to more than twenty
or thirty per cent. The officers of excise receive few or no
perquisites, and the administration of that branch of the
revenue, being of more recent establishment, is in general less
corrupted than that of the customs, into which length of time has
introduced and authorized many abuses. By charging upon malt the
whole revenue which is at present levied by the different duties
upon malt and malt liquors, a saving, it is supposed, of more
than fifty thousand pounds might be made in the annual expense of
the excise. By confining the duties of customs to a few sorts of
goods, and by levying those duties according to the excise laws,
a much greater saving might probably be made in the annual
expense of the customs.    * The net produce of that year, after
deducting all expenses and allowances, amounted to L4,975,652
19s. 6d. 
     Secondly, such taxes necessarily occasion some obstruction
or discouragement to certain branches of industry. As they always
raise the price of the commodity taxed, they so far discourage
its consumption, and consequently its production. If it is a
commodity of home growth or manufacture, less labour comes to be
employed in raising and producing it. If it is a foreign
commodity of which the tax increases in this manner the price,
the commodities of the same kind which are made at home may
thereby, indeed, gain some advantage in the home market, and a
greater quantity of domestic industry may thereby be turned
toward preparing them. But though this rise of price in a foreign
commodity may encourage domestic industry in one particular
branch, it necessarily discourages that industry in almost every
other. The dearer the Birmingham manufacturer buys his foreign
wine, the cheaper he necessarily sells that part of his hardware
with which, or, what comes to the same thing, with the price of
which he buys it. That part of his hardware, therefore, becomes
of less value to him, and he has less encouragement to work at
it. The dearer the consumers in one country pay for the surplus
produce of another, the cheaper they necessarily sell that part
of their own surplus produce with which, or, what comes to the
same thing, with the price of which they buy it. That part of
their own surplus produce becomes of less value to them, and they
have less encouragement to increase its quantity. All taxes upon
consumable commodities, therefore, tend to reduce the quantity of
productive labour below what it otherwise would be, either in
preparing the commodities taxed, if they are home commodities, or
in preparing those with which they are purchased, if they are
foreign commodities. Such taxes, too, always alter, more or less,
the natural direction of national industry, and turn it into a
channel always different from, and generally less advantageous
than that in which it would have run of its own accord.
     Thirdly, the hope of evading such taxes by smuggling gives
frequent occasion to forfeitures and other penalties which
entirely ruin the smuggler; a person who, though no doubt highly
blamable for violating the laws of his country, is frequently
incapable of violating those of natural justice, and would have
been, in every respect, an excellent citizen had not the laws of
his country made that a crime which nature never meant to be so.
In those corrupted governments where there is at least a general
suspicion of much unnecessary expense, and great misapplication
of the public revenue, the laws which guard it are little
respected. Not many people are scrupulous about smuggling when,
without perjury, they can find any easy and safe opportunity of
doing so. To pretend to have any scruple about buying smuggled
goods, though a manifest encouragement to the violation of the
revenue laws, and to the perjury which almost always attends it,
would in most countries be regarded as one of those pedantic
pieces of hypocrisy which, instead of gaining credit with
anybody, serve only to expose the person who affects to practise
them to the suspicion of being a greater knave than most of his
neighbours. By this indulgence of the public, the smuggler is
often encouraged to continue a trade which he is thus taught to
consider as in some measure innocent, and when the severity of
the revenue laws is ready to fall upon him, he is frequently
disposed to defend with violence what he has been accustomed to
regard as his just property. From being at first, perhaps, rather
imprudent than criminal, he at last too often becomes one of the
hardiest and most determined violators of the laws of society. By
the ruin of the smuggler, his capital, which had before been
employed in maintaining productive labour, is absorbed either in
the revenue of the state or in that of the revenue officer, and
is employed in maintaining unproductive, to the diminution of the
general capital of the society and of the useful industry which
it might otherwise have maintained.
     Fourthly, such taxes, by subjecting at least the dealers in
the taxed commodities to the frequent visits and odious
examination of the tax-gatherers, expose them sometimes, no
doubt, to some degree of oppression, and always to much trouble
and vexation; and though vexation, as has already been said, is
not, strictly speaking, expense, it is certainly equivalent to
the expense at which every man would be willing to redeem himself
from it. The laws of excise, though more effectual for the
purpose for which they were instituted, are, in this respect,
more vexatious than those of the customs. When a merchant has
imported goods subject to certain duties of customs, when he has
paid those duties, and lodged the goods in his warehouse, he is
not in most cases liable to any further trouble or vexation from
the custom-house officer. It is otherwise with goods subject to
duties of excise. The dealers have no respite from the continual
visits and examination of the excise officers. The duties of
excise are, upon this account, more unpopular than those of the
customs; and so are the officers who levy them. Those officers,
it is pretended, though in general, perhaps, they do their duty
fully as well as those of the customs, yet as that duty obliges
them to be frequently very troublesome to some of their
neighbours, commonly contract a certain hardness of character
which the others frequently have not. This observation, however,
may very probably be the mere suggestion of fraudulent dealers
whose smuggling is either prevented or detected by their
diligence.
     The inconveniencies, however, which are, perhaps, in some
degree inseparable from taxes upon consumable commodities, fall
as light upon the people of Great Britain as upon those of any
other country of which the government is nearly as expensive. Our
state is not perfect, and might be mended, but it is as good or
better than that of most of our neighbours.
     In consequence of the notion that duties upon consumable
goods were taxes upon the profits of merchants, those duties
have, in some countries, been repeated upon every successive sale
of the goods. If the profits of the merchant importer or merchant
manufacturer were taxed, equality seemed to require that those of
all the middle buyers who intervened between either of them and
the consumer should likewise be taxed. The famous alcavala of
Spain seems to have been established upon this principle. It was
at first a tax of ten per cent, afterwards of fourteen per cent,
and is at present of only six per cent upon the sale of every
sort of property whether movable or immovable, and it is repeated
every time the property is sold. The levying of this tax requires
a multitude of revenue officers sufficient to guard the
transportation of goods, not only from one province to another,
but from one shop to another. It subjects not only the dealers in
some sorts of goods, but those in all sorts, every farmer, every
manufacturer, every merchant and shopkeeper, to the continual
visits and examination of the tax-gatherers. Through the greater
part of a country in which a tax of this kind is established
nothing can be produced for distant sale. The produce of every
part of the country must be proportioned to the consumption of
the neighborhood. It is to the alcavala, accordingly, that
Ustaritz imputes the ruin of the manufactures of Spain. He might
have imputed to it likewise the declension of agriculture, it
being imposed not only upon manufactures, but upon the rude
produce of the land.
     In the kingdom of Naples there is a similar tax of three per
cent upon the value of all contracts, and consequently upon that
of all contracts of sale. It is both lighter than the Spanish
tax, and the greater part of towns and parishes are allowed to
pay a composition in lieu of it. They levy this composition in
what manner they please, generally in a way that gives no
interruption to the interior commerce of the place. The
Neapolitan tax, therefore, is not near so ruinous as the Spanish
one.
     The uniform system of taxation which, with a few exceptions
of no great consequence, takes place in all the different parts
of the United Kingdom of Great Britain, leaves the interior
commerce of the country, the inland and coasting trade, almost
entirely free. The inland trade is almost perfectly free, and the
greater part of goods may be carried from one end of the kingdom
to the other without requiring any permit or let-pass, without
being subject to question, visit, or examination from the revenue
officers. There are a few exceptions, but they are such as can
give no interruption to any important branch of the inland
commerce of the country. Goods carried coastwise, indeed, require
certificates or coast-cockets. If you except coals, however, the
rest are almost all duty-free. This freedom of interior commerce,
the effect of the uniformity of the system of taxation, is
perhaps one of the principal causes of the prosperity of Great
Britain, every great country being necessarily the best and most
extensive market for the greater part of the productions of its
own industry. If the same freedom, in consequence of the same
uniformity, could be extended to Ireland and the plantations,
both the grandeur of the state and the prosperity of every part
of the empire would probably be still greater than at present.
     In France, the different revenue laws which take place in
the different provinces require a multitude of revenue officers
to surround not only the frontiers of the kingdom, but those of
almost each particular province, in order either to prevent the
importation of certain goods, or to subject it to the payment of
certain duties, to the no small interruption of the interior
commerce of the country. Some provinces are allowed to compound
for the gabelle or salt-tax. Others are exempted from it
altogether. Some provinces are exempted from the exclusive sale
of tobacco, which the farmers-general enjoy through the greater
part of the kingdom. The aides, which correspond to the excise in
England, are very different in different provinces. Some
provinces are exempted from them, and pay a composition or
equivalent. In those in which they take place and are in farm
there are many local duties which do not extend beyond a
particular town or district. The traites, which correspond to our
customs, divide the kingdom into three great parts; first, the
provinces subject to the tariff of 1664, which are called the
provinces of the five great farms, and under which are
comprehended Picardy, Normandy, and the greater part of the
interior provinces of the kingdom; secondly, the provinces
subject to the tariff of 1667, which are called the provinces
reckoned foreign, and under which are comprehended the greater
part of the frontier provinces; and, thirdly, those provinces
which are said to be treated as foreign, or which, because they
are allowed a free commerce with foreign countries, are in their
commerce with other provinces of France subjected to the same
duties as other foreign countries. These are Alsace, the three
bishoprics of Metz, Toul, and Verdun, and the three cities of
Dunkirk, Bayonne, and Marseilles. Both in the provinces of the
five great farms (called so on account of an ancient division of
the duties of customs into five great branches, each of which was
originally the subject of a particular farm, though they are now
all united into one), and in those which are said to be reckoned
foreign, there are many local duties which do not extend beyond a
particular town or district. There are some such even in the
provinces which are said to be treated as foreign, particularly
in the city of Marseilles. It is unnecessary to observe how much
both the restraints upon the interior commerce of the country and
the number of the revenue officers must be multiplied in order to
guard the frontiers of those different provinces and districts
which are subject to such different systems of taxation.
     Over and above the general restraints arising from this
complicated system of revenue laws, the commerce of wine, after
corn perhaps the most important production of France, is in the
greater part of the provinces subject to particular restraints,
arising from the favour which has been shown to the vineyards of
particular provinces and districts, above those of others. The
provinces most famous for their wines, it will be found, I
believe, are those in which the trade in that article is subject
to the fewest restraints of this kind. The extensive market which
such provinces enjoy, encourages good management both in the
cultivation of their vineyards, and in the subsequent preparation
of their wines.
     Such various and complicated revenue laws are not peculiar
to France. The little duchy of Milan is divided into six
provinces, in each of which there is a different system of
taxation with regard to several different sorts of consumable
goods. The still smaller territories of the Duke of Parma are
divided into three or four, each of which has, in the same
manner, a system of its own. Under such absurd management,
nothing but the great fertility of the soil and happiness of the
climate could preserve such countries from soon relapsing into
the lowest state of poverty and barbarism.
     Taxes upon consumable commodities may either be levied by an
administration of which the officers are appointed by government
and are immediately accountable to government, of which the
revenue must in this case vary from year to year according to the
occasional variations in the produce of the tax, or they may be
let in farm for a rent certain, the farmer being allowed to
appoint his own officers, who, though obliged to levy the tax in
the manner directed by the law, are under his immediate
inspection, and are immediately accountable to him. The best and
most frugal way of levying a tax can never be by farm. Over and
above what is necessary for paying the stipulated rent, the
salaries of the officers, and the whole expense of
administration, the farmer must always draw from the produce of
the tax a certain profit proportioned at least to the advance
which he makes, to the risk which he runs, to the trouble which
he is at, and to the knowledge and skill which it requires to
manage so very complicated a concern. Government, by establishing
an administration under their own immediate inspection of the
same kind with that which the farmer establishes, might at least
save this profit, which is almost always exorbitant. To farm any
considerable branch of the public revenue requires either a great
capital or a great credit; circumstances which would alone
restrain the competition for such an undertaking to a very small
number of people. Of the few who have this capital or credit, a
still smaller number have the necessary knowledge or experience;
another circumstance which restrains the competition still
further. The very few, who are in condition to become
competitors, find it more for their interest to combine together;
to become co-partners instead of competitors, and when the farm
is set up to auction, to offer no rent but what is much below the
real value. In countries where the public revenues are in farm,
the farmers are generally the most opulent people. Their wealth
would alone excite the public indignation, and the vanity which
almost always accompanies such upstart fortunes, the foolish
ostentation with which they commonly display that wealth, excites
that indignation still more.
     The farmers of the public revenue never find the laws too
severe which punish any attempt to evade the payment of a tax.
They have no bowels for the contributors, who are not their
subjects, and whose universal bankruptcy, if it should happen the
day after their farm is expired, would not much affect their
interest. In the greatest exigencies of the state, when the
anxiety of the sovereign for the exact payment of his revenue is
necessarily the greatest, they seldom fail to complain that
without laws more rigorous than those which actually take place,
it will be impossible for them to pay even the usual rent. In
those moments of public distress their demands cannot be
disputed. The revenue laws, therefore, become gradually more and
more severe. The most sanguinary are always to be found in
countries where the greater part of the public revenue is in
farm; the mildest, in countries where it is levied under the
immediate inspection of the sovereign. Even a bad sovereign feels
more compassion for his people than can ever be expected from the
farmers of his revenue. He knows that the permanent grandeur of
his family depends upon the prosperity of his people, and he will
never knowingly ruin that prosperity for the sake of any
momentary interest of his own. It is otherwise with the farmers
of his revenue, whose grandeur may frequently be the effect of
the ruin, and not of the prosperity of his people.
     A tax is sometimes not only farmed for a certain rent, but
the farmer has, besides, the monopoly of the commodity taxed. In
France, the duties upon tobacco and salt are levied in this
manner. In such cases the farmer, instead of one, levies two
exorbitant profits upon the people; the profit of the farmer, and
the still more exorbitant one of the monopolist. Tobacco being a
luxury, every man is allowed to buy or not to buy as he chooses.
But salt being a necessary, every man is obliged to buy of the
farmer a certain quantity of it; because, if he did not buy this
quantity of the farmer, he would, it is presumed, buy it of some
smuggler. The taxes upon both commodities are exorbitant. The
temptation to smuggle consequently is to many people
irresistible, while at the same time the rigour of the law, and
the vigilance of the farmer's officers, render the yielding to
that temptation almost certainly ruinous. The smuggling of salt
and tobacco sends every year several hundred people to the
galleys, besides a very considerable number whom it sends to the
gibbet. Those taxes levied in this manner yield a very
considerable revenue to government. In 1767, the farm of tobacco
was let for twenty-two millions five hundred and forty-one
thousand two hundred and seventy-eight livres a year. That of
salt, for thirty-six millions four hundred and ninety-four
thousand four hundred and four livres. The farm in both cases was
to commence in 1768, and to last for six years. Those who
consider the blood of the people as nothing in comparison with
the revenue of the prince, may perhaps approve of this method of
levying taxes. Similar taxes and monopolies of salt and tobacco
have been established in many other countries; particularly in
the Austrian and Prussian dominions, and in the greater part of
the states of Italy.
     In France, the greater part of the actual revenue of the
crown is derived from eight different sources; the taille, the
capitation, the two vingtiemes, the gabelles, the aides, the
traites, the domaine, and the farm of tobacco. The five last are,
in the greater part of the provinces, under farm. The three first
are everywhere levied by an administration under the immediate
inspection and direction of government, and it is universally
acknowledged that, in proportion to what they take out of the
pockets of the people, they bring more into the treasury of the
prince than the other five, of which the administration is much
more wasteful and expensive.
     The finances of France seem, in their present state, to
admit of three very obvious reformations. First, by abolishing
the taille and the capitation, and by increasing the number of
vingtiemes, so as to produce an additional revenue equal to the
amount of those other taxes, the revenue of the crown might be
preserved; the expense of collection might be much diminished;
the vexation of the inferior ranks of people, which the taille
and capitation occasion, might be entirely prevented; and the
superior ranks might not be more burdened than the greater part
of them are at present. The vingtieme, I have already observed,
is a tax very nearly of the same kind with what is called the
land-tax of England. The burden of the taille, it is
acknowledged, falls finally upon the proprietors of land; and as
the greater part of the capitation is assessed upon those who are
subject to the taille at so much a pound of that other tax, the
final payment of the greater part of it must likewise fall upon
the same order of people. Though the number of the vingtiemes,
therefore, was increased so as to produce an additional revenue
equal to the amount of both those taxes, the superior ranks of
people might not be more burdened than they are at present. Many
individuals no doubt would, on account of the great inequalities
with which the taille is commonly assessed upon the estates and
tenants of different individuals. The interest and opposition of
such favoured subjects are the obstacles most likely to prevent
this or any other reformation of the same kind. Secondly, by
rendering the gabelle, the aides, the traites, the taxes upon
tobacco, all the different customs and excises, uniform in all
the different parts of the kingdom, those taxes might be levied
at much less expense, and the interior commerce of the kingdom
might be rendered as free as that of England. Thirdly, and
lastly, by subjecting all those taxes to an administration under
the immediate inspection and direction of government, the
exorbitant profits of the farmers-general might be added to the
revenue of the state. The opposition arising from the private
interest of individuals is likely to be as effectual for
preventing the two last as the first-mentioned scheme of
reformation.
     The French system of taxation seems, in every respect,
inferior to the British. In Great Britain ten millions sterling
are annually levied upon less than eight millions of people
without its being possible to say that any particular order is
oppressed. From the collections of the Abbe Expilly, and the
observations of the author of the Essay upon legislation and
commerce of corn, it appears probable that France, including the
provinces of Lorraine and Bar, contains about twenty-three or
twenty-four millions of people three times the number perhaps
contained in Great Britain. The soil and climate of France are
better than those of Great Britain. The country has been much
longer in a state of improvement and cultivation, and is, upon
that account, better stocked with all those things which it
requires a long time to raise up and accumulate, such as great
towns, and convenient and well-built houses, both in town and
country. With these advantages it might be expected that in
France a revenue of thirty millions might be levied for the
support of the state with as little inconveniency as a revenue of
ten millions is in Great Britain. In 1765 and 1766, the whole
revenue paid into the treasury of France, according to the best,
though, I acknowledge, very imperfect, accounts which I could get
of it, usually run between 308 and 325 millions of livres; that
is, it did not amount to fifteen millions sterling; not the half
of what might have been expected had the people contributed in
the same proportion to their numbers as the people of Great
Britain. The people of France, however, it is generally
acknowledged, are much more oppressed by taxes than the people of
Great Britain. France, however, is certainly the great empire in
Europe which, after that of Great Britain, enjoys the mildest and
most indulgent government.
     In Holland the heavy taxes upon the necessaries of life have
ruined, it is said, their principal manufactures, and are likely
to discourage gradually even their fisheries and their trade in
shipbuilding. The taxes upon the necessaries of life are
inconsiderable in Great Britain, and no manufacture has hitherto
been ruined by them. The British taxes which bear hardest on
manufactures are some duties upon the importation of raw
materials, particularly upon that of raw silk. The revenue of the
states-general and of the different cities, however, is said to
amount to more than five millions two hundred and fifty thousand
pounds sterling; and as the inhabitants of the United Provinces
cannot well be supposed to amount to more than a third part of
those of Great Britain, they must, in proportion to their number,
be much more heavily taxed.
     After all the proper subjects of taxation have been
exhausted, if the exigencies of the state still continue to
require new taxes, they must be imposed upon improper ones. The
taxes upon the necessaries of life, therefore, the wisdom of that
republic which, in order to acquire and to maintain its
independency, has, in spite of its great frugality, been involved
in such expensive wars as have obliged it to contract great
debts. The singular countries of Holland and Zeeland, besides,
require a considerable expense even to preserve their existence,
or to prevent their being swallowed up by the sea, which must
have contributed to increase considerably the load of taxes in
those two provinces. The republican form of government seems to
be the principal support of the present grandeur of Holland. The
owners of great capitals, the great mercantile families, have
generally either some direct share or some indirect influence in
the administration of that government. For the sake of the
respect and authority which they derive from this situation, they
are willing to live in a country where their capital, if they
employ it themselves, will bring them less profit, and if they
lend it to another, less interest; and where the very moderate
revenue which they can draw from it will purchase less of the
necessaries and conveniences of life than in any other part of
Europe. The residence of such wealthy people necessarily keeps
alive, in spite of all disadvantages, a certain degree of
industry in the country. Any public calamity which should destroy
the republican form of government, which should throw the whole
administration into the hands of nobles and of soldiers, which
should annihilate altogether the importance of those wealthy
merchants, would soon render it disagreeable to them to live in a
country where they were no longer likely to be much respected.
They would remove both their residences and their capitals to
some other country, and the industry and commerce of Holland
would soon follow the capitals which supported them.
                         Chapter III
                       Of Public Debts 
     IN that rude state of society which precedes the extension
of commerce and the improvement of manufactures, when those
expensive luxuries which commerce and manufactures can alone
introduce are altogether unknown, the person who possesses a
large revenue, I have endeavoured to show in the third book of
this Inquiry, can spend or enjoy that revenue in no other way
than by maintaining nearly as many people as it can maintain. A
large revenue may at all times be said to consist in the command
of a large quantity of the necessaries of life. In that rude
state of things it is commonly paid in a large quantity of those
necessaries, in the materials of plain food and coarse clothing,
in corn and cattle, in wool and raw hides. When neither commerce
nor manufactures furnish anything for which the owner can
exchange the greater part of those materials which are over and
above his own consumption, he can do nothing with the surplus but
feed and clothe nearly as many people as it will feed and clothe.
A hospitality in which there is no luxury, and a liberality in
which there is no ostentation, occasion, in this situation of
things, the principal expenses of the rich and the great. But
these, I have likewise endeavoured to show in the same book, are
expenses by which people are not very apt to ruin themselves.
There is not, perhaps, any selfish pleasure so frivolous of which
the pursuit has not sometimes ruined even sensible men. A passion
for cock-fighting has ruined many. But the instances, I believe,
are not very numerous of people who have been ruined by a
hospitality or liberality of this kind, though the hospitality of
luxury and the liberality of ostentation have ruined many. Among
our feudal ancestors, the long time during which estates used to
continue in the same family sufficiently demonstrates the general
disposition of people to live within their income. Though the
rustic hospitality constantly exercised by the great land-holders
may not, to us in the present times, seem consistent with that
order which we are apt to consider as inseparably connected with
good economy, yet we must certainly allow them to have been at
least so far frugal as not commonly to have spent their whole
income. A part of their wool and raw hides they had generally an
opportunity of selling for money. Some part of this money,
perhaps, they spent in purchasing the few objects of vanity and
luxury with which the circumstances of the times could furnish
them; but some part of it they seem commonly to have hoarded.
They could not well, indeed, do anything else but hoard whatever
money they saved. To trade was disgraceful to a gentleman, and to
lend money at interest, which at that time was considered as
usury and prohibited by law, would have been still more so. In
those times of violence and disorder, besides, it was convenient
to have a hoard of money at hand, that in case they should be
driven from their own home they might have something of known
value to carry with them to some place of safety. The same
violence which made it convenient to hoard made it equally
convenient to conceal the hoard. The frequency of treasure-trove,
or of treasure found of which no owner was known, sufficiently
demonstrates the frequency in those times both of hoarding and of
concealing the board. Treasure-trove was then considered as an
important branch of the revenue of the sovereign. All the
treasure-trove of the kingdom would scarce perhaps in the present
times make an important branch of the revenue of a private
gentleman of a good estate.
     The same disposition to save and to hoard prevailed in the
sovereign as well as in the subjects. Among nations to whom
commerce and manufactures are little known, the sovereign, it has
already been observed in the fourth book, is in a situation which
naturally disposes him to the parsimony requisite for
accumulation. In that situation the expense even of a sovereign
cannot be directed by that vanity which delights in the gaudy
finery of a court. The ignorance of the times affords but few of
the trinkets in which that finery consists. Standing armies are
not then necessary, so that the expense even of a sovereign, like
that of any other great lord, can be employed in scarce anything
but bounty to his tenants and hospitality to his retainers. But
bounty and hospitality very seldom lead to extravagance; though
vanity almost always does. All the ancient sovereigns of Europe
accordingly, it has already been observed, had treasures. Every
Tartar chief in the present times is said to have one.
     In a commercial country abounding with every sort of
expensive luxury, the sovereign, in the same manner as almost all
the great proprietors in his dominions, naturally spends a great
part of his revenue in purchasing those luxuries. His own and the
neighbouring countries supply him abundantly with all the costly
trinkets which compose the splendid but insignificant pageantry
of a court. For the sake of an inferior pageantry of the same
kind, his nobles dismiss their retainers, make their tenants
independent, and become gradually themselves as insignificant as
the greater part of the wealthy burghers in his dominions. The
same frivolous passions which influence their conduct influence
his. How can it be supposed that he should be the only rich man
in his dominions who is insensible to pleasures of this kind? If
he does not, what he is very likely to do, spend upon those
pleasures so great a part of his revenue as to debilitate very
much the defensive power of the state, it cannot well be expected
that he should not spend upon them all that part of it which is
over and above what is necessary for supporting that defensive
power. His ordinary expense becomes equal to his ordinary
revenue, and it is well if it does not frequently exceed it. The
amassing of treasure can no longer be expected, and when
extraordinary exigencies require extraordinary expenses, he must
necessarily call upon his subjects for an extraordinary aid. The
present and the late king of Prussia are the only great princes
of Europe who, since the death of Henry IV of France in 1610, are
supposed to have amassed any considerable treasure. The parsimony
which leads to accumulation has become almost as rare in
republican as in monarchical governments. The Italian republics,
the United Provinces of the Netherlands, are all in debt. The
canton of Berne is the single republic in Europe which has
amassed any considerable treasure. The other Swiss republics have
not. The taste for some sort of pageantry, for splendid
buildings, at least, and other public ornaments, frequently
prevails as much in the apparently sober senate-house of a little
republic as in the dissipated court of the greatest king.
     The want of parsimony in time of peace imposes the necessity
of contracting debt in time of war. When war comes, there is no
money in the treasury but what is necessary for carrying on the
ordinary expense of the peace establishment. In war an
establishment of three of four times that expense becomes
necessary for the defence of the state, and consequently a
revenue three or four times greater than the peace revenue.
Supposing that the sovereign should have, what he scarce ever
has, the immediate means of augmenting his revenue in proportion
to the augmentation of his expense, yet still the produce of the
taxes, from which this increase of revenue must be drawn, will
not begin to come into the treasury till perhaps ten or twelve
months after they are imposed. But the moment in which war
begins, or rather the moment in which it appears likely to begin,
the army must be augmented, the fleet must be fitted out, the
garrisoned towns must be put into a posture of defence; that
army, that fleet, those garrisoned towns must be furnished with
arms, ammunition, and provisions. An immediate and great expense
must be incurred in that moment of immediate danger, which will
not wait for the gradual and slow returns of the new taxes. In
this exigency government can have no other resource but in
borrowing.
     The same commercial state of society which, by the operation
of moral causes, brings government in this manner into the
necessity of borrowing, produces in the subjects both an ability
and an inclination to lend. If it commonly brings along with it
the necessity of borrowing, it likewise brings along with it the
facility of doing so.
     A country abounding with merchants and manufacturers
necessarily abounds with a set of people through whose hands not
only their own capitals, but the capitals of all those who either
lend them money, or trust them with goods, pass as frequently, or
more frequently, than the revenue of a private man, who, without
trade or business, lives upon his income, passes through his
hands. The revenue of such a man can regularly pass through his
hands only once in a year. But the whole amount of the capital
and credit of a merchant, who deals in a trade of which the
returns are very quick, may sometimes pass through his hands two,
three, or four times a year. A country abounding with merchants
and manufacturers, therefore, necessarily abounds with a set of
people who have it at all times in their power to advance, if
they choose to do so, a very large sum of money to government.
Hence the ability in the subjects of a commercial state to lend.
     Commerce and manufactures can seldom flourish long in any
state which does not enjoy a regular administration of justice,
in which the people do not feel themselves secure in the
possession of their property, in which the faith of contracts is
not supported by law, and in which the authority of the state is
not supposed to be regularly employed in enforcing the payment of
debts from all those who are able to pay. Commerce and
manufactures, in short, can seldom flourish in any state in which
there is not a certain degree of confidence in the justice of
government. The same confidence which disposes great merchants
and manufacturers, upon ordinary occasions, to trust their
property to the protection of a particular government, disposes
them, upon extraordinary occasions, to trust that government with
the use of their property. By lending money to government, they
do not even for a moment diminish their ability to carry on their
trade and manufactures. On the contrary, they commonly augment
it. The necessities of the state render government upon most
occasions willing to borrow upon terms extremely advantageous to
the lender. The security which it grants to the original creditor
is made transferable to any other creditor, and, from the
universal confidence in the justice of the state, generally sells
in the market for more than was originally paid for it. The
merchant or monied man makes money by lending money to
government, and instead of diminishing, increases his trading
capital. He generally considers it as a favour, therefore, when
the administration admits him to a share in the first
subscription for a new loan. Hence the inclination or willingness
in the subjects of a commercial state to lend.
     The government of such a state is very apt to repose itself
upon this ability and willingness of its subjects to lend it
their money on extraordinary occasions. It foresees the facility
of borrowing, and therefore dispenses itself from the duty of
saving.
     In a rude state of society there are no great mercantile or
manufacturing capitals. The individuals who hoard whatever money
they can save, and who conceal their hoard, do so from a distrust
of the justice of government, from a fear that if it was known
that they had a hoard, and where that hoard was to be found, they
would quickly be plundered. In such a state of things few people
would be able, and nobody would be willing, to lend their money
to government on extraordinary exigencies. The sovereign feels
that he must provide for such exigencies by saving because he
foresees the absolute impossibility of borrowing. This foresight
increases still further his natural disposition to save.
     The progress of the enormous debts which at present oppress,
and will in the long-run probably ruin, all the great nations of
Europe has been pretty uniform. Nations, like private men, have
generally begun to borrow upon what may be called personal
credit, without assigning or mortgaging any particular fund for
the payment of the debt; and when this resource has failed them,
they have gone on to borrow upon assignments or mortgages of
particular funds.
     What is called the unfunded debt of Great Britain is
contracted in the former of those two ways. It consists partly in
a debt which bears, or is supposed to bear, no interest, and
which resembles the debts that a private man contracts upon
account, and partly in a debt which bears interest, and which
resembles what a private man contracts upon his bill or
promissory note. The debts which are due either for extraordinary
services, or for services either not provided for, or not paid at
the time when they are performed, part of the extrordinaries of
the army, navy, and ordnance, the arrears of subsidies to foreign
princes, those of seamen's wages, etc., usually constitute a debt
of the first kind, sometimes in payment of a part of such Navy
and exchequer bills, which are issued sometimes in payment of a
part of such debts and sometimes for other purposes, constitute a
debt of the second kind- exchequer bills bearing interest from
the day on which they are issued, and navy bills six months after
they are issued. The Bank of England, either by voluntarily
discounting those bills at their current value, or by agreeing
with government for certain considerations to circulate exchequer
bills, that is, to receive them at par, paying the interest which
happens to be due upon them, keeps up their value and facilitates
their circulation, and thereby frequently enables government to
contract a very large debt of this kind. In France, where there
is no bank, the state bills (billets d'etat) have sometimes sold
at sixty and seventy per cent discount. During the great
recoinage in King William's time, when the Bank of England
thought proper to put a stop to its usual transactions, exchequer
bills and tallies are said to have sold from twenty-five to sixty
per cent discount; owing partly, no doubt, to the supposed
instability of the new government established by the Revolution,
but partly, too, to the want of the support of the Bank of
England.
     When this resource is exhausted, and it becomes necessary,
in order to raise money, to assign or mortgage some particular
branch of the public revenue for the payment of the debt,
government has upon different occasions done this in two
different ways. Sometimes it has made this assignment or mortgage
for a short period of time only, a year, or a few years, for
example; and sometimes for perpetuity. In the one case the fund
was supposed sufficient to pay, within the limited time, both
principal and interest of the money borrowed. In the other it was
supposed sufficient to pay the interest only, or a perpetual
annuity equivalent to the interest, government being at liberty
to redeem at any time this annuity upon paying back the principal
sum borrowed. When money was raised in the one way, it was said
to be raised by anticipation; when in the other, by perpetual
funding, or, more shortly, by funding.
     In Great Britain the land and malt taxes are regularly
anticipated every year, by virtue of a borrowing clause
constantly inserted into the acts which impose them. The Bank of
England generally advances at an interest, which since the
Revolution has varied from eight to three per cent, the sums for
which those taxes are granted, and receives payment as their
produce gradually comes in. If there is a deficiency, which there
always is, it is provided for in the supplies of the ensuing
year. The only considerable branch of the public revenue which
yet remains unmortgaged is thus regularly spent before it comes
in. Like an improvident spendthrift, whose pressing occasions
will not allow him to wait for the regular payment of his
revenue, the state is in the constant practice of borrowing of
its own factors and agents, and of paying interest for the use of
its own money.
     In the reign of King William, and during a great part of
that of Queen Anne, before we had become so familiar as we are
now with the practice of perpetual funding, the greater part of
the new taxes were imposed but for a short period of time (for
four, five, six, or seven years only), and a great part of the
grants of every year consisted in loans upon anticipations of the
produce of those taxes. The produce being frequently insufficient
for paying within the limited term the principal and interest of
the money borrowed, deficiencies arose, to make good which it
became necessary to prolong the term.
     In 1697, by the 8th of William III, c. 20, the deficiencies
of several taxes were charged upon what was then called the first
general mortgage or fund, consisting of a prolongation to the
first of August 1706 of several different taxes which would have
expired within a shorter term, and of which the produce was
accumulated into one general fund. The deficiencies charged upon
this prolonged term amounted to L5,160,459 14s. 9 1/4d.
     In 1701, those duties, with some others, were still further
prolonged for the like purposes till the first of August 1710,
and were called the second general mortgage or fund. The
deficiencies charged upon it amounted to L2,055,999 7s. 11 1/2d.
     In 1707, those duties were still further prolonged, as a
fund for new loans, to the first of August 1712, and were called
the third general mortgage or fund. The sum borrowed upon it was
L983,254 11s. 9 1/4d.
     In 1708, those duties were all (except the Old Subsidy of
Tonnage and Poundage, of which one moiety only was made a part of
this fund, and a duty upon the importation of Scotch linen, which
had been taken off by the Articles of Union) still further
continued, as a fund for new loans, to the first of August 1714,
and were called the fourth general mortgage or fund. The sum
borrowed upon it was L925,176 9s. 2 1/4d.
     In 1709, those cities were all (except the Old Subsidy of
Tonnage and Poundage, which was now left out of this fund
altogether) still further continued for the same purpose to the
first of August 1716, and were called the fifth general mortgage
or fund. The sum borrowed upon it was L922,029 6s.
     In 1710, those duties were again prolonged to the first of
August 1720, and were called the sixth general mortgage or fund.
The sum borrowed upon it was L1,296,552 9s. 11 3/4d.
     In 1711, the same duties (which at this time were thus
subject to four different anticipations) together with several
others were continued for ever, and made a fund for paying the
interest of the capital of the South Sea Company, which had that
year advanced to government, for paying debts and making good
deficiencies, the sum of L9,177,967 15s. 4d.; the greatest loan
which at that time had ever been made.
     Before this period, the principal, so far as I have been
able to observe, the only taxes which in order to pay the
interest of a debt had been imposed for perpetuity, were those
for paying the interest of the money which had been advanced to
government by the Bank and the East India Company, and of what it
was expected would be advanced, but which was never advanced, by
a projected land bank. The bank fund at this time amounted to
L3,375,027 17s. 10 1/2d., for which was paid an annuity or
interest of L206,501 13s. 5d. The East India fund amounted to
L3,200,000, for which was paid an annuity or interest of
L160,000- the bank fund being at six per cent, the East India
fund at five per cent interest.
     In 1715, by the 1st of George I, c. 12, the different taxes
which had been mortgaged for paying the bank annuity, together
with several others which by this act were likewise rendered
perpetual, were accumulated into one common fund called The
Aggregate Fund, which was charged not only with the payments of
the bank annuity, but with several other annuities and burdens of
different kinds. This fund was afterwards augmented by the 3rd of
George I, c. 8, and by the 5th of George I, c. 3, and the
different duties which were then added to it were likewise
rendered perpetual.
     In 1717, by the 3rd of George I, c. 7, several other taxes
were rendered perpetual, and accumulated into another common
fund, called The General Fund, for the payment of certain
annuities, amounting in the whole to L724,849 6s. 10 1/2d.
     In consequence of those different acts, the greater part of
the taxes which before had been anticipated only for a short term
of years were rendered perpetual as a fund for paying, not the
capital, but the interest only, of the money which had been
borrowed upon them by different successive anticipations.
     Had money never been raised but by anticipation, the course
of a few years would have liberated the public revenue without
any other attention of government besides that of not overloading
the fund by charging it with more debt than it could pay within
the limited term, and of not anticipating a second time before
the expiration of the first anticipation. But the greater part of
European governments have been incapable of those attentions.
They have frequently overloaded the fund even upon the first
anticipation, and when this happened not to be the case, they
have generally taken care to overload it by anticipating a second
and a third time before the expiration of the first anticipation.
The fund becoming in this manner altogether insufficient for
paying both principal and interest of the money borrowed upon it,
it became necessary to charge it with the interest only, or a
perpetual annuity equal to the interest, and such unprovident
anticipations necessarily gave birth to the more ruinous practice
of perpetual funding. But though this practice necessarily puts
off the liberation of the public revenue from a fixed period to
one so indefinite that it is not very likely ever to arrive, yet
as a greater sum can in all cases be raised by this new practice
than by the old one of anticipations, the former, when men have
once become familiar with it, has in the great exigencies of the
state been universally preferred to the latter. To relieve the
present exigency is always the object which principally interests
those immediately concerned in the administration of public
affairs. The future liberation of the public revenue they leave
to the care of posterity.
     During the reign of Queen Anne, the market rate of interest
had fallen from six to five per cent, and in the twelfth year of
her reign five per cent was declared to be the highest rate which
could lawfully be taken for money borrowed upon private security.
Soon after the greater part of the temporary taxes of Great
Britain had been rendered perpetual, and distributed into the
Aggregate, South Sea, and General Funds, the creditors of the
public, like those of private persons, were induced to accept of
five per cent for the interest of their money, which occasioned a
saving of one per cent upon the capital of the greater part of
the debts which had been thus funded for perpetuity, or of
one-sixth of the greater part of the annuities which were paid
out of the three great funds above mentioned. This saving left a
considerable surplus in the produce of the different taxes which
had been accumulated into those funds over and above what was
necessary for paying the annuities which were now charged upon
them, and laid the foundation of what has since been called the
Sinking Fund. In 1717, it amounted to L323,434 7s. 7 1/2d. In
1727, the interest of the greater part of the public debts was
still further reduced to four per cent; and in 1753 and 1757, to
three and a half and three per cent; which reductions still
further augmented the sinking fund.
     A sinking fund, though instituted for the payment of old,
facilitates very much the contracting of new debts. It is a
subsidiary fund always at hand to be mortgaged in aid of any
other doubtful fund upon which money is proposed to be raised in
an exigency of the state. Whether the sinking fund of Great
Britain has been more frequently applied to the one or to the
other of those two purposes will sufficiently appear by and by.
     Besides those two methods of borrowing, by anticipations and
by perpetual funding, there are two other methods which hold a
sort of middle place between them. These are, that of borrowing
upon annuities for terms of years, and that of borrowing upon
annuities for lives.
     During the reigns of King William and Queen Anne, large sums
were frequently borrowed upon annuities for terms of years, which
were sometimes longer and sometimes shorter. In 1693, an act was
passed for borrowing one million upon an annuity of fourteen per
cent, or of L140,000 a year for sixteen years. In 1691, an act
was passed for borrowing a million upon annuities for lives, upon
terms which in the present times would appear very advantageous.
But the subscription was not filled up. In the following year the
deficiency was made good by borrowing upon annuities for lives at
fourteen per cent, or at little more than seven years' purchase.
In 1695, the persons who had purchased those annuities were
allowed to exchange them for others of ninety-six years upon
paying into the Exchequer sixty-three pounds in the hundred; that
is, the difference between fourteen per cent for life, and
fourteen per cent for ninety-six years, was sold for sixty-three
pounds, or for four and a half years' purchase. Such was the
supposed instability of government that even these terms procured
few purchasers. In the reign of Queen Anne money was upon
different occasions borrowed both upon annuities for lives, and
upon annuities for terms of thirty-two, of eighty-nine, of
ninety-eight, and of ninety-nine years. In 1719, the proprietors
of the annuities for thirty-two years were induced to accept in
lieu of them South Sea stock to the amount of eleven and a half
years' purchase of the annuities, together with an additional
quantity of stock equal to the arrears which happened then to be
due upon them. In 1720, the greater part of the other annuities
for terms of years both long and short were subscribed into the
same fund. The long annuities at that time amounted to L666,821
8s. 3 1/2d. a year. On the 5th of January 1775, the remainder of
them, or what was not subscribed at that time, amounted only to
L136,453 12s. 8d.
     During the two wars which began in 1739 and in 1755, little
money was borrowed either upon annuities for terms of years, or
upon those for lives. An annuity for ninety-eight or ninety-nine
years, however, is worth nearly as much money as a perpetuity,
and should, therefore, one might think, be a fund for borrowing
nearly as much. But those who, in order to make family
settlements, and to provide for remote futurity, buy into the
public stocks, would not care to purchase into one of which the
value was continually diminishing; and such people make a very
considerable proportion both of the proprietors and purchasers of
stock. An annuity for a long term of years, therefore, though its
intrinsic value may be very nearly the same with that of a
perpetual annuity, will not find nearly the same number of
purchasers. The subscribers to a new loan, who mean generally to
sell their subscriptions as soon as possible, prefer greatly a
perpetual annuity redeemable by Parliament to an irredeemable
annuity for a long term of years of only equal amount. The value
of the former may be supposed always the same, or very nearly the
same, and it makes, therefore, a more convenient transferable
stock than the latter.
     During the two last-mentioned wars, annuities, either for
terms of years or for lives, were seldom granted but as premiums
to the subscribers to a new loan over and above the redeemable
annuity or interest upon the credit of which the loan was
supposed to be made. They were granted, not as the proper fund
upon which the money was borrowed, but as an additional
encouragement to the lender.
     Annuities for lives have occasionally been granted in two
different ways; either upon separate lives, or upon lots of
lives, which in French are called Tontines, from the name of
their inventor. When annuities are granted upon separate lives,
the death of every individual annuitant disburthens the public
revenue so far as it was affected by his annuity. When annuities
are granted upon tontines, the liberation of the public revenue
does not commence till the death of all annuitants comprehended
in one lot, which may sometimes consist of twenty or thirty
persons, of whom the survivors succeed to the annuities of all
those who die before them, the last survivor succeeding to the
annuities of the whole lot. Upon the same revenue more money can
always be raised by tontines than by annuities for separate
lives. An annuity, with a right of survivorship, is really worth
more than an equal annuity for a separate life, and from the
confidence which every man naturally has in his own good fortune,
the principle upon which is founded the success of all lotteries,
such an annuity generally sells for something more than it is
worth. In countries where it is usual for government to raise
money by granting annuities, tontines are upon this account
generally preferred to annuities for separate lives. The
expedient which will raise most money is almost always preferred
to that which is likely to bring about in the speediest manner
the liberation of the public revenue.
     In France a much greater proportion of the public debts
consists in annuities for lives than in England. According to a
memoir presented by the Parliament of Bordeaux to the king in
1764, the whole public debt of France is estimated at twenty-four
hundred millions of livres, of which the capital for which
annuities for lives had been granted is supposed to amount to
three hundred millions, the eighth part of the whole public debt.
The annuities themselves are computed to amount to thirty
millions a year, the fourth part of one hundred and twenty
millions, the supposed interest of that whole debt. These
estimations, I know very well, are not exact, but having been
presented by so very respectable a body as approximations to the
truth, they may, I apprehend, be considered as such. It is not
the different degrees of anxiety in the two governments of France
and England for the liberation of the public revenue which
occasions this difference in their respective modes of borrowing.
It arises altogether from the different views and interests of
the lenders.
     In England, the seat of government being in the greatest
mercantile city in the world, the merchants are generally the
people who advance money to government. By advancing it they do
not mean to diminish, but, on the contrary, to increase their
mercantile capitals, and unless they expected to sell with some
profit their share in the subscription for a new loan, they never
would subscribe. But if by advancing their money they were to
purchase, instead of perpetual annuities, annuities for lives
only, whether their own or those of other people, they would not
always be so likely to sell them with a profit. Annuities upon
their own lives they would always sell with loss, because no man
will give for an annuity upon the life of another, whose age and
state of health are nearly the same with his own, the same price
which he would give for one upon his own. An annuity upon the
life of a third person, indeed, is, no doubt, of equal value to
the buyer and the seller; but its real value begins to diminish
from the moment it is granted, and continues to do so more and
more as long as it subsists. It can never, therefore, make so
convenient a transferable stock as a perpetual annuity, of which
the real value may be supposed always the same, or very nearly
the same.
     In France, the seat of government not being in a great
mercantile city, merchants do not make so great a proportion of
the people who advance money to government. The people concerned
in the finances, the farmers general, the receivers of the taxes
which are not in farm, the court bankers, etc., make the greater
part of those who advance their money in all public exigencies.
Such people are commonly men of mean birth, but of great wealth,
and frequently of great pride. They are too proud to marry their
equals, and women of quality disdain to marry them. They
frequently resolve, therefore, to live bachelors, and having
neither any families of their own, nor much regard for those of
their relations, whom they are not always very fond of
acknowledging, they desire only to live in splendour during their
own time, and are not unwilling that their fortune should end
with themselves. The number of rich people, besides, who are
either averse to marry, or whose condition of life renders it
either improper or inconvenient for them to do so, is much
greater in France than in England. To such people, who have
little or no care for posterity, nothing can be more convenient
than to exchange their capital for a revenue which is to last
just as long, and no longer, than they wish it to do.
     The ordinary expense of the greater part of modern
governments in time of peace being equal or nearly equal to their
ordinary revenue, when war comes they are both unwilling and
unable to increase their revenue in proportion to the increase of
their expense. They are unwilling for fear of offending the
people, who, by so great and so sudden an increase of taxes,
would soon be disgusted with the war; and they are unable from
not well knowing what taxes would be sufficient to produce the
revenue wanted. The facility of borrowing delivers them from the
embarrassment which this fear and inability would otherwise
occasion. By means of borrowing they are enabled, with a very
moderate increase of taxes, to raise, from year to year, money
sufficient for carrying on the war, and by the practice of
perpetually funding they are enabled, with the smallest possible
increase of taxes, to raise annually the largest possible sum of
money. In great empires the people who live in the capital, and
in the provinces remote from the scene of action, feel, many of
them, scarce any inconveniency from the war; but enjoy, at their
ease, the amusement of reading in the newspapers the exploits of
their own fleets and armies. To them this amusement compensates
the small difference between the taxes which they pay on account
of the war, and those which they had been accustomed to pay in
time of peace. They are commonly dissatisfied with the return of
peace, which puts an end to their amusement, and to a thousand
visionary hopes of conquest and national glory from a longer
continuance of the war.
     The return of peace, indeed, seldom relieves them from the
greater part of the taxes imposed during the war. These are
mortgaged for the interest of the debt contracted in order to
carry it on. If, over and above paying the interest of this debt,
and defraying the ordinary expense of government, the old
revenue, together with the new taxes, produce some surplus
revenue, it may perhaps be converted into a sinking fund for
paying off the debt. But, in the first place, this sinking fund,
even supposing it should be applied to no other purpose, is
generally altogether inadequate for paying, in the course of any
period during which it can reasonably be expected that peace
should continue, the whole debt contracted during the war; and,
in the second place, this fund is almost always applied to other
purposes.
     The new taxes were imposed for the sole purpose of paying
the interest of the money borrowed upon them. If they produce
more, it is generally something which was neither intended nor
expected, and is therefore seldom very considerable. Sinking
funds have generally arisen not so much from any surplus of the
taxes which was over and above what was necessary for paying the
interest or annuity originally charged upon them, as from a
subsequent reduction of that interest. That of Holland in 1655,
and that of the ecclesiastical state in 1685, were both formed in
this manner. Hence the usual insufficiency of such funds.
     During the most profound peace various events occur which
require an extraordinary expense, and government finds it always
more convenient to defray this expense by misapplying the sinking
fund than by imposing a new tax. Every new tax is immediately
felt more or less by the people. It occasions always some murmur,
and meets with some opposition. The more taxes may have been
multiplied, the higher they may have been raised upon every
different subject of taxation; the more loudly the people
complain of every new tax, the more difficult it becomes, too,
either to find out new subjects of taxation, or to raise much
higher the taxes already imposed upon the old. A momentary
suspension of the payment of debt is not immediately felt by the
people, and occasions neither murmur nor complaint. To borrow of
the sinking fund is always an obvious and easy expedient for
getting out of the present difficulty. The more the public debts
may have been accumulated, the more necessary it may have become
to study to reduce them, the more dangerous, the more ruinous it
may be to misapply any part of the sinking fund; the less likely
is the public debt to be reduced to any considerable degree, the
more likely, the more certainly is the sinking fund to be
misapplied towards defraying all the extraordinary expenses which
occur in time of peace. When a nation is already overburdened
with taxes, nothing but the necessities of a new war, nothing but
either the animosity of national vengeance, or the anxiety for
national security, can induce the people to submit, with
tolerable patience, to a new tax. Hence the usual misapplication
of the sinking fund.
     In Great Britain, from the time that we had first recourse
to the ruinous expedient of perpetual funding, the reduction of
the public debt in time of peace has never borne any proportion
to its accumulation in time of war. It was in the war which began
in 1688, and was concluded by the Treaty of Ryswick in 1697, that
the foundation of the present enormous debt of Great Britain was
first laid.
     On the 31st of December 1697, the public debts of Great
Britain, funded and unfunded, amounted to L21,515,742 13s. 8
1/2d. A great part of those debts had been contracted upon short
anticipations, and some part upon annuities for lives, so that
before the 31st of December 1701, in less than four years, there
had partly been paid off, and partly reverted to the public, the
sum of L5,121,041 12s. 0 3/4d.; a greater reduction of the public
debt than has ever since been brought about in so short a period
of time. The remaining debt, therefore, amounted only to
L16,394,701 1s. 7 1/4d.
     In the war which began in 1709., and which was concluded by
the Treaty of Utrecht, the public debts were still more
accumulated. On the 31st of December 1714, they amounted to
L53,681,076 5s. 6 1/2d. The subscription into the South Sea fund
of the short and long annuities increased the capital of the
public debts, so that on the 31st of December 1722 it amounted to
L55,282,978 1s. 3 5/6d. The reduction of the debt began in 1723,
and went on so slowly that, on the 31st of December 1739, during
seventeen years of profound peace, the whole sum paid off was no
more than L8,328,354 17s. 11 3/12d., the capital of the public
debt at that time amounting to L46,954,623 3s. 4 7/12d.
     The Spanish war, which began in 1739, and the French war
which soon followed it occasioned further increase of the debt,
which, on the 31st of December 1748, after the war had been
concluded by the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle, amounted to
L78,293,313 1s. 10 3/4d. The most profound peace of seventeen
years continuance had taken no more than L8,328,354 17s. 11
3/12d. from it. A war of less than nine years' continuance added
L31,338,689 18s. 6 1/6d. to it.
     During the administration of Mr. Pelham, the interest of the
public debt was reduced, or at least measures were taken for
reducing it, from four to three per cent; the sinking fund was
increased, and some part of the public debt was paid off. In
1755, before the breaking out of the late war, the funded debt of
Great Britain amounted to L72,289,673. On the 5th of January
1763, at the conclusion of the peace, the funded debt amounted to
L122,603,336 8s. 2 1/4d. The unfunded debt has been stated at
L13,927,589 2s. 2d. But the expense occasioned by the war did not
end with the conclusion of the peace, so that though, on the 5th
of January 1764, the funded debt was increased (partly by a new
loan, and partly by funding a part of the unfunded debt) to
L129,586,789 10s. 1 3/4d., there still remained (according to the
very well informed author of the Considerations on the Trade and
Finances of Great Britain) an unfunded debt which was brought to
account in that and the following year of L9,975,017 12s. 2
15/44d. In 1764, therefore, the public debt of Great Britain,
funded and unfunded together, amounted, according to this author,
to L139,516,807 2s. 4d. The annuities for lives, too, which had
been granted as premiums to the subscribers to the new loans in
1757, estimated at fourteen years' purchase, were valued at
L472,500; and the annuities for long terms of years, granted as
premiums likewise in 1761 and 1762, estimated at twenty-seven and
a half years' purchase, were valued at L6,826,875. During a peace
of about seven years' continuance, the prudent and truly patriot
administration of Mr. Pelham was not able to pay off an old debt
of six millions. During a war of nearly the same continuance, a
new debt of more than seventy-five millions was contracted.
     On the 5th of January 1775, the funded debt of Great Britain
amounted to L124,996,086 1s. 6 1/4d. The unfunded, exclusive of a
large civil list debt, to L4,150,263 3s. 11 7/8d. Both together,
to L129,146,322 5s. 6d. According to this account the whole debt
paid off during eleven years' profound peace amounted only to
L10,415,474 16s. 9 7/8d. Even this small reduction of debt,
however, has not been all made from the savings out of the
ordinary revenue of the state. Several extraneous sums,
altogether independent of that ordinary revenue, have contributed
towards it. Amongst these we may reckon an additional shilling in
the pound land-tax for three years; the two millions received
from the East India Company as indemnification for their
territorial acquisitions; and the one hundred and ten thousand
pounds received from the bank for the renewal of their charter.
To these must be added several other sums which, as they arose
out of the late war, ought perhaps to be considered as deductions
from the expenses of it. The principal are, 
                                                 L       s.      
d.   The produce of French prizes               690,449    18    
  9   Composition for French prisoners           670,000     0   
   0   What has been received from the sale
     of the ceded islands                      95,500     0      
0  If we add to this sum the balance of the Earl of Chatham's and
Mr. Calcraft's accounts, and other army savings of the same kind,
together with what has been received from the bank, the East
India Company, and the additional shilling in the pound land-tax,
the whole must be a good deal more than five millions. The debt,
therefore, which since the peace has been paid out of the savings
the ordinary revenue of the state, has not, one year with
another, amounted to half a million a year. The sinking fund has,
no doubt, been considerably augmented since the peace, by the
debt which has been paid off, by the reduction of the redeemable
four per cents to three per cents, and by the annuities for lives
which have fallen in, and, if peace were to continue, a million,
perhaps, might now be annually spared out of it towards the
discharge of the debt. Another million, accordingly, was paid in
the course of last year; but, at the same time, a new civil list
debt was left unpaid, and we are now involved in a new war which,
in its progress, may prove as expensive as any of our former
wars.* The new debt which will probably be contracted before the
end of the next campaign may perhaps be nearly equal to all the
old debt which has been paid off from the savings out of the
ordinary revenue of the state. It would be altogether chimerical,
therefore, to expect that the public debt should ever be
completely discharged by any savings which are likely to be made
from that ordinary revenue as it stands at present.    * It has
proved more expensive than all of our former wars; and has
involved us in an additional debt of more than one hundred
millions. During a profound peace of eleven years, little more
than ten millions of debt was paid; during a war of seven years,
more than one hundred millions was contracted. 
     The public funds of the different indebted nations of
Europe, particularly those of England, have by one author been
represented as the accumulation of a great capital superadded to
the other capital of the country, by means of which its trade is
extended, its manufactures multiplied, and its lands cultivated
and improved much beyond what they could have been by means of
that other capital only. He does not consider that the capital
which the first creditors of the public advanced to government
was, from the moment in which they advanced it, a certain portion
of the annual produce turned away from serving in the function of
a capital to serve in that of a revenue; from maintaining
productive labourers to maintain unproductive ones, and to be
spent and wasted, generally in the course of the year, without
even the hope of any future reproduction. In return for the
capital which they advanced they obtained, indeed, an annuity in
the public funds in most cases of more than equal value. This
annuity, no doubt, replaced to them their capital, and enabled
them to carry on their trade and business to the same or perhaps
to a greater extent than before; that is, they were enabled
either to borrow of other people a new capital upon the credit of
this annuity, or by selling it to get from other people a new
capital of their own equal or superior to that which they had
advanced to government. This new capital, however, which they in
this manner either bought or borrowed of other people, must have
existed in the country before, and must have been employed, as
all capitals are, in maintaining productive labour. When it came
into the hands of those who had advanced their money to
government, though it was in some respects a new capital to them,
it was not so to the country, but was only a capital withdrawn
from certain employments in or to be turned towards others.
Though it replaced to them what they had advanced to government,
it did not replace it to the country. Had they not advanced this
capital to government, there would have been in the country two
capitals, two portions of the annual produce, instead of one,
employed in maintaining productive labour.
     When for defraying the expense of government a revenue is
raised within the year from the produce of free or unmortgaged
taxes, a certain portion of the revenue of private people is only
turned away from maintaining one species of unproductive labour
towards maintaining another. Some part of what they pay in those
taxes might no doubt have been accumulated into capital, and
consequently employed in maintaining productive labour; but the
greater part would probably have been spent and consequently
employed in maintaining unproductive labour. The public expense,
however, when defrayed in this manner, no doubt hinders more or
less the further accumulation of new capital; but it does not
necessarily occasion the destruction of any actually existing
capital.
     When the public expense is defrayed by funding, it is
defrayed by the annual destruction of some capital which had
before existed in the country; by the perversion of some portion
of the annual produce which had before been destined for the
maintenance of productive labour towards that of unproductive
labour. As in this case, however, the taxes are lighter than they
would have been had a revenue sufficient for defraying the same
expense been raised within the year, the private revenue of
individuals is necessarily less burdened, and consequently their
ability to save and accumulate some part of that revenue into
capital is a good deal less impaired. If the method of funding
destroys more old capital, it at the same time hinders less the
accumulation or acquisition of new capital than that of defraying
the public expense by a revenue raised within the year. Under the
system of funding, the frugality and industry of private people
can more easily repair the breaches which the waste and
extravagance of government may occasionally make in the general
capital of the society.
     It is only during the continuance of war, however, that the
system of funding has this advantage over the other system. Were
the expense of war to be defrayed always by a revenue raised
within the year, the taxes from which that extraordinary revenue
was drawn would last no longer than the war. The ability of
private people to accumulate, though less during the war, would
have been greater during the peace than under the system of
funding. War would not necessarily have occasioned the
destruction of any old capitals, and peace would have occasioned
the accumulation of many more new. Wars would in general be more
speedily concluded, and less wantonly undertaken. The people
feeling, during the continuance of the war, the complete burden
of it, would soon grow weary of it, and government, in order to
humour them, would not be under the necessity of carrying it on
longer than it was necessary to do so. The foresight of the heavy
and unavoidable burdens of war would hinder the people from
wantonly calling for it when there was no real or solid interest
to fight for. The seasons during which the ability of private
people to accumulate was somewhat impaired would occur more
rarely, and be of shorter continuance. Those, on the contrary,
during which the ability was in the highest vigour would be of
much longer duration than they can well be under the system of
funding.
     When funding, besides, has made a certain progress, the
multiplication of taxes which it brings along with it sometimes
impairs as much the ability of private people to accumulate even
in time of peace as the other system would in time of war. The
peace revenue of Great Britain amounts at present to more than
ten millions a year. If free and unmortgaged, it might be
sufficient, with proper management and without contracting a
shilling of new debt, to carry on the most vigorous war. The
private revenue of the inhabitants of Great Britain is at present
as much encumbered in time of peace, their ability to accumulate
is as much impaired as it would have been in the time of the most
expensive war had the pernicious system of funding never been
adopted.
     In the payment of the interest of the public debt, it has
been said, it is the right hand which pays the left. The money
does not go out of the country. It is only a part of the revenue
of one set of the inhabitants which is transferred to another,
and the nation is not a farthing the poorer. This apology is
founded altogether in the sophistry of the mercantile system, and
after the long examination which I have already bestowed upon
that system, it may perhaps be unnecessary to say anything
further about it. It supposes, besides, that the whole public
debt is owing to the inhabitants of the country, which happens
not to be true; the Dutch, as well as several other foreign
nations, having a very considerable share in our public funds.
But though the whole debt were owing to the inhabitants of the
country, it would not upon that account be less pernicious.
     Land and capital stock are the two original sources of all
revenue both private and public. Capital stock pays the wages of
productive labour, whether employed in agriculture, manufactures,
or commerce. The management of those two original sources of
revenue belong to two different sets of people; the proprietors
of land, and the owners or employers of capital stock.
     The proprietor of land is interested for the sake of his own
revenue to keep his estate in as good condition as he can, by
building and repairing his tenants' houses, by making and
maintaining the necessary drains and enclosures, and all those
other expensive improvements which it properly belongs to the
landlord to make and maintain. But by different land-taxes the
revenue of the landlord may be so much diminished, and by
different duties upon the necessaries and conveniences of life
that diminished revenue may be rendered of so little real value,
that he may find himself altogether unable to make or maintain
those expensive improvements. When the landlord, however, ceases
to do his part, it is altogether impossible that the tenant
should continue to do his. As the distress of the landlord
increases, the agriculture of the country must necessarily
decline.
     When, by different taxes upon the necessaries and
conveniences of life, the owners and employers of capital stock
find that whatever revenue they derive from it will not, in a
particular country, purchase the same quantity of those
necessaries and conveniences which an equal revenue would in
almost any other, they will be disposed to remove to some other.
And when, in order to raise those taxes, all or the greater part
of merchants and manufacturers, that is, all or the greater part
of the employers of great capitals, come to be continually
exposed to the mortifying and vexatious visits of the
tax-gatherers, the disposition to remove will soon be changed
into an actual removal. The industry of the country will
necessarily fall with the removal of the capital which supported
it, and the ruin of trade and manufactures will follow the
declension of agriculture.
     To transfer from the owners of those two great sources of
revenue, land and capital stock, from the persons immediately
interested in the good condition of every particular portion of
land, and in the good management of every particular portion of
capital stock, to another set of persons (the creditors of the
public, who have no such particular interest), the greater part
of the revenue arising from either must, in the long-run,
occasion both the neglect of land, and the waste or removal of
capital stock. A creditor of the public has no doubt a general
interest in the prosperity of the agriculture, manufactures, and
commerce of the country, and consequently in the good condition
of its lands, and in the good management of its capital stock.
Should there be any general failure or declension in any of these
things, the produce of the different taxes might no longer be
sufficient to pay him the annuity or interest which is due to
him. But a creditor of the public, considered merely as such, has
no interest in the good condition of any particular portion of
land, or in the good management of any particular portion of
capital stock. As a creditor of the public he has no knowledge of
any such particular portion. He has no inspection of it. He can
have no care about it. Its ruin may in some cases be unknown to
him, and cannot directly affect him.
     The practice of funding has gradually enfeebled every state
which has adopted it. The Italian republics seem to have begun
it. Genoa and Venice, the only two remaining which can pretend to
an independent existence, have both been enfeebled by it. Spain
seems to have learned the practice from the Italian republics,
and (its taxes being probably less judicious than theirs) it has,
in proportion to its natural strength, been still more enfeebled.
The debts of Spain are of very old standing. It was deeply in
debt before the end of the sixteenth century, about a hundred
years before England owed a shilling. France, notwithstanding all
its natural resources, languishes under an oppressive load of the
same kind. The republic of the United Provinces is as much
enfeebled by its debts as either Genoa or Venice. Is it likely
that in Great Britain alone a practice which has brought either
weakness or desolation into every other country should prove
altogether innocent?
     The system of taxation established in those different
countries, it may be said, is inferior to that of England. I
believe it is so. But it ought to be remembered that, when the
wisest government has exhausted all the proper subjects of
taxation, it must, in cases of urgent necessity, have recourse to
improper ones. The wise republic of Holland has upon some
occasions been obliged to have recourse to taxes as inconvenient
as the greater part of those of Spain. Another war begun before
any considerable liberation of the public revenue had been
brought about, and growing in its progress as expensive as the
last war, may, from irresistible necessity, render the British
system of taxation as oppressive as that of Holland, or even as
that of Spain. To the honour of our present system of taxation,
indeed, it has hitherto given so little embarrassment to industry
that, during the course even of the most expensive wars, the
frugality and good conduct of individuals seem to have been able,
by saving and accumulation, to repair all the breaches which the
waste and extravagance of government had made in the general
capital of the society. At the conclusion of the late war, the
most expensive that Great Britain ever waged, her agriculture was
as flourishing, her manufacturers as numerous and as fully
employed, and her commerce as extensive as they had ever been
before. The capital, therefore, which supported all those
different branches of industry must have been equal to what it
had ever been before. Since the peace, agriculture has been still
further improved, the rents of houses have risen in every town
and village of the country- a proof of the increasing wealth and
revenue of the people; and the annual amount the greater part of
the old taxes, of the principal branches of the excise and
customs in particular, has been continually increasing- an
equally clear proof of an increasing consumption, and
consequently of an increasing produce which could alone support
that consumption. Great Britain seems to support with ease a
burden which, half a century ago, nobody believed her capable of
supporting. Let us not, however, upon this account rashly
conclude that she is capable of supporting any burden, nor even
be too confident that she could support, without great distress,
a burden a little greater than what has already been laid upon
her.
     When national debts have once been accumulated to a certain
degree, there is scarce, I believe, a single instance of their
having been fairly and completely paid. The liberation of the
public revenue, if it has ever been brought about by bankruptcy;
sometimes by an avowed one, but always by a real one, though
frequently by a pretended payment.
     The raising of the denomination of the coin has been the
most usual expedient by which a real public bankruptcy has been
disguised under the appearance of a pretended payment. If a
sixpence, for example, should either by Act of Parliament or
Royal Proclamation be raised to the denomination of a shilling,
and twenty sixpences to that of a pound sterling, the person who
under the old denomination had borrowed twenty shillings, or near
four ounces of silver, would, under the new, pay with twenty
sixpences, or with something less than two ounces. A national
debt of about a hundred and twenty-eight millions, nearly the
capital of the funded and unfunded debt of Great Britain, might
in this manner be paid with about sixty-four millions of our
present money. It would indeed be a pretended payment only, and
the creditors of the public would really be defrauded of ten
shillings in the pound of what was due to them. The calamity,
too, would extend much further than to the creditors of the
public, and those of every private person would suffer a
proportionable loss; and this without any advantage, but in most
cases with a great additional loss, to the creditors of the
public. If the creditors of the public, indeed, were generally
much in debt to other people, they might in some measure
compensate their loss by paying their creditors in the same coin
in which the public had paid them. But in most countries the
creditors of the public are, the greater part of them, wealthy
people, who stand more in the relation of creditors than in that
of debtors towards the rest of their fellow-citizens. A pretended
payment of this kind, therefore, instead of alleviating,
aggravates in most cases the loss of the creditors of the public,
and without any advantage to the public, extends the calamity to
a great number of other innocent people. It occasions a general
and most pernicious subversion of the fortunes of private people,
enriching in most cases the idle and profuse debtor at the
expense of the industrious and frugal creditor, and transporting
a great part of the national capital from the hands which were
likely to increase and improve it to those which are likely to
dissipate and destroy it. When it becomes necessary for a state
to declare itself bankrupt, in the same manner as when it becomes
necessary for an individual to do so, a fair, open, and avowed
bankruptcy is always the measure which is both least
dishonourable to the debtor and least hurtful to the creditor.
The honour of a state is surely very poorly provided for when, in
order to cover the disgrace of a real bankruptcy, it has recourse
to a juggling trick of this kind, so easily seen through, and at
the same time so extremely pernicious.
     Almost all states, however, ancient as well as modern, when
reduced to this necessity have, upon some occasions, played this
very juggling trick. The Romans, at the end of the first Punic
war, reduced the As, the coin or denomination by which they
computed the value of all their other coins, from containing
twelve ounces of copper to contain only two ounces; that is, they
raised two ounces of copper to a denomination which had always
before expressed the value of twelve ounces. The republic was, in
this manner, enabled to pay the great debts which it had
contracted with the sixth part of what it really owed. So sudden
and so great a bankruptcy, we should in the present times be apt
to imagine, must have occasioned a very violent popular clamour.
It does not appear to have occasioned any. The law which enacted
it was, like all other laws relating to the coin, introduced and
carried through the assembly of the people by a tribune, and was
probably a very popular law. In Rome, as in all the other ancient
republics, the poor people were constantly in debt to the rich
and the great, who in order to secure their votes at the annual
elections, used to lend them money at exorbitant interest, which,
being never paid, soon accumulated into a sum too great either
for the debtor to pay, or for anybody else to pay for him. The
debtor, for fear of a very severe execution, was obliged, without
any further gratuity, to vote for the candidate whom the creditor
recommended. In spite of all the laws against bribery and
corruption, the bounty of the candidates, together with the
occasional distributions of corn which were ordered by the
senate, were the principal funds from which, during the latter
times of the Roman republic, the poorer citizens derived their
subsistence. To deliver themselves from this subjection to their
creditors, the poorer citizens were continually calling out
either for an entire abolition of debts, or for what they called
New Tables; that is, for a law which should entitle them to a
complete acquittance upon paying only a certain proportion of
their accumulated debts. The law which reduced the coin of all
denominations to a sixth part of its former value, as it enabled
them to pay their debts with a sixth part of what they really
owed, was equivalent to the most advantageous New Tables. In
order to satisfy the people, the rich and the great were, upon
several different occasions, obliged to consent to laws both for
abolishing debts, and for introducing New Tables; and they
probably were induced to consent to this law partly for the same
reason, and partly that, by liberating the public revenue, they
might restore vigour to that government of which they themselves
had the principal direction. An operation of this kind would at
once reduce a debt of a hundred and twenty-eight millions to
twenty-one millions three hundred and thirty-three thousand three
hundred and thirty-three pounds six shillings and eightpence. In
the course of the second Punic war the As was still further
reduced, first, from two ounces of copper to one ounce, and
afterwards from one ounce to half an ounce; that is, to the
twenty-fourth part of its original value. By combining the three
Roman operations into one, a debt of a hundred and twenty-eight
millions of our present money might in this manner be reduced all
at once to a debt of five millions three hundred and thirty-three
thousand three hundred and thirty-three pounds six shillings and
eightpence. Even the enormous debts of Great Britain might in
this manner soon be paid.
     By means of such expedients the coin of, I believe, all
nations has been gradually reduced more and more below its
original value, and the same nominal sum has been gradually
brought to contain a smaller and a smaller quantity of silver.
     Nations have sometimes, for the same purpose, adulterated
the standard of their coin; that is, have mixed a greater
quantity of alloy in it. If in the pound weight of our silver
coin, for example, instead of eighteen pennyweight, according to
the present standard, there was mixed eight ounces of alloy, a
pound sterling, or twenty shillings of such coin, would be worth
little more than six shillings and eightpence of our present
money. The quantity of silver contained in six shillings and
eightpence of our present money would thus be raised very nearly
to the denomination of a pound sterling. The adulteration of the
standard has exactly the same effect with what the French call an
augmentation, or a direct raising of the denomination of the
coin.
     An augmentation, or a direct raising of the coin, always is,
and from its nature must be, an open and avowed operation. By
means of it pieces of a smaller weight and bulk are called by the
same name which had before been given to pieces of a greater
weight and bulk. The adulteration of the standard, on the
contrary, has generally been a concealed operation. By means of
it pieces were issued from the mint of the same denominations,
and, as nearly as could be contrived, of the same weight, bulk,
and appearance with pieces which had been current before of much
greater value. When King John of France, in order to pay his
debts, adulterated his coin, all the officers of his mint were
sworn to secrecy. Both operations are unjust. But a simple
augmentation is an injustice of open violence, whereas the
adulteration is an injustice of treacherous fraud. This latter
operation, therefore, as soon as it has been discovered, and it
could never be concealed very long, has always excited much
greater indignation than the former. The coin after any
considerable augmentation has very seldom been brought back to
its former weight; but after the greater adulterations it has
almost always been brought back to its former fineness. It has
scarce ever happened that the fury and indignation of the people
could otherwise be appeased.
     In the end of the reign of Henry VIII and in the beginning
of that of Edward VI the English coin was not only raised in its
denomination, but adulterated in its standard. The like frauds
were practised in Scotland during the minority of James VI. They
have occasionally been practised in most other countries.
     That the public revenue of Great Britain can never be
completely liberated, or even that any considerable progress can
ever be made towards that liberation, while the surplus of that
revenue, or what is over and above defraying the annual expense
of the peace establishment, is so very small, it seems altogether
in vain to expect. That liberation, it is evident, can never be
brought about without either some very considerable augmentation
of the public revenue, or some equally considerable reduction of
the public expense.
     A more equal land-tax, a more equal tax upon the rent of
houses, and such alterations in the present system of customs and
excise as those which have been mentioned in the foregoing
chapter might, perhaps, without increasing the burden of the
greater part of the people, but only distributing the weight of
it more equally upon the whole, produce a considerable
augmentation of revenue. The most sanguine projector, however,
could scarce flatter himself that any augmentation of this kind
would be such as could give any reasonable hopes either of
liberating the public revenue altogether, or even of making such
progress towards that liberation in time of peace as either to
prevent or to compensate the further accumulation of the public
debt in the next war.
     By extending the British system of taxation to all the
different provinces of the empire inhabited by people of either
British or European extraction, a much greater augmentation of
revenue might be expected. This, however, could scarce, perhaps,
be done, consistently with the principles of the British
constitution, without admitting into the British Parliament, or
if you will into the states general of the British empire, a fair
and equal representation of all those different provinces, that
of each province bearing the same proportion to the produce of
its taxes as the representation of Great Britain might bear to
the produce of the taxes levied upon Great Britain. The private
interest of many powerful individuals, the confirmed prejudices
of great bodies of people seem, indeed, at present, to oppose to
so great a change such obstacles as it may be very difficult,
perhaps altogether impossible, to surmount. Without, however,
pretending to determine whether such a union be practicable or
impracticable, it may not, perhaps, be improper, in a speculative
work of this kind, to consider how far the British system of
taxation might be applicable to all the different provinces of
the empire, what revenue might be expected from it if so applied,
and in what manner a general union of this kind might be likely
to affect the happiness and prosperity of the different provinces
comprehended within it. Such a speculation can at worst be
regarded but as a new Utopia, less amusing certainly, but not
more useless and chimerical than the old one.
     The land-tax, the stamp-duties, and the different duties of
customs and excise constitute the four principal branches of the
British taxes.
     Ireland is certainly as able, and our American and West
Indian plantations more able to pay a land-tax than Great
Britain. Where the landlord is subject neither to tithe nor
poor-rate, he must certainly be more able to pay such a tax than
where he is subject to both those other burdens. The tithe, where
there is no modus, and where it is levied in kind, diminishes
more what would otherwise be the rent of the landlord than a
land-tax which really amounted to five shillings in the pound.
Such a tithe will be found in most cases to amount to more than a
fourth part of the real rent of the land, or of what remains
after replacing completely the capital of the farmer, together
with his reasonable profit. If all moduses and all impropriations
were taken away, the complete church tithe of Great Britain and
Ireland could not well be estimated at less than six or seven
millions. If there was no tithe either in Great Britain or
Ireland, the landlords could afford to pay six or seven millions
additional land-tax without being more burdened than a very great
part of them are at present. America pays no tithe, and could
therefore very well afford to pay a land-tax. The lands in
America and the West Indies, indeed, are in general not tenanted
nor leased out to farmers. They could not therefore be assessed
according to any rent-roll. But neither were the lands of Great
Britain, in the 4th of William and Mary, assessed according to
any rent-roll, but according to a very loose and inaccurate
estimation. The lands in America might be assessed either in the
same manner, or according to an equitable valuation in
consequence of an accurate survey like that which was lately made
in the Milanese, and in the dominions of Austria, Prussia, and
Sardinia.
     Stamp-duties, it is evident, might be levied without any
variation in all countries where the forms of law process, and
the deeds by which property both real and personal is
transferred, are the same or nearly the same.
     The extension of the custom-house laws of Great Britain to
Ireland and the plantations, provided it was accompanied, as in
justice it ought to be, with an extension of the freedom of
trade, would be in the highest degree advantageous to both. All
the invidious restraints which at present oppress the trade of
Ireland, the distinction between the enumerated and
non-enumerated commodities of America, would be entirely at an
end. The countries north of Cape Finisterre would be as open to
every part of the produce of America as those south of that Cape
are to some parts of that produce at present. The trade between
all the different parts of the British empire would, in
consequence of this uniformity in the custom-house laws, be as
free as the coasting trade of Great Britain is at present. The
British empire would thus afford within itself an immense
internal market for every part of the produce of all its
different provinces. So great an extension of market would soon
compensate both to Ireland and the plantations all that they
could suffer from the increase of the duties of customs.
     The excise is the only part of the British system of
taxation which would require to be varied in any respect
according as it was applied to the different provinces of the
empire. It might be applied to Ireland without any variation, the
produce and consumption of that kingdom being exactly of the same
nature with those of Great Britain. In its application to America
and the West Indies, of which the produce and consumption are so
very different from those of Great Britain, some modification
might be necessary in the same manner as in its application to
the cyder and beer counties of England.
     A fermented liquor, for example, which is called beer, but
which, as it is made of molasses, bears very little resemblance
to our beer, makes a considerable part of the common drink of the
people in America. This liquor, as it can be kept only for a few
days, cannot, like our beer, be prepared and stored up for sale
in great breweries; but every private family must brew it for
their own use, in the same manner as they cook their victuals.
But to subject every private family to the odious visits and
examination of the tax-gatherers, in the same manner as we
subject the keepers of alehouses and the brewers for public sale,
would be altogether inconsistent with liberty. If for the sake of
equality it was thought necessary to lay a tax upon this liquor,
it might be taxed by taxing the material of which it is made,
either at the place of manufacture, or, if the circumstances of
the trade rendered such an excise improper, by laying a duty upon
its importation into the colony in which it was to be consumed.
Besides the duty of one penny a gallon imposed by the British
Parliament upon the importation of molasses into America, there
is a provincial tax of this kind upon their importation into
Massachusetts Bay, in ships belonging to any other colony, of
eightpence the hogshead; and another upon their importation, from
the northern colonies into South Carolina, of fivepence the
gallon. Or if neither of these methods was found convenient, each
family might compound for its consumption of this liquor, either
according to the number of persons of which it consisted, in the
same manner as private families compound for the malt-tax in
England; or according to the different ages and sexes of those
persons, in the same manner as several different taxes are levied
in Holland; or nearly as Sir Matthew Decker proposes that all
taxes upon consumable commodities should be levied in England.
This mode of taxation, it has already been observed, when applied
to objects of a speedy consumption is not a very convenient one.
It might be adopted, however, in cases where no better could be
done.
     Sugar, rum, and tobacco are commodities which are nowhere
necessaries of life, which are become objects of almost universal
consumption, and which are therefore extremely proper subjects of
taxation. If a union with the colonies were to take place, those
commodities might be taxed either before they go out of the hands
of the manufacturer or grower, or if this mode of taxation did
not suit the circumstances of those persons, they might be
deposited in public warehouses both at the place of manufacture,
and at all the different ports of the empire to which they might
afterwards be transported, to remain there, under the joint
custody of the owner and the revenue officer, till such time as
they should be delivered out either to the consumer, to the
merchant retailer for home consumption, or to the merchant
exporter, the tax not to be advanced till such delivery. When
delivered out for exportation, to go duty free upon proper
security being given that they should really be exported out of
the empire. These are perhaps the principal commodities with
regard to which a union with the colonies might require some
considerable change in the present system of British taxation.
     What might be the amount of the revenue which this system of
taxation extended to all the different provinces of the empire
might produce, it must, no doubt, be altogether impossible to
ascertain with tolerable exactness. By means of this system there
is annually levied in Great Britain, upon less than eight
millions of people, more than ten millions of revenue. Ireland
contains more than two millions of people, and according to the
accounts laid before the congress, the twelve associated
provinces of America contain more than three. Those accounts,
however, may have been exaggerated, in order, perhaps, either to
encourage their own people, or to intimidate those of this
country, and we shall suppose, therefore, that our North American
and West Indian colonies taken together contain no more than
three millions; or that the whole British empire, in Europe and
America, contains no more than thirteen millions of inhabitants.
If upon less than eight millions of inhabitants this system of
taxation raises a revenue of more than ten millions sterling, it
ought upon thirteen millions of inhabitants to raise a revenue of
more than sixteen millions two hundred and fifty thousand pounds
sterling. From this revenue, supposing that this system could
produce it, must be deducted the revenue usually raised in
Ireland and the plantations for defraying the expense of their
respective civil governments. The expense of the civil and
military establishment of Ireland, together with the interest of
the public debt, amounts, at a medium of the two years which
ended March 1775, to something less than seven hundred and fifty
thousand pounds a year. By a very exact account of the revenue of
the principal colonies of America and the West Indies, it
amounted, before the commencement of the present disturbances, to
a hundred and forty-one thousand eight hundred pounds. In this
account, however, the revenue of Maryland, of North Carolina, and
of all our late acquisitions both upon the continent and in the
islands is omitted, which may perhaps make a difference of thirty
or forty thousand pounds. For the sake of even numbers,
therefore, let us suppose that the revenue necessary for
supporting the civil government of Ireland and the plantations
may amount to a million. There would remain consequently a
revenue of fifteen millions two hundred and fifty thousand pounds
to be applied towards defraying the general expense of the
empire, and towards paying the public debt. But if from the
present revenue of Great Britain a million could in peaceable
times be spared towards the payment of that debt, six millions
two hundred and fifty thousand pounds could very well be spared
from this improved revenue. This great sinking fund, too, might
be augmented every year by the interest of the debt which had
been discharged the year before, and might in this manner
increase so very rapidly as to be sufficient in a few years to
discharge the whole debt, and thus to restore completely the at
present debilitated and languishing vigour of the empire. In the
meantime the people might be relieved from some of the most
burdensome taxes; from those which are imposed either upon the
necessaries of life, or upon the materials of manufacture. The
labouring poor would thus be enabled to live better, to work
cheaper, and to send their goods cheaper to market. The cheapness
of their goods would increase the demand for them, and
consequently for the labour of those who produced them. This
increase in the demand for labour would both increase the numbers
and improve the circumstances of the labouring poor. Their
consumption would increase, and together with it the revenue
arising from all those articles of their consumption upon which
the taxes might be allowed to remain.
     The revenue arising from this system of taxation, however,
might not immediately increase in proportion to the number of
people who were subjected to it. Great indulgence would for some
time be due to those provinces of the empire which were thus
subjected to burdens to which they had not before been
accustomed, and even when the same taxes came to be levied
everywhere as exactly as possible, they would not everywhere
produce a revenue proportioned to the numbers of the people. In a
poor country the consumption of the principal commodities subject
to the duties of customs and excise is very small, and in a
thinly inhabited country the opportunities of smuggling are very
great. The consumption of malt liquors among the inferior ranks
of people in Scotland is very small, and the excise upon malt,
beer, and ale produces less there than in England in proportion
to the numbers of the people and the rate of the duties, which
upon malt is different on account of a supposed difference of
quality. In these particular branches of the excise there is not,
I apprehend, much more smuggling in the one country than in the
other. The duties upon the distillery, and the greater part of
the duties of customs, in proportion to the numbers of people in
the respective countries, produce less in Scotland than in
England, not only on account of the smaller consumption of the
taxed commodities, but of the much greater facility of smuggling.
In Ireland the inferior ranks of people are still poorer than in
Scotland, and many parts of the country are almost as thinly
inhabited. In Ireland, therefore, the consumption of the taxed
commodities might, in proportion to the number of the people, be
still less than Scotland, and the facility of smuggling nearly
the same. In America and the West Indies the white people even of
the lowest rank are in much better circumstances than those of
the same rank in England, and their consumption of all the
luxuries in which they usually indulge themselves is probably
much greater. The blacks, indeed, who make the greater part of
the inhabitants both of the southern colonies upon the continent
and of the West India islands, as they are in a state of slavery,
are, no doubt, in a worse condition than the poorest people
either in Scotland or Ireland. We must not, however, upon that
account, imagine that they are worse fed, or that their
consumption of articles which might be subjected to moderate
duties is less than that even of the lower ranks of people in
England. In order that they may work well, it is the interest of
their master that they should be fed well and kept in good heart
in the same manner as it is his interest that his working cattle
should be so. The blacks accordingly have almost everywhere their
allowance of rum and molasses or spruce beer in the same manner
as the white servants, and this allowance would not probably be
withdrawn though those articles should be subjected to moderate
duties. The consumption of the taxed commodities, therefore, in
proportion to the number of inhabitants, would probably be as
great in America and the West Indies as in any part of the
British empire. The opportunities of smuggling, indeed, would be
much greater; America, in proportion to the extent of the
country, being much more thinly inhabited than either Scotland or
Ireland. If the revenue, however, which is at present raised by
the different duties upon malt and malt liquors were to be levied
by a single duty upon malt, the opportunity of smuggling in the
most important branch of the excise would be almost entirely
taken away: and if the duties of customs, instead of being
imposed upon almost all the different articles of importation,
were confined to a few of the most general use and consumption,
and if the levying of those duties were subjected to the excise
laws, the opportunity of smuggling, though not so entirely taken
away, would be very much diminished. In consequence of those two,
apparently, very simple and easy alterations, the duties of
customs and excise might probably produce a revenue as great in
proportion to the consumption of the most thinly inhabited
province as they do at present in proportion to that of the most
populous.
     The Americans, it has been said, indeed, have no gold or
silver money; the interior commerce of the country being carried
on by a paper currency, and the gold and silver which
occasionally come among them being all sent to Great Britain in
return for the commodities which they receive from us. But
without gold and silver, it is added, there is no possibility of
paying taxes. We already get all the gold and silver which they
have. How is it possible to draw from them what they have not?
     The present scarcity of gold and silver money in America is
not the effect of the poverty of that country, or of the
inability of the people there to purchase those metals. In a
country where the wages of labour are so much higher, and the
price of provisions so much lower than in England, the greater
part of the people must surely have wherewithal to purchase a
greater quantity if it were either necessary or convenient for
them to do so. The scarcity of those metals, therefore, must be
the effect of choice, and not of necessity.
     It is for transacting either domestic or foreign business
that gold and silver money is either necessary or convenient.
     The domestic business of every country, it has been shown in
the second book of this Inquiry, may, at least in peaceable
times, be transacted by means of a paper currency with nearly the
same degree of conveniency as by gold and silver money. It is
convenient for the Americans, who could always employ with profit
in the improvement of their lands a greater stock than they can
easily get, to save as much as possible the expense of so costly
an instrument of commerce as gold and silver, and rather to
employ that part of their surplus produce which would be
necessary for purchasing those metals in purchasing the
instruments of trade, the materials of clothing, several parts of
household furniture, and the ironwork necessary for building and
extending their settlements and plantations; in purchasing, not
dead stock, but active and productive stock. The colony
governments find it for their interest to supply the people with
such a quantity of papermoney as is fully sufficient and
generally more than sufficient for transacting their domestic
business. Some of those governments, that of Pennsylvania
particularly, derive a revenue from lending this paper-money to
their subjects at an interest of so much per cent. Others, like
that of Massachusetts Bay, advance upon extraordinary emergencies
a paper-money of this kind for defraying the public expense, and
afterwards, when it suits the conveniency of the colony, redeem
it at the depreciated value to which it gradually falls. In 1747,
that colony paid, in this manner, the greater part of its public
debts with the tenth part of the money for which its bills had
been granted. It suits the conveniency of the planters to save
the expense of employing gold and silver money in their domestic
transactions, and it suits the conveniency of the colony
governments to supply them with a medium which, though attended
with some very considerable disadvantages, enables them to save
that expense. The redundancy of paper-money necessarily banishes
gold and silver from the domestic transactions of the colonies,
for the same reason that it has banished those metals from the
greater part of the domestic transactions in Scotland; and in
both countries it is not the poverty, but the enterprising and
projecting spirit of the people, their desire of employing all
the stock which they can get as active and productive stock,
which has occasioned this redundancy of paper-money.   In the
exterior commerce which the different colonies carry on with
Great Britain, gold and silver are more or less employed exactly
in proportion as they are more or less necessary. Where those
metals are not necessary they seldom appear. Where they are
necessary they are generally found.
     In the commerce between Great Britain and the tobacco
colonies the British goods are generally advanced to the
colonists at a pretty long credit, and are afterwards paid for in
tobacco, rated at a certain price. It is more convenient for the
colonists to pay in tobacco than in gold and silver. It would be
more convenient for any merchant to pay for the goods which his
correspondents had sold to him in some other sort of goods which
he might happen to deal in than in money. Such a merchant would
have no occasion to keep any part of his stock by him unemployed,
and in ready money, for answering occasional demands. He could
have, at all times, a larger quantity of goods in his shop or
warehouse, and he could deal to a greater extent. But it seldom
happens to be convenient for all the correspondents of a merchant
to receive payment for the goods which they sell to him in goods
of some other kind which he happens to deal in. The British
merchants who trade to Virginia and Maryland happen to be a
particular set of correspondents, to whom it is more convenient
to receive payment for the goods which they sell to those
colonies in tobacco than in gold and silver. They expect to make
a profit by the sale of the tobacco. They could make none by that
of the gold and silver. Gold and silver, therefore, very seldom
appear in the commerce between Great Britain and the tobacco
colonies. Maryland and Virginia have as little occasion for those
metals in their foreign as in their domestic commerce. They are
said, accordingly, to have less gold and silver money than any
other colonies in America. They are reckoned, however, as
thriving, and consequently as rich, as any of their neighbours.
     In the northern colonies, Pennsylvania, New York, New
Jersey, the four governments of New England, etc., the value of
their own produce which they export to Great Britain is not equal
to that of the manufactures which they import for their own use,
and for that of some of the other colonies to which they are the
carriers. A balance, therefore, must be paid to the mother
country in gold and silver, and this balance they generally find.
     In the sugar colonies the value of the produce annually
exported to Great Britain is much greater than that of all the
goods imported from thence. If the sugar and rum annually sent to
the mother country were paid for in those colonies, Great Britain
would be obliged to send out every year a very large balance in
money, and the trade to the West Indies would, by a certain
species of politicians, be considered as extremely
disadvantageous. But it so happens that many of the principal
proprietors of the sugar plantations reside in Great Britain.
Their rents are remitted to them in sugar and rum, the produce of
their estates. The sugar and rum which the West India merchants
purchase in those colonies upon their own account are not equal
in value to the goods which they annually sell there. A balance,
therefore, must necessarily be paid to them in gold and silver,
and this balance, too, is generally found.
     The difficulty and irregularity of payment from the
different colonies to Great Britain have not been at all in
proportion to the greatness or smallness of the balances which
were respectively due from them. Payments have in general been
more regular from the northern than from the tobacco colonies,
though the former have generally paid a pretty large balance in
money, while the latter have either paid no balance, or a much
smaller one. The difficulty of getting payment from our different
sugar colonies has been greater or less in proportion, not so
much to the extent of the balances respectively due from them, as
to the quantity of uncultivated land which they contained; that
is, to the greater or smaller temptation which the planters have
been under of overtrading, or of undertaking the settlement and
plantation of greater quantities of waste land than suited the
extent of their capitals. The returns from the great island of
Jamaica, where there is still much uncultivated land, have, upon
this account, been in general more irregular and uncertain than
those from the smaller islands of Barbadoes, Antigua, and St.
Christophers, which have for these many years been completely
cultivated, and have, upon that account, afforded less field for
the speculations of the planter. The new acquisitions of Grenada,
Tobago, St. Vincents, and Dominica have opened a new field for
speculations of this kind, and the returns from those islands
have of late been as irregular and uncertain as those from the
great island of Jamaica.
     It is not, therefore, the poverty of the colonies which
occasions, in the greater part of them, the present scarcity of
gold and silver money. Their great demand for active and
productive stock makes it convenient for them to have as little
dead stock as possible, and disposes them upon that account to
content themselves with a cheaper though less commodious
instrument of commerce than gold and silver. They are thereby
enabled to convert the value of that gold and silver into the
instruments of trade, into the materials of clothing, into
household furniture, and into the ironwork necessary for building
and extending their settlements and plantations. In those
branches of business which cannot be transacted without gold and
silver money, it appears that they can always find the necessary
quantity of those metals; and if they frequently do not find it,
their failure is generally the effect, not of their necessary
poverty, but of their unnecessary and excessive enterprise. It is
not because they are poor that their payments are irregular and
uncertain, but because they are too eager to become excessively
rich. Though all that part of the produce of the colony taxes
which was over and above what was necessary for defraying the
expense of their own civil and military establishments were to be
remitted to Great Britain in gold and silver, the colonies have
abundantly wherewithal to purchase the requisite quantity of
those metals. They would in this case be obliged, indeed, to
exchange a part of their surplus produce, with which they now
purchase active and productive stock, for dead stock. In
transacting their domestic business they would be obliged to
employ a costly instead of a cheap instrument of commerce, and
the expense of purchasing this costly instrument might damp
somewhat the vivacity and ardour of their excessive enterprise in
the improvement of land. It might not, however, be necessary to
remit any part of the American revenue in gold and silver. It
might be remitted in bills drawn upon and accepted by particular
merchants or companies in Great Britain to whom a part of the
surplus produce of America had been consigned, who would pay into
the treasury the American revenue in money, after having
themselves received the value of it in goods; and the whole
business might frequently be transacted without exporting a
single ounce of gold or silver from America.
     It is not contrary to justice that both Ireland and America
should contribute towards the discharge of the public debt of
Great Britain. That debt has been contracted in support of the
government established by the Revolution, a government to which
the Protestants of Ireland owe, not only the whole authority
which they at present enjoy in their own country, but every
security which they possess for their liberty, their property,
and their religion; a government to which several of the colonies
of America owe their present charters, and consequently their
present constitution, and to which all the colonies of America
owe the liberty, security, and property which they have ever
since enjoyed. That public debt has been contracted in the
defence, not of Great Britain alone, but of all the different
provinces of the empire; the immense debt contracted in the late
war in particular, and a great part of that contracted in the war
before, were both properly contracted in defence of America.
     By a union with Great Britain, Ireland would gain, besides
the freedom of trade, other advantages much more important, and
which would much more than compensate any increase of taxes that
might accompany that union. By the union with England the
middling and inferior ranks of people in Scotland gained a
complete deliverance from the power of an aristocracy which had
always before oppressed them. By a union with Great Britain the
greater part of the people of all ranks in Ireland would gain an
equally complete deliverance from a much more oppressive
aristocracy; an aristocracy not founded, like that of Scotland,
in the natural and respectable distinctions of birth and fortune,
but in the most odious of all distinctions, those of religious
and political prejudices; distinctions which, more than any
other, animate both the insolence of the oppressors and the
hatred and indignation of the oppressed, and which commonly
render the inhabitants of the same country more hostile to one
another than those of different countries ever are. Without a
union with Great Britain the inhabitants of Ireland are not
likely for many ages to consider themselves as one people.
     No oppressive aristocracy has ever prevailed in the
colonies. Even they, however, would, in point of happiness and
tranquility, gain considerably by a union with Great Britain. It
would, at least, deliver them from those rancorous and virulent
factions which are inseparable from small democracies, and which
have so frequently divided the affections of their people, and
disturbed the tranquillity of their governments, in their form so
nearly democratical. In the case of a total separation from Great
Britain, which, unless prevented by a union of this kind, seems
very likely to take place, those factions would be ten times more
virulent than ever. Before the commencement of the present
disturbances, the coercive power of the mother country had always
been able to restrain those factions from breaking out into
anything worse than gross brutality and insult. If that coercive
power were entirely taken away, they would probably soon break
out into open violence and bloodshed. In all great countries
which are united under one uniform government, the spirit of
party commonly prevails less in the remote provinces than in the
centre of the empire. The distance of those provinces from the
capital, from the principal seat of the great scramble of faction
and ambition, makes them enter less into the views of any of the
contending parties, and renders them more indifferent and
impartial spectators of the conduct of all. The spirit of party
prevails less in Scotland than in England. In the case of a union
it would probably prevail less in Ireland than in Scotland, and
the colonies would probably soon enjoy a degree of concord and
unanimity at present unknown in any part of the British empire.
Both Ireland and the colonies, indeed, would be subjected to
heavier taxes than any which they at present pay. In consequence,
however, of a diligent and faithful application of the public
revenue towards the discharge of the national debt, the greater
part of those taxes might not be of long continuance, and the
public revenue of Great Britain might soon be reduced to what was
necessary for maintaining a moderate peace establishment.
     The territorial acquisitions of the East India Company, the
undoubted right of the crown, that is, of the state and people of
Great Britain, might be rendered another source of revenue more
abundant, perhaps, than all those already mentioned. Those
countries are represented as more fertile, more extensive, and,
in proportion to their extent, much richer and more populous than
Great Britain. In order to draw a great revenue from them, it
would not probably be necessary to introduce any new system of
taxation into countries which are already sufficiently and more
than sufficiently taxed. It might, perhaps, be more proper to
lighten than to aggravate the burden of those unfortunate
countries, and to endeavour to draw a revenue from them, not by
imposing new taxes, but by preventing the embezzlement and
misapplication of the greater part of those which they already
pay.
     If it should be found impracticable for Great Britain to
draw any considerable augmentation of revenue from any of the
resources above mentioned, the only resource which can remain to
her is a diminution of her expense. In the mode of collecting and
in that of expending the public revenue, though in both there may
be still room for improvement, Great Britain seems to be at least
as economical as any of her neighbours. The military
establishment which she maintains for her own defence in time of
peace is more moderate than that of any European state which can
pretend to rival her either in wealth or in power. None of those
articles, therefore, seem to admit of any considerable reduction
of expense. The expense of the peace establishment of the
colonies was, before the commencement of the present
disturbances, very considerable, and is an expense which may, and
if no revenue can be drawn from them ought certainly to be saved
altogether. This constant expense in time of peace, though very
great, is insignificant in comparison with what the defence of
the colonies has cost us in time of war. The last war, which was
undertaken altogether on account of the colonies, cost Great
Britain, it has already been observed, upwards of ninety
millions. The Spanish war of 1739 was principally undertaken on
their account, in which, and in the French war that was the
consequence of it, Great Britain spent upwards of forty millions,
a great part of which ought justly to be charged to the colonies.
In those two wars the colonies cost Great Britain much more than
double the sum which the national debt amounted to before the
commencement of the first of them. Had it not been for those wars
that debt might, and probably would by this time, have been
completely paid; and had it not been for the colonies, the former
of those wars might not, and the latter certainly would not have
been undertaken. It was because the colonies were supposed to be
provinces of the British empire that this expense was laid out
upon them. But countries which contribute neither revenue nor
military force towards the support of the empire cannot be
considered as provinces. They may perhaps be considered as
appendages, as a sort of splendid and showy equipage of the
empire. But if the empire can no longer support the expense of
keeping up this equipage, it ought certainly to lay it down; and
if it cannot raise its revenue in proportion to its expense, it
ought, at least, to accommodate its expense to its revenue. If
the colonies, notwithstanding their refusal to submit to British
taxes, are still to be considered as provinces of the British
empire, their defence in some future war may cost Great Britain
as great an expense as it ever has done in any former war. The
rulers of Great Britain have, for more than a century past,
amused the people with the imagination that they possessed a
great empire on the west side of the Atlantic. This empire,
however, has hitherto existed in imagination only. It has
hitherto been, not an empire, but the project of an empire; not a
gold mine, but the project of a gold mine; a project which has
cost, which continues to cost, and which, if pursued in the same
way as it has been hitherto, is likely to cost, immense expense,
without being likely to bring any profit; for the effects of the
monopoly of the colony trade, it has been shown, are, to the
great body of the people, mere loss instead of profit. It is
surely now time that our rulers should either realize this golden
dream, in which they have been indulging themselves, perhaps, as
well as the people, or that they should awake from it themselves,
and endeavour to awaken the people. If the project cannot be
completed, it ought to be given up. If any of the provinces of
the British empire cannot be made to contribute towards the
support of the whole empire, it is surely time that Great Britain
should free herself from the expense of defending those provinces
in time of war, and of supporting any part of their civil or
military establishments in time of peace, and endeavour to
accommodate her future views and designs to the real mediocrity
of her circumstances. APPENDIX

                            Appendix

  The two following accounts are subjoined in order to illustrate
and confirm what is said in the fifth chapter of the fourth book,
concerning the tonnage bounty to the white-herring fishery. The
reader, I believe, may depend upon the accuracy of both accounts. 
 An account of Busses fitted out in Scotland for Eleven Years,
with  the Number of Empty Barrels carried out, and the Number of
Barrels   of Herrings caught; also the Bounty at a Medium on each
Barrel of Seasteeks, and on each Barrel when fully packed. 

                           Empty         Barrels
           Number of      Barrels      of Herrings     Bounty
paid on   Years    Busses      carried out      caught         
the Busses
                                                        L     s. 
 d.   1771       29           5948           2832        2085   
0    0 
  1772      168          41316          22237       11055    7   
6 
  1773      190          42333          42055       12510    8   
6 
  1774      248          59303          56365       16952    2   
6 
  1775      275          69144          52879       19315   15   
0 
  1776      294          76329          51863       21290    7   
6 
  1777      240          62679          43313       17592    2   
6 
  1778      220          56390          40958       16316    2   
6 
  1779      206          55194          29367       15287    0   
0 
  1780      181          48315          19885       13445   12   
6 
  1781      135          33992          16593        9613   12   
6
            ----         ------         ------      ------   --  
 - 
 Total     2186         550943         378347      155463   11   
0 

 Seasteeks              378,347        Bounty at a medium for
each
                                     barrel of seasteeks
                                                       L0   8   2
1/4
                                       But a barrel of seasteeks
being
                                     only reckoned two-thirds of
a
                                     barrel fully packed,
one-third is
                                     deducted, which brings the
bounty
                                     to                L0  12   3
3/4 1/3 deducted           126,115 2/3
                        -----------

 Barrels fully packed   252,231 1/3

And if the herrings are exported, there is, besides, a premium of 
                                         0   2   8
                                       --------------
So that the bounty paid by Government in money for each barrel is 
                                      L0  14  11 3/4
But if to this the duty of the salt usually taken credit for as
expended in curing each barrel, which at a medium is of foreign,
one bushel and one-fourth of a bushel, at 10s. a bushel, be
added, viz. 0  12   6
                                                      
--------------
The bounty on each barrel would amount to               L1   7  
5 3/4 

If the herrings are cured with British salt, it will stand thus,
viz.   Bounty as before                                    L0  14 
11 3/4 

  But if to this bounty the duty on two bushels of Scots salt at
1s. 6d. per bushel, supposed to be the quantity at a medium used
in curing each barrel is added, to wit                          0 
 3   0
                                              -------------- 
The bounty on each barrel will amount to        L0  17  11 3/4 

    And, When buss herrings are entered for home consumption in
Scotland, and pay the shilling a barrel of duty, the bounty
stands thus, to wit as before                                    
           L0  12   3 3/4

   From which the 1s. a barrel is to be deducted        0   1   0
                                                      
--------------
                                                        0  11   3
3/4

   But to that there is to be added again the duty of the foreign
salt used in curing a barrel of herrings, viz.                   
                               0  12   6
                                                 --------------

   So that the premium allowed for each barrel of herring entered
for home consumption is               L1   3   9 3/4  

   If the herrings are cured with British salt, it will stand as
follows, viz.   Bounty on each barrel brought in by the busses as
above                                                 L0  12   3
3/4 

  From which deduct the 1s. a barrel paid at the time they are
entered for home consumption                   0   1   0
                                             --------------
                                                       L0  11   3
3/4

   But if to the bounty the duty on two bushels of Scots salt at
1s. 6d. per bushel, supposed to be the quantity at a medium used
in curing each barrel, is added, to wit                          
       0   3   0
                                                      
--------------
   The premium for each barrel entered for home consumption will
be                                   L0  14   3 3/4 
   Though the loss of duties upon herrings exported cannot,
perhaps properly be considered as bounty; that upon herrings
entered for home consumption certainly may.


     An Account of the Quantity of Foreign Salt imported in Scotland,  and of Scots Salt delivered Duty free from the Works there for the   Fishery, from the 5th of April 1771 to the 5th of April 1782, with a Medium of both for one Year. 
                                                         Scots Salt
                                      Foreign Salt     delivered from
           Period                       Imported          the Works 
                                         Bushels           Bushels
From the 5th of April 1771
   to the 5th of April 1782            936,974           168,226
Medium for one Year                    85,179 5/11       15,293 3/11

    It is to be observed that the Bushel of Foreign Salt weights 84 lb., that of British Salt 56 lb. only.  
                                THE END

